Is that necessary?
Yes, Doctor. Captain's orders.
Well, it's strange to need armed guards in a delivery room. This way.
How frequent are your contractions?
Very close together.
In my other deliveries, except for a couple, the father was always present.
Difficult under the circumstances.
Perhaps I could serve in that capacity.
Counsellor Troi is going to need the comfort of a human touch, not the cold hand of technology.
Doctor, I think Commander Data will do very nicely.
Your choice.
You don't have to do anything, Data. Just be with me.
There is nothing to be nervous about.
Nervous? I find this very interesting. Although I understand, in technical terms, how life is formed, there is still a part of the process which eludes me. The child inside you, are you able to access his thought process? Does he have thoughts? You are aware of him. Is he aware of you? And when does that awareness begin?
It's happening.
How does it feel?
Data!
Yes?
Now!
Now? Now! Doctor! Doctor! Doctor!
This is an impatient baby. He's eager to make his appearance. Do you want something for the pain? It will in no way diminish the experience.
I have felt no pain.
None?
No, none at all.
Have your Security men stand back. I understand the importance of having you here, but keep out from underfoot. Foetal position?
Normal.
Foetal pulse?
One thirty seven.
The baby is showing healthy respiratory movements.
The action of the heart rate is good. The baby's doing wonderfully, Troi. Breathe slowly. You're doing great. Stay calm. That's it. There it is. I've got him. You can relax.
There, there. That's a good boy. It's okay. Oh, my, he's beautiful.  Are easy births the norm for Betazoids?
Not according to my mother.
You can come in the rest of the way now. There's no threat, Lieutenant. You and your men can relax. It's just a baby.
Thank you for allowing me to participate. It was remarkable.
Do you have a name?
Ian Andrew, after my father.
Were you hear all along?
Yes. He's beautiful, Deanna. Just like his mother.
How do you feel?
Fine. Wonderful. Thank you, Doctor, for everything.
Amazing.
Captain.
Doctor. Welcome to the Bridge. Please, sit down. How is Counsellor Troi? Did she have a good night?
I've delivered dozens of babies, but none like this. There was no pain, no trauma.
It's true.
It was effortless for both of them.
I'm not sure of your point.
She had her baby yesterday. If I were to examine her now, I would not be able to tell she had a baby, or had ever had a baby. It was as if the incident never happened.
Data, how long before we begin the transfer?
Two hours nineteen minutes, sir.
Number One, you have the Bridge.
Aye, sir.
You will accompany me, Doctor? Please? I think it's time I paid my respects.
Come in.
Deanna, I wanted to see how you were and have a look at your baby! My goodness. How old is he?
In actuality, a day.
Yes, but
In appearance, almost four earth years old.
Ian, say hello to Captain Picard.
You mean he can talk?
Hello.
Hello, Ian.
Please don't worry. Everything is okay.
Captain's log, supplemental. We are faced with two major problems. Troi's child and the deadly cargo we are about to take on. In the hours since his birth, Troi's baby has continued his rapid growth and now appears, physically and mentally, to be a child of eight. Still there is no indication as to who he is, or why he is here.
Sickbay, this is the Bridge. We are ready to begin loading.
We need a little more time. It's taking longer than we anticipated to categorise these specimens.
Data, look at this.
Data.
What?
My name. It is pronounced Data.
Oh?
You called me Data.
What's the difference?
One is my name. The other is not.
Is this possible? With all of your neural nets, algorithms, and heuristics, is there some combination makes up a circuit for bruised feelings? Possible?  I am unfamiliar with this symbol.
It indicates a genetically engineered biological life form.
About twenty percent of the specimens fall into that category. Some eager beaver at play.
Query. Eager beaver?
Well in this case, eager beaver refers to some overachieving genetic engineer, who, probably because of lack of anything better to do, has forced this strain of virus to mutate, just so we can see how bad, bad can get. Captain Picard.
Picard.
I just wanted you to know what risks we're about to take.
Go on.
If the most innocuous specimen on the manifest list gets loose,
It will destroy all life on the Enterprise in a matter of hours.
I understand, Doctor. Do you have a recommendation?
Considering how desperately this is needed, no, I don't. I just wanted you to know what we were carrying.
Thank you.
Commander Data, if you have completed your review, you are needed in transporter room three.
Aye, sir. Excuse me, Doctor.
That's all right. Data. Data. Whatever.
Ian? Ian!
MISS GLADSTONE:He's a very tactile child. He wants to touch and feel everything.
It's time to go, sweetheart.
MISS GLADSTONE:Unbelievable. I think he's actually grown since you dropped him off.
I like it here, Mommy.
I thought you would. Say thank you to Miss Gladstone for having you, and let's go get something to eat.
Thank you.
Bye.
Thank you.
Bio-transfer authorisation complete.
O'BRIEN:Cargo deck five, we will commence transportation
O'BRIEN:On your command.
Transporter three, we are ready to receive.
Data, the first batch is in place, and we're ready for the next.
You'll inform me when loading is complete and the cargo secure.
Aye, sir.
Come in.
I wanted to stop by and see how Ian was doing.
We're doing fine. I was just about to get him his supper.
Do you want your supper now, too?
No, Ian, but thank you for the invitation.
You're welcome. Have you ever played with puppies?
They had a litter today in the nursery.
No, Ian, I don't think I've played with puppies.
You should come to the nursery while the puppies are still there.
Perhaps later.
Ow! Mom.
Let me see that.  That's not so bad.
My face is wet.
Is that better, sweetheart? Everything's going to be fine.
He allowed himself to be burned.
For the experience.
Who is he? Why is he here? What does he want?
Ian, could you tell us why you are here?
Because Mommy said it was time to eat.
No, I mean, why you are here on this ship?
I live here.
Ian, I think the Captain wants to know if you are ready to tell us why you came here.
No, not yet.
The answer is within him. When his cognitive powers have sufficiently developed, he will be able to articulate it.
I hope he will tell us soon.
Bye.
Cargo has been loaded and is secure.
Then take us out of orbit, Number One. Set a course for Rachelis, warp six.
Can I get you something?
No, nothing. I just like to stand here.
I don't blame you. It's beautiful.
Yes.
How about some nice Mareuvian Tea?
No, nothing. Thank you.
You'll be leaving soon.
Yes.
What do you see when you look out there?
The Lorenze cluster, and there Arneb and there Epsilon Indi.
That's not what I mean. I mean, when you look there, don't you see your future?
It'll still be there.
How about a cup of nectar direct from Prometheus?
No, nothing. That's the third time you've asked me.
It's what I'm expected to do. Don't you always do what's expected?
I try.
Even if it's not what you really want?
Sometimes. Sometimes it's more important to consider others before yourself.
Yes. But sometimes the game is to know when to consider yourself before others. Give yourself permission to be selfish.
Something's wrong.
What is it?
Growth.
Where?
L seven three.
Bridge, this is cargo deck five.
Yes, La Forge?
Captain, we have a malfunction in the containment area.
How serious?
Very.
Captain's log, supplemental. For reasons as yet unknown, one of the deadly specimens of plasma plague has begun to grow.
Report, Mister La Forge.
Captain, we've checked everything. There's no reason for this to be happening. I can't even isolate the cause of the problem.
Come on Data, we'd better get down there.
Doctor Pulaski.
Yes, Captain?
We're having a little difficulty on cargo deck five. Your presence is requested.
I'm on my way.
You never talk about yourself.
Sure I do. All the time.
People say you're very old.
Oh?
And that you knew Captain Picard when he was on the Stargazer.
No, I never knew the Captain till I came onboard.
Everyone's very curious about you.
Yes, I'll bet they are.
They want to know where you're from.
Where do they say?
I heard that you're from Nova Kron and that
Mister Crusher, report to the Bridge.
Aye, sir. Got to go. Thanks.
For a dish of Delovian souffl�?
No, not for the souffl�. I meant, for the rest.
That's why I'm here.
Thanks. Bye.
Why this module and not the others?
Computer, run diagnostic on module L seven three.
All circuits functional.
Environment's as programmed. Temperature ninety seven degrees Kelvin. Radiation flux zero. Stasis field nominal. Everything exactly as it should be, right down the line.
Perhaps it is a sensor malfunction. Computer, inquiry. Is growth actually occurring in module L seven three?
Confirmed.
Doctor, one of the specimens is growing.
Destroy it now.
I can't.
Data, prepare to jettison the module.
We can't do that either. It will go into a spore and remain until it comes in contact with a planet or another ship. The results would be disastrous.
Commander, your attitude tells me that however bad I think it is, it's actually worse.
This is not going to hold it.
Go on.
The rate of growth is increasing so rapidly, within thirty minutes it's going to push out of it's module. Within two hours, it'll break out of the containment area.
No, no, no. It can't break through this.
Yes, it will.
Captain, we may not be able to get control of this situation. I recommend we arrange transfer of all non-essential personnel to the saucer section.
If we lose containment, we should be prepared to separate.
Make it so.
Why this one specimen and none of the others? Something is stimulating it. Do you have its etiology? Do you know how it was developed?
Yes, it's right over here.
It's a mutated strain developed by Doctor Susan Nuress during an outbreak of plasma plague seventy years ago in the Oby System. It was number nine in a series of fifty eight tests. This particular one bombarded by low levels of Eichner radiation. Could exposure to Eichner radiation stimulate growth?
It could, but I. I've got something.
Why didn't you detect this before?
I don't know. It wasn't here before.
Well, it is now. What emits that type of radiation?
A subspace phase inverter.
We don't have one.
Certain cyanoacrylates.
Also not on this ship. What else? Because it's here and we better find it.
I can feel that some of the people are very worried.
Yes. I feel it too, but don't you worry.
It's me, Mommy. I'm the reason.
What?
It's me.
You?
Yes. I have to leave you now, or it'll be very bad for everyone.
What are you saying?
I have to leave now.
Leave? You are going to die. No, you can't! Sickbay, this is Counsellor Troi, I need the Doctor in my quarters now! Ian! Ian, no. Ian.
It's Ian. Hurry.
What happened? Did he eat anything? Did he fall?
No.
Commander, the child is the source of the unusual radiation.
Ian said he's the reason the ship is in danger.
That analysis is correct.
I'm losing life signs.
You must save him.
I'm sorry.
Commander Riker, the containment field has stabilised.
Thank you, Lieutenant.
Then Ian was right. He was the cause.
Apparently so.
He is a life force entity. When we passed each other in space, he was curious about us, so he decided the best way to learn was to go through the process. To be born, to live as one of us and in that way to understand us. He never meant any harm.
There was a moment when you smiled.
He said, thank you. I told him we will miss him. And I will.
Standard station orbit, Mister Crusher.
Aye, sir, standard orbit.
Transporter room three, this is the Captain. We have arrived.
Let's make this transfer with all deliberate speed.
Aye, sir.
I'll be glad to be relieved of this cargo.
You have the Bridge, Number One.
Captain. Could I see you when you have a moment?
In my Ready room, when your duties permit.
Thank you, sir.
How long is it going to take to develop a vaccine?
We may never develop one.
All of this might have been in vain?
Let's hope not.
Stand by to energise.
Good luck.
Data, you can lock on to the first group and begin transporting on my mark.
Come.
Captain Picard, I've thought about this a lot. I want to remain on the Enterprise.
Have you discussed this with your mother?
No, sir. Before I do that, I'd like your permission to stay.
Wesley, it's a little more complicated than that.
Captain, this is where I want to be. This is where I feel I belong.
Captain, transfer complete. We are ready to leave orbit.
Make it so, Number One. Return to your position.
All stations secure.
Take us out of orbit, Mister Crusher. Lay in a course for the Morgana Quadrant.
Yes, sir.
Ensign Crusher has requested to remain on the Enterprise.
I'm not surprised. How did you respond?
I haven't as yet, Number One. I didn't think it was my responsibility alone. His remaining will create difficulties for us all.
Yes, indeed. With his mother gone, who will see to his studies?
Exactly. Of course, that duty will fall to Commander Data.
And who will tuck him in at night?
Come on, Commander.
I will accept that responsibility.
Well, we know he'll get his sleep.
That takes care of the practical, but there's more to growing up than that. It's my belief, Number One, that you're best qualified to supervise that. Are you willing to serve?
Difficult decision. Yes, I can do that.
Well, Mister Crusher, communicate with your mother at Starfleet Medical headquarters. Give her my regards, and tell her you have my permission to remain on the Enterprise, but I will abide by her wishes.
Yes, sir. Thank you, sir. I know she'll agree.
Now, if you have course and speed laid in.
Yes sir, they are.
Then, Mister Crusher, engage.
I'm afraid the numbers coming in are already indicating climatic changes, Commander.
What kind of drop can we expect?
If the Pentharan spheral forecasts are correct, ten to twelve degrees Celsius within the first ten days.
If it continues like that, their entire ecosystem will be shot to hell.
And I doubt they're prepared to cope with the kind of cold that's coming.
Commander Riker.
Yes, sir.
Would you join me on the bridge, please.
Right away, sir.
Are you certain, Mister Worf?
There was a space-time distortion, sir, and there is something back there. We passed within three hundred kilometres of it.
It's too close to be a coincidence. Mister La Forge?
Yes, Captain?
Would a delay of one hour affect your plans?
Not unless another asteroid decides to pay a call on Penthara, sir.
The odds of that occurring, Captain, are extremely unlikely, given the time frame.
Thank you, Mister Data.
Ensign, bring the ship about. Let's take a look at Mister Worf's distortion.
Aye, sir.
Mister Worf's what?
The Lieutenant's sensors detected a temporal distortion almost in our current course. There's a small object back there that wasn't there a few moments ago.
The object is fifty kilometres ahead, sir.
Full stop, Ensign.
Aye, sir.
On screen.
Dimensions, Worf?
Approximately five metres in length, sir.
Lifesigns?
No signs of any kind. Our sensors do not penetrate the hull.
Try hailing it.
That's odd.
What's odd?
We've received a response, sir, but
Yes, Mister Worf?
They want you to move over, sir.
Reply that the Enterprise isn't going anywhere, Lieutenant.
Not the Enterprise, Captain. You.
What are you trying to tell me?
Oops. Excuse me, Captain, but you were standing right where I needed to be.
Who are you?
Rasmussen's the name, sir. Professor Berlinghoff Rasmussen. Ah, this is wonderful. Actually, quite a bit larger than I thought.
Really?
Where I come from, every historian knows the bridge of old 1701D.
Where exactly do you come from?
Why, Earth. Late twenty sixth century Earth, to be exact. I've travelled back nearly three hundred years just to find you.
Exactly what kind of historian are you?
My focus is on the twenty second through the twenty fourth centuries. Early interstellar history. You know, it was always believed this was on your desk, not here. Fascinating. Don't move it on my account.
You can't expect me to believe that the layout of my ready room can possibly be of interest to future historians.
No less so than your legendary modesty, Captain. If I could describe to you what a thrill it is to be here.  This is the original.
You flatter me Professor, but I can't help but wonder what could possibly have caused you to select me as the subject of your study. Even in this decade, there are far wiser and more experienced humans in and out of Starfleet.
I'd love to tell you, Picard. I really would, but try and imagine what a young Caesar might have done differently had someone had given him a hint of what lay ahead, or if Lincoln had been coerced into changing his theatre plans. I truly wish I could be more specific on why you were selected, but I'm afraid the exchange of information will have to flow in one direction only.  Five, six, seven metres. Ha! I was right.
Why now?
Right. If you've came back to study us, to study the captain, why would you pick today? Why not a year ago or a year from now?
Oh, I picked the right day all right. Just wait, you'll see. Do you always sit there, on that side of the table?
Usually. Why?
It's not important.
Professor, at what point does time travel become a tool for historians?
Now, now, Commander, you know better than that. I've studied a great deal about your century, including the fact that you're all quite aware of the dangers of anyone altering the past, and that's exactly what I'd be doing if I were to divulge information like that.
Telurian plague.
I beg your pardon?
The telurian plague. Was it cured? I mean, did they find the cure by your century? Oh, it can't do any harm to ask that.
I realise that it's difficult, but we must keep to ourselves questions regarding the future. Go on, Professor.
I'll be preparing questionnaires for each of you. Please complete them at your convenience. If you're concerned about a possible breach of security, I'm sure your Captain can make a determination. And thank you in advance for curbing your curiosity.
If I hand my assignment in on time, can I get a glimpse into next week's poker game?
Mister Data, would you escort the Professor to his quarters.
This way, sir.
What did he mean, he picked the right day?
You know everything I do, Will.
Deanna?
It's hard to tell, but he is holding something back.
Of course he is. All the things he could tell us. All the things he would like to tell us.
It might be that, I don't know.
What if he's an imposter? God knows we've seen enough of them.
He is human. The medical scans have proved that, right, Doctor?
He's human, all right.
And there was a temporal distortion back there, correct Mister Worf?
Yes, sir.
And no one can deny that ship of his is unlike anything we've ever seen before.
The hull is made of some kind of plasticised tritanium mesh. We've nothing like it on record, at least not till now.
Mister Worf, I do appreciate your caution. I share it. Bring his vessel into the shuttlebay. Place it under guard.
Yes, sir.
I realise that this visit is going to be difficult for some of us, but I've examined his credentials, and everything seems to be in order, so I think we should extend to him every courtesy.
Including questionnaires?
Including questionnaires, Mister Worf.
This is really a thrill, Data, like running across a Redstone missile or a Gutenberg bible. To think, the Model T of androids.
If you're referring to the first production model automobile of the twentieth century, perhaps the subsequent Model A might be a more apt analogy, since I am Doctor Noonian Soong's revised prototype.
I stand corrected.
Is there a problem, Professor?
I suppose it will have to do, for now. I'll get you a list of the things I'll be needing, okay?
Would I be correct, Professor, in assuming that you know whether or not I am still alive in the twenty sixth century?
Since you seemed to know so much about Captain Picard and the ship, I assumed that you would.
It'd be best if you kept your assumptions to yourself, wouldn't it?
Yes, sir. Sorry, sir.
Captain's log, stardate 45350.3. We have arrived at Penthara Four and can see for ourselves the atmospheric devastation caused by the asteroid impact.
We've located three underground pockets of carbon dioxide, here, here and here. Our drilling phasers can release enough of the gas to form an envelope which would temporarily hold in the heat of the sun.
We've spend years, decades, trying to avoid anything that would lead to a greenhouse effect and now here we are about to create one on purpose.
Less than twenty percent of your normal sunlight is getting through that dust, Doctor. If we can hold enough heat in with the CO2, that should give the planet time to mend itself.
Excuse me, Doctor Moseley.
What now?
New Seattle's reporting a cloud depth of twelve kilometres. Two rivers, tropical rivers, are beginning to freeze.
We'd better get started before there's nothing left to mend.
Look who's here.
I hate questionnaires.
Professor, come and join us.
I hope I'm not intruding.
Not at all. I'm sure you're the topic of conversation at every table in this room.
As I promised, here are your assignments. I'm sure they'll be painless. Please try and complete them by tomorrow.
Tomorrow?
No problem, Professor.
You're all very calm.
Is there some reason we shouldn't be?
History always records where people were, what they were doing, when important events took place. But it rarely remembers their activities say, a week before, or a day or even an hour.
Are you suggesting that an important event is imminent?
I didn't say that, did I? Please, just go on doing what you were doing and pretend I'm not here.
Why is there no record of other future historians travelling back to witness important events?
We're obviously very careful. As a matter of fact, a colleague and I recently paid a call on a twenty second century vessel.
They hadn't perfected quarantine fields. You probably saw some surgical masks and gloves.
Isn't it fascinating how everyone has different interests when it comes to history. Different perspectives on progress.
Would you mind telling me what that is?
Just checking the time. No problem.
Is something important supposed to be happening here?
No, it's nothing, nothing. What about you, Commander? What do you see as the most important example of progress in the last two hundred years?
I suppose the warp coil. Before there was warp drive, humans were confined to a single sector of the galaxy.
Spoken like the consummate explorer.
What is going on? Are you expecting someone?
Phasers.
I beg your pardon?
There were no phasers in the 22nd century.
Ah, you see, Doctor? Our Klingon friend is a perfect example of what I was trying to tell you. He views history through the eyes of a hunter, a warrior. His passion lies in the perfection of the tools of violence. How delightfully primitive.
As soon as we input this atmospheric data from Moseley, the computer should tell us how many holes we'll have to punch.
What have you learned about the tectonic stability around the drilling sites?
Couldn't be better. Our scans were all clear and Moseley says there hasn't been so much as a quiver down there in well over a century.
Ah ha, just the two I'm looking for. I've brought you the forms I need you to complete. Shouldn't take any more than a couple of hours.
We're kind of busy here, Professor. Tomorrow would probably be better. Data, we've got about twenty three thousand thermal simulations. You think you could check them through for anomalies?
Certainly.
Is that as fast as he can go?
Not fast enough for you, Professor?
There's little known about Data's efficiency. Almost nothing about his part in this mission. It's a topic of great conjecture.
Two hundred nine anomalies all within acceptable parameters.
Thanks, Data. You're here to witness this mission. That's it, isn't it?
It'd be best if you just thought of me as a fly on the wall, and went about your business.
I will have your answered questions as soon as possible, Professor.
Data at Penthara Four!
If you'll excuse me.
Your prosthesis. What do you call it again?
A visor.
Visor. Right. A visor. You know, I have a picture of you wearing that in my office. How do you like it?
It allows me to see. I like it just fine.
You know, Homer was blind and Milton. Bach, Monet, Wonder.
A fly on the wall, huh?
A fly on the wall.
The computer has configured the drilling pattern and specified depths.
Captain, we've got everything we need. I'm ready to transport down to the surface.
I'll notify Doctor Moseley. Good luck, Geordi.
Gentlemen.
Who said these moments were any less exciting when you know the outcome?
I know of no one who said that, Professor.
The Enterprise will monitor the CO2 concentrations at six different altitudes. If all goes well, it shouldn't take more than twenty bore sites.
Let's hope all goes well.
La Forge to Commander Riker. How are you doing?
We've gotten word from the monitoring stations. They're all online. We're ready when you are, Geordi.
That's excellent. All we need now is an open channel to Data.
Open a channel, Mister Worf, and prepare to fire at target one.
The computer has locked in phaser depth calculations.
Mister Data?
Ready, sir.
Fire.
Target one is emitting two thousand cubic metres per second.
Target two, one thousand six hundred.
Surface wind patterns over the target are stable.
You picking up anything at altitude, Data?
CO2 concentrations remain unchanged at upper elevations.
Have I missed much?
Target fourteen complete, sir.
Data?
What have you got?
No change, sir.
How are the surface winds, Geordi?
Holding steady, sir.
The computer has stopped drilling.
You should be getting something
Now, Data.
Elevated CO2 levels at twenty kilometres, sir.
Now you're
Talking. We've got some new temperatures coming in.
All thermal monitoring stations are reporting no further temperature drops.
Correction, Doctor. Two equatorial stations are showing slight increases.
Thank you. Thank you all. You've given us what we need. Time.
We're glad to be of help, Doctor. The Enterprise will remain in orbit and continue to monitor your progress. Picard out.
You've given us what we need. Time.
Ensign, return to synchronous orbit.
Aye, sir.
Very clever, Picard. And well done. We've always known how you did it, but to experience the moment, to witness the nuances, it's indescribable.
He's after more than a history lesson. I can tell you that.
What is it? What are you getting from him?
I don't know. It's like he's trying to confuse us, misdirect us somehow.
There you are. Well, that certainly was exciting, wasn't it?
Professor, is everything alright? Are you well?
Yes, couldn't be better, thank you. I just thought we might chat about your questionnaire. Buck up, crewman. You're a credit to that uniform.
I've got some things to take care of.
No, please, Counsellor. I would very much appreciate your remaining.
Doctor, in response to my sixth question, you spoke of a neural stimulator. May I see one?
I don't see why not. Give me a minute.
You don't like me very much, do you?
I don't dislike you, Professor.
Keep your eyes wide, soldier. You'll be telling your grandchildren how you were there at Penthara Four. But you don't trust me. You should, you know.
Should I?
Picard's empath won't trust you. That's what they all said.
Picard's empath?
We're not that unalike, you and I. You possess a sense that is foreign to the others. My knowledge of the future is similar. You know, some of my best friends are empaths. They trust me.
Why should you care whether I trust you or not?
We're birds of a feather. We're colleagues. We could learn a lot from each other.
You're right. I don't trust you.
I knew you'd say that.
I'm sure you did.
Well, it's nice to see you two are finally getting along.
I really have to be going.
Thank you.
Why don't you try a berylite scan? I'd be interested to see where his micro-levels are.
So, what else can I show you?
You're a very curious woman. No, no, I don't mean curious like that. I mean you're curious about things. About berylite levels, about the future.
Well, curiosity is why all of us are out here, isn't it?
I understand. But you're different, you're more vibrant. More
More vibrant. That's nice, I like that.
You know, whenever I travel back, I meet very interesting people, men and women. But I've never anyone who gave me thoughts about not going home.
You're not supposed to be influencing the past, remember? And I am beginning to feel a little influenced. Anyway, I could be your great, great, great, great, grandmother.
What kind of questions did he have for you, Number One?
All he wanted to know about was previous starships. What I thought was innovative about the last Enterprise, the one before that. He said he wanted to see if we had a grasp of the fundamentals.
His queries to me primarily focused on Doctor Soong's
Captain, I am detecting a massive earthquake on the surface. Two earthquakes.
Location?
Both epicentres are beneath the two southernmost drill sites, Captain.
Is La Forge still down there?
Yes, sir.
Find him.
We've also got some volcanic activity. Pretty severe.
Magnify.
La Forge here, Captain. Moseley and I are on our way back to his lab.
Are you all right?
We're okay, but those were pretty big, sir. If this was Earth, I'd say around an eight or an eight five on the Richter Scale. We're starting to see some volcanic plumes, Captain.
Two more eruptions, sir.
It is likely that we overestimated the geologic stability around the CO2 pockets, Captain.
We're in the lab, sir.
On screen.
We're fairly well quake-proof down here, Picard. It's the volcanic dust I'm worried about.
What about the dust?
The ash the volcanoes are throwing into the atmosphere is going to compound the existing problem. In a matter of days, there'll be no sunlight getting through those clouds.
No amount of CO2 will help us then.
Captain, take a look at this.  These are the coordinates of the eruptions, and these are the coordinates of the phaser drilling sites.
The mantle is collapsing where the pressure was released.
Captain, Doctor Moseley and I have a couple of ideas, but it's going to take some time to sort out.
Sort them out, Commander.
Aye, sir.
We came here to help these people.
And look what we've done.
What in God's name is that?
Music, Professor.
Music?
Yes, sir. Mozart's Jupiter symphony in C major, Bach's Brandenburg Concerto number three, Beethoven's Ninth Symphony, second movement, molto vivace and La Donna e Mobile from Verdi's Rigoletto.
Do you think you could thin it out a bit?
Computer, eliminate programme one. Computer, eliminate programme two.  Computer, eliminate programme three. Computer, half volume.
How the hell can you listen to four pieces of music at the same time?
Actually, I am capable of distinguishing over one hundred and fifty simultaneous compositions, but in order to analyse the aesthetics, I try to keep it to ten or less.
Only four today?
I am assisting Commander La Forge with a very complex calculation. It demands a great deal of my concentration.
Well, I came to thank you for answering my questions, though I probably should have asked you to limit yourself to fifty thousand words.
You did ask me to be thorough.
I realise it's hard to believe, Data, but very few records of Doctor Soong's work survived to the twenty sixth century, so it would be invaluable to myself and other historians, if you could provide us with some schematics.
Certainly, as soon as my work here is completed.
As long as it's before oh nine hundred tomorrow. That's when I'll be heading back.
Bridge to Commander Data.
Yes, Worf.
Commander La Forge is hailing you from the surface, sir.
Patch him through, please.
Have you rerun the phase reversal figures, Data?
There were no errors, Geordi. The variance must be no more than point zero six terawatts.
Well, I don't see any other choice. We'll continue to run the numbers down here but I doubt we'll come up with anything different. You better inform the captain of the good news and the bad news. La Forge out.
Which do you suppose he's going to want to hear first?
The good news.
The motion of the dust has created a great deal of electrostatic energy in the upper atmosphere. With a modified phaser blast, we could create a shock front that would encircle the planet and ionise the particles.
That would be like striking a spark in a gas-filled room.
With one exception, sir. The particles would be converted into a high energy plasma which our shields could absorb and then re-direct harmlessly into space.
Turn the Enterprise into a lightning rod?
Precisely, sir.
And the bad news?
If our phaser discharge is off by as little as point zero six terawatts, it would cause a cascading exothermal inversion.
Meaning?
We would completely burn off the planet's atmosphere.
Captain's log, supplemental. While Doctor Moseley takes La Forge's plan to the leaders of the colony, I find myself weighing the potential consequences of a more philosophical issue.
Come.
I imagine you know why I've asked you here.
Yeah, I have a fairly good idea.
I'm faced with a dilemma. There is a planet beneath us which is slowly turning to ice, and unless we do something about it, I'm told that in a matter of weeks thousands, maybe tens of thousands, will die.
That'd be a shame.
Yes, it would. It would be quite a shame.
So, what's your dilemma?
Commander La Forge has a possible solution. The margins of error are extremely critical, but if successful, there'll be no more threat.
And if it's not successful?
Every living thing on the planet will perish.
So do nothing and thousands will die. Do something and millions could die. That's a tough choice.
Not if you were to help me.
You're not suggesting I tell you the outcome of your efforts?
Oh no, I'm not. Everything that Starfleet stands for, everything that I have ever believed in, tells me I cannot ask you that. But at the same time, there are twenty million lives down there, and you know what happened to them. What will happen to them.
So, it seems you have another dilemma. One that questions your convictions.
Well, I've never been afraid of reevaluating my convictions, Professor, and now, I have twenty million reasons to do so.
And why did you ask to see me?
Because your presence gives me potential access to a kind of information that I've never had available to me before, and if I am to re-examine my beliefs, then I must take advantage of every possible asset. It would be irresponsible of me not to ask you here.
However you come to terms with your beliefs, Captain, I must tell you that I'm quite comfortable with mine.
How can you be? How can you be comfortable watching people die?
Let me put it to you this way. If I were to tell you that none of those people died, you'd easily conclude that you tried your solution and it succeeded. So, you'd confidently try again. No harm in that. But what if I were to tell you they all died? What then? Obviously, you'd decide not to make the same mistake twice. Now, what if one of those people grew up
Yes, Professor, I know. What if one of those lives I save down there is a child who grows up to be the next Adolf Hitler or Khan Singh? Every first year philosophy student have been asked that question ever since the earliest wormholes were discovered. But this is not a class in temporal logic. It's not theoretical, it's not hypothetical, it's real. Surely you see that?
I see it all too well. But you must see that if I were to influence you, everything in this sector, in this quadrant of the galaxy could change. History, my history, would unfold in a way other than it already has. Now what possible incentive could anyone offer me to allow that to happen?
I have two choices. Either way, one version of history or another will wend its way forward. The history you know or another one. Now who is to say which is better? What I do know is here, today, one way, millions of lives could be saved. Now isn't that incentive enough?
Everyone dies, Captain. It's just a question of when. All of those people down there died years before I was born. All of you up here, as well. So you see, I can't get quite as worked up as you over the fate of some colonists who, for me, have been dead a very, very long time.
Of course, you know of the Prime Directive, which tells us that we have no right to interfere with the natural evolution of alien worlds. Now I have sworn to uphold it, but nevertheless I have disregarded that directive on more than one occasion because I thought it was the right thing to do. Now, if you are holding on to some temporal equivalent of that directive, then isn't it possible that you have an occasion here to make an exception, to help me to choose, because it's the right thing to do?
We're not just talking about a choice. It sounds to me like you're trying to manipulate the future.
Every choice we make allows us to manipulate the future. Do I ask Adrienne or Suzanne to the spring dance? Do I take my holiday on Corsica or on Risa? A person's life, their future, hinges on each of a thousand choices. Living is making choices. Now you ask me to believe that if I make a choice other than the one found in your history books, then your past will be irrevocably altered. Well, you know, Professor, perhaps I don't give a damn about your past, because your past is my future and as far as I'm concerned, it hasn't been written yet.
Captain, the electrostatic conditions are about as good as they're going to get. If we're going to try this, now's the time.
Please don't ask me, Captain. I can't help you. I'm sorry.
How long will it take to programme the phasers, Number One?
We've just got to tie in Geordi's atmospheric sensors.
So you've made your choice after all, and without my help.
Oh, on the contrary, Professor, you were quite helpful.
How's that?
By refusing to assist me, you left me with the same choice I had to began with. To try or not to try, to take a risk or to play it safe. Your arguments have reminded me how precious the right to choose is. And because I've never been one to play it safe, I choose to try. Mister Data, programme the firing sequence.
Aye, sir.
Captain's log, stardate 45351.9. Doctor Moseley has met with the colony leaders, who all agree they are willing to take the risk.
Warp power has being rerouted to the main deflector dish, Commander.
Keep those phasers on active surge control, Worf. We're only going to get one shot at this.
Well, this is it!
You have the sequence locked in, Data?
Yes, sir. After an eight point three second burst from the dish, we'll discharge all EPS taps through the phasers.
It's time for you return to the ship, Mister La Forge. Mister O'Brien, stand by to transport.
Excuse me, Captain, but I can be of a lot more help down here. We've going to have to compensate for density variations right up to the last second.
Doctor Moseley's computers can accomplish the same task, sir. but Geordi would be better able to anticipate unexpected variances.
Mister La Forge, you know better than anyone there's no guarantee this will work. If it fails
There's no guarantee it's going to fail, Captain. I'd like your permission to remain here on the surface.
Permission granted.
La Forge remained below.
Good luck, Commander.
Thank you, Captain.
The deflector dish has been reconfigured, Captain.
Proceed, Mister Data.
Stand by for auto-phaser interlock. Activating deflector beam.
EPS taps online. Phasers firing.
Activating shield invertors, now.
Mister La Forge?
La Forge here. Still breathing, Captain.
We've got particulate levels right where they're supposed to be and the sun is shining!
You see, Captain, I told you there was nothing to worry about.
Report back to the ship when you're ready, Commander. Doctor, we'll stay in orbit and analyse the remaining volcanic disturbances, but the best advice would be to let them cool down on their own.
I'm getting in the habit of thanking you, Picard.
Well, I'd love to see more, but it's nearly time for me to go. I am tickled pink to have had the opportunity of witnessing this, Picard. And you did it all without any help. well, must run. Got some packing to do. You know, you're taller in person, Commander.
Well, would you look at this. Who would have expected a teary farewell?
I'm afraid we're going to have to take a look in your vessel.
Curious till the end, eh, Captain? You can't be serious, Picard. We've been through this more than once.
A number of objects have been discovered missing in the last two days, and if they're in your possession, then we would like them returned.
I'm not here in search of relics. I'm sure they'll turn up.
If you will not open the vessel, I will. With explosives, if necessary.
I doubt you have the means.
If we don't get in that thing, I guarantee you don't either.
Considering the sensitive nature of my equipment, I think you'll understand if I request that only Mister Data be allowed to see it.
Why Data?
Because if I order Data never to divulge what he sees in there, he won't, with the exception of anything that might belong to us.
Understood, sir.
Back in a minute.
I do not believe any of these items belong to you, Professor.
Nor does this. This phaser is set at the highest stun setting. If I'm correct, that is sufficient to immobilise even you.
Why have you stolen these objects? To put in a museum?
Far too valuable for that. You see, in the century I come from, they haven't even been invented yet.
But this vessel? And the temporal distortion that coincided with your arrival?
Oh, this is a time pod, and it is from the twenty sixth century. At least that's what the poor fellow said. You see, he decided to travel back to the twenty second century, that's my time, and he had the misfortune of meeting me. His clothes fit quite well, don't you think? Took me weeks to figure out how to work this thing.
Then you are not an historian.
More of an inventor. Up till a few weeks ago, a dismally unsuccessful one.
What are your intentions, Professor?
Well, thanks to your captain, it seems my intentions have changed slightly. I was quite content with the notion of returning with those trinkets. I'd invent about one a year. But now, look what fortune has graced me with. You will take a little longer to figure out than a tricorder, but it should be well worth the effort. If the auto timer is programmed the way I think it is, in about two minutes we should be on our way back to a place called New Jersey. I'm afraid you won't be awake for the ride.
I assume your hand print will open the door whether you are conscious or not.
That weapon was working yesterday.
You were correct to suspect him, sir. But he is not from the future, he is from the past.
Trying to make my history unfold in a way other than it already has, eh, Professor?
This was all a misunderstanding, Picard. Just let me back in there and we'll forget the whole thing.
Now what possible incentive could anyone offer me to allow that?
I believe you will find all of the missing items in the vessel, sir.
Doctor.
A very nice performance.
Not all of it. Some of it was real. Captain.
He claims to be a twenty second century inventor, Captain.
A pity you weren't a bit more inventive. If fewer things had disappeared, we might never have suspected you. As it was, the only stumbling block was your ship. Our sensors couldn't penetrate it. But once the door was opened, the computer was able to detect and deactivate everything you'd stolen, including this.
I'd love to hear more, Picard, but I really must get back in that pod.
Take him to a detention cell, Mister Worf, and notify Starfleet that we'll be dropping him off at Starbase two one four.
Aye, sir.
You can't do this. I've got to get back. I don't belong here.
No!
I'm sure there are more than a few legitimate historians at Starfleet who will be quite eager to meet a human from your era. Oh, Professor. Welcome to the twenty fourth century.
Captain, we are approaching the designated coordinates.
On screen. Long range scan, Mister Data.
Sensors find no evidence of the shuttle anywhere within the star system.
It couldn't have travelled outside the system.
Mister Data, reconfigure high resolution sweep, radius one million kilometres. Check for any debris.
Scan shows no debris within that radius.
I don't understand it. A shuttle doesn't simply vanish.
There has to be an explanation.
Captain, I am detecting an unusual reading. It appears to be a neutrino emission with no visible source.
Explanation?
I have none, sir. I recommend we launch a probe.
Make it so.
Probe is launched.
Sensors show no evidence of any unusual phenomenon.
The probe is no longer transmitting.
What happened? Where did it go?
Captain's log, supplemental. The sudden disappearance of our probe suggests that we may have found the first instance of what is called null space, an anomaly which until now had been only theoretical. Commander Riker has been working around the clock with a team of J'naii specialists to formalise this hypothesis.
During the creation of a star system, when clouds of interstellar dust and gas coalesce, turbulent regions of magnetic and gravitational fields may develop. If certain conditions occur, these fields can condense into abnormal pockets of space.
We think your system contains one of these null pockets. If we're right, the pocket would absorb electromagnetic energy from anything that entered it.
Like a shuttlecraft.
Or a probe. Making them powerless.
But outside the pocket, all the energy is bent around it, making it naturally cloaked. That's why we cannot see it, and our sensors cannot read it.
Is the shuttle still there?
We think so. The shuttle probably wasn't able to sustain its energy, but other than that it wouldn't be damaged.
Since our shuttles carry plestorene based backup systems, we think life support would sustain for as long as ten days.
Then perhaps our crew has survived.
We can send one of our own shuttles, but its energy would also be absorbed. Our Chief Engineer is working on a way to maintain the power reserves long enough to rescue your crew.
Commander, we're grateful for your help. Whatever resources we can provide are yours.
I've been thinking. When the time comes, I would like to pilot the shuttle.
It's a Starfleet craft.
I cannot ask you to put yourself in danger to rescue our crew.
You can't pilot a shuttle you're not familiar with.
I happen to be a good pilot
I happen to be a good pilot, too. And I know my way around the Starfleet shuttle. So what if we team up?
When can we go over the shuttle flight operations?
Right now.
Is this the one?
This is it. Short-range craft, two twelve hundred fifty millicochrane warp engines.
Looks like microfusion thrusters.
Right.
Armament?
None, usually. This one's been fitted with two type-four phaser emitters. We'll use those to chart the null space.
Chart it?
Mister La Forge wants to get an idea of the size of the pocket. He thinks the rate of energy absorption is linked to its size.
I'm not sure how we go about mapping something we can't see.
Well, that's where the emitters come in. We shoot out a series of photon pulses into the pocket and chart where each one disappears. From that we should get a fairly complete outline.
Let's take a look at the controls.
Later we'll try a flight simulation. Right now let's do a systems review. I'll talk you through it.
Let me try it. Propulsion system, transfer conduits. Where's the schematic reactor assembly? Oh, there it is. Engine nacelles. There's nothing here that's unfamiliar. Navigational deflector, redundant graviton polarity source generators.
You handle these controls like you grew up in a shuttle.
I did. My parents were pilots. I was flying with them before I could walk. And as soon as I was old enough, I entered flight school. Krite was my instructor.
He had a good student.
He? Commander, there are no he's or she's in a species without gender.
Okay. For two days I've been trying to construct sentences without personal pronouns. Now I give up. What should I use? It? To us, that's rude.
We use a pronoun which is neutral. I do not think there is really a translation.
Then I'll just have to muddle through. So forgive me if a stray he or she slips by, okay?
Well, if that's the systems review, I don't see any problem. What's next?
Lunch.
What is it?
Split pea soup. It's my father's recipe. I had it programmed into the replicators. Well?
Unusual, but I think I like it.
It's very healthy. Helps to keep you warm on cold Alaskan nights.
We prefer to stay warm by sleeping with a friend.
I see.
Not to mate. Just to sleep together for warmth.
Still sounds better than pea soup.
We are puzzling to you, aren't we?
A little. It's hard to grasp the idea of no gender.
It's just as hard for us to understand the strange division in your species. Males and females. You are male. Tell me about males. What is it that makes you different from females?
Snips and snails and puppy dog tails?
You have a dog's tail?
It's an old nursery rhyme. Girls are made from sugar and spice, and boys are made from snips and snails.
That makes it sound better to be female.
It's an old-fashioned way of looking at the sexes. Not to say that there's no real difference between them. Physically, men are bigger, stronger in the upper body. We have different sexual organs. Men can't bear young.
And what about feelings, or emotional attitudes? Are they different?
Most people think so. But that's the kind of question that would take a lifetime to answer. Let me ask you, what's it like on a planet where the people have no gender?
I'm afraid I don't understand.
Well, who leads when you dance? If you dance.
We do, and whoever's taller leads.
Without the battle of the sexes you probably don't have as many arguments.
Just because we don't have gender doesn't mean we don't have conflicts. We're very strong-minded. We love a good fight.
From the sound of it there's not that much difference between our species.
Maybe not. What kind of woman do you find attractive?
I like one who's intelligent and sure of herself, who I can talk with and get something back. But the most important thing of all? She has to laugh at my jokes.
Tell me, is that the kind of woman that all human males prefer?
Not at all. Some like quiet, demure women. Others prefer a lot of energy. Some only respond to physical attractiveness. Others couldn't care less. There are no rules.
You make it sound very complex.
Believe me, it is.
Well, perhaps it is that complexity which makes differences in the sexes so interesting.
Good evening, Commander.
Good evening.
Please take my place, Krite. I have to be going. Thank you for going over the flight protocols, Commander. It was very helpful.
Captain's log, supplemental. Commander Riker and the J'naii pilot have set out to chart the null space pocket. If they are successful, we can then proceed with a rescue attempt.
I've illuminated the delta four grid map. We'll start there and expand.
Stand by, forward phaser array.
Pulse vanished at delta four point two by point three.
Firing second burst.
Delta four point four by point five.
This is working. Initiating computer task hand-off.
Commander, tell me about your sexual organs.
Er.
Is that an uncomfortable subject for humans?
No, but it doesn't tend to be a topic of casual conversation.
I'm interested in your mating practices. What is involved with two sexes?
Correcting course. Zero two one mark zero.
Mating?
Right. Well, it's pretty simple. Men inseminate the women. Women carry the baby.
Our foetuses are incubated in fibrous husks, which the parents inseminate. From what we know of other species, our method is less risky and less painful.
And less enjoyable.
Less enjoyable?
For humans, the sexual act brings a closeness and intimacy. It can be a very pleasurable experience. Inseminating a husk.
That's just the last step. Mating is a long ritual for us, full of variety and invention. I assure you, it is extremely pleasurable.
I'm picking up a neutrino emission from within the null space.
That may be coming from our shuttle. I'll note these coordinates.
I wonder.
What?
If a human and a J'naii would be sexually compatible.
I don't know.
Of course it would never be permitted.
Why not?
The idea of gender. It is offensive to my people. You see, long ago we had two sexes, as you do. But we evolved into a higher form. I don't mean to sound insulting, but on my planet we have been taught that gender is primitive.
Primitive?
Less evolved.
Maybe so, but sometimes there's a lot to be said for an experience that's primitive.
Delta five grid map is fully plotted.
Adjusting course. Zero two nine mark zero.
The port engine's down.
Reducing power in the starboard nacelle.
That's not enough. I have to activate the manoeuvring thrusters.
Thrusters aren't responding. I'll try to reroute the firing sequence.
Inertial dampers are failing. Hang on!
Enterprise to shuttle, do you read me?
Affirmative. We've lost an engine.
We'll try to get a tractor beam on you.
The sooner the better. Enterprise, we have an injury. Transport Soren directly to Sickbay.
Right away, Commander.
It's just a mild concussion. You're going to be fine. This will reduce the inflammation.
Doctor, you are female.
Yes.
Forgive me, I do not mean to be rude, but I'm curious. What is it like?
Well, it's just the way I am. I've never really thought about what it's like.
I've noticed you tend to have longer hair, and you arrange it more elaborately. And you apply colour to your bodies.
Colour?
You put colour on your mouths, and your eyes, your cheeks, your fingernails. The men don't.
That's true.
Then it is up to women to attract the men.
Oh, no. Men want to be attractive too, believe me. They just go about it differently.
No colour.
No colour. They like to pretend they're not doing anything to attract a woman, even when it's the most important thing on their minds.
This is very confusing. Then, are women considered more superior, or are men?
Neither. In the past, women were often considered weak and inferior. But that hasn't been true for a long time.
Will, your co-pilot is going to be fine. The injury was minor.
I'm glad to hear it.
I'm afraid you're not rid of me yet, Commander. I will be able to complete the mission.
Glad you feel better.
What happened? What made the shuttle go into a spin?
The port nacelle must have nipped one of the protrusions from the null pocket and shut it down.
Are we still on schedule, then?
That depends on how you're doing.
I'm fine. We should go check the port engine.
Whoa. Maybe we should get the doctor's opinion first.
Doctor?
I don't see any problem. But if you feel any symptoms, headache, dizziness, come back.
You have my word.
All right. This hand, the game is Federation Day.
What is that?
Well, the Federation was founded in Twenty One Sixty One, so, twos, sixes, and aces are wild.
That is a woman's game.
Oh? Why is that?
All those wild cards. They support a weak hand. A man's game has no wild cards.
Let me get this straight. Are you saying it's a woman's game because women are weak and need more help?
Yes.
And just this afternoon I was insisting to one of the J'naii that those attitudes were but a distant memory.
The J'naii. They bother me.
Why, Worf?
They just do. They're all alike. No males, no females.
Well I'm sure we're just as strange to them.
Well one of them seems to be overcoming the differences, at least in regards to one of us.
What are you saying, Doctor?
I could be wrong, but I get the definite impression that Soren is attracted to Commander Riker.
A human and a J'naii? Impossible.
Why?
Good question. Worf?
With all these wild cards, it is difficult to know exactly what is in my hand. However, I will open with fifty.
The portable transporter array is in. When we get into null space, we'll need to initialise it before we can transport the J'naii crew to this shuttle. But there should still be enough power left to beam all of us back to the Enterprise.
Is the buffer field generator installed?
Not yet. Geordi thinks that'll be ready by oh eight hundred hours tomorrow. But before that, we should see if we can balance this engine. Can you access the starboard manifold thrust?
There.
Set the arc at six point three. I'll optimise the plasma flow.
Commander, I'd like to tell you something. Something that's not easy to say.
What's that?
I find you attractive. I'm taking a terrible risk telling you that. It means revealing something to you, something that, if it were known on my planet, would be very dangerous for me. Occasionally, among my people, there are a few who are born different, who are throwbacks from the era when we all had gender. Some have strong inclinations to maleness, and some have urges to be female. I am one of the latter.
I have to admit I had a feeling you were different.
I was hoping you would. But in front of Krite and the others, I must be careful not to reveal myself.
Why?
On our world these feelings are forbidden. Those who are discovered are shamed and ridiculed, and only by undergoing psychotectic therapy and having all elements of gender eliminated can they become accepted into society again. Those of us who have these urges live secret and guarded lives. We seek each other out, always hiding, always terrified of being discovered.
How long have you known that you were like this?
I've known I was different all my life. But I didn't understand how or why until I was older.
And when you realised, what then?
I remember when I was very young, before I knew what I was, there was a rumour in my school that one of the students preferred a gender, in that case, male. The children started making fun of him, and every day they were more cruel They could tell he was afraid and somehow that seemed to encourage them. One morning in class, he appeared, bleeding and in ripped clothes. He said he had fallen down. And of course the school authorities found out and took him away, and gave him psychotectic treatments. When he came back, he stood in front of the whole school and told us how happy he was now that he had been cured. After that, I realised how dangerous it was to be different. And once I got older, and knew what I was, I was terrified. I have had to live with that fear ever since.
Do you have relationships with others?
Yes, with those who have discovered they are male. I have had to live a life of pretence and lies, but with you I can be honest. Please, don't say anything. Just think about it.
That's it, Commander, everything checks out. The energy buffer is installed and functioning. I estimate it should reduce the power drain to your systems by about forty percent.
Any guess how long we'll have?
Lets just say you don't want to waste any time once you get in there. You'll have to give him continuous readouts on energy consumption. I can't even predict if the drain will be at a constant rate.
I understand.
Then that's it. Commander, I'll monitor you as far as I can, but once you get inside that pocket you're on your own.
We don't have any idea what condition the shuttle crew is in, so we'll all beam directly to Sickbay.
I'll notify Doctor Crusher to be standing by.
La Forge to Bridge.
Picard here.
We're ready to initiate shuttle pre-launch sequence.
Proceed, Mister Data.
Initiating pre-launch sequence.
Request flight clearance.
Clearance is granted. The shuttle is under way, sir.
Good hunting, Commander.
Thank you, sir. See you for dinner.
Heading confirmed. Energy readings are normal, with power reserves stabilised at one hundred percent.
Acknowledged.
It's dead ahead, approximately fifty kilometres.
Riker to Enterprise, we're taking her in.
Riker to Enterprise? Riker to Enterprise.
Power reserves are down to eighty four percent.
Look.  Try hailing them.
Calling the Taris Murn. Do you read me?
Getting sensor readings. They're unconscious but they're alive. Stand by. I'm going to transport them over here.
Power reserves at sixty eight percent and dropping.
The null space must be affecting the annular confinement beam.
We used ten megajoules with that attempt. We're down to thirty four percent of reserves.
We can give it one more try. More than that, we won't have enough power to get ourselves out of here.
They need medical attention quickly.
Okay. Stand by to transport to the Enterprise. Here we go.
Energy consumption?
We're down to nine percent. We don't have enough to get back.
If we just sit here, we'll lose all of our systems within an hour, including life support. Okay, I'm rerouting the propulsion system to the transporter. Re-channel the navigation systems. Let's transfer every microjoule of energy we've got. Sensors, life support. This might give us one last shot.
But if we use an energy shift of that size, it'll overload the phase compensators. The shuttle
Will explode. But if we stay here, we're dead anyway. Maximum energy levels, five seconds. See you in a minute.
They've been oxygen deprived. There doesn't seem to be any significant damage. Prepare some dexalin.
Yes, Doctor.
Commander, thank you.
Your colleague Soren was very helpful.
Captain, would you all join us this evening? We would like to express our gratitude.
We'd be happy to.
Noor will be eager to get a first hand report. We should return to the surface.
I will see you later tonight, Commander.
There you are, Commander. I wondered what had happened to our guest of honour.
I just needed some air. I can only take so much of these social functions, and then I need to breathe a little.
I would think you had attended so many affairs like this that it would become second nature to you.
I was raised outdoors. I'm never been very comfortable in crowded rooms.
What do you think of our planet? Isn't it beautiful?
Yes, it is. It's beautiful.
We have many varieties of plant life. Perhaps you would like to inspect some of them?
Yes, I would. I've always been interested in exobotany.
Please, let me take you on a tour.
Thank you. It's kind of you.
One of my favourites is this menellen tree. The leaves first turn pure white, and then blue, when the weather gets cold. This is called a falla bush. It produces a fragrant flower on only one day of the year.
Captain's log, stardate 45620.4. In the hope that a detailed map of null space will prevent the loss of other ships, we remain in orbit of J'naii, charting the anomaly.
Come in. Hello, Will.
What's all this?
Wonderful things. My mother sent me a box that belonged to one of my father's ancestors. It was stored on Earth and just recently turned up.
Do you know who any of these people are?
No. Some of the pictures have names on, but most of them don't. I look at these faces and I wonder who they are and if they could be related to me.
This one looks like you.  Deanna, I have something on my mind. I had to see you.
Has something happened?
I've met someone. Someone who's becoming important to me.
Soren.
Yes. You're my friend. I thought, I don't know, I thought I should tell you.
I'm glad you did.
Nothing will change between us, will it?
Of course it will. All relationships are constantly changing. But we'll still be friends, maybe better friends. You're a part of my life, and I'm a part of yours. That much will always be true.
Hello. I'm here to see Soren.
I know.
We had an appointment. We were going to discuss
I don't think so, Commander.
Excuse me?
We know about the two of you. We know what you're doing.
Where is Soren?
We're going to make sure it doesn't happen again.
Answer me. Where is Soren?
In custody, and there's nothing you can do about it.
The hell there isn't.
You are aware of the charges against you?
Yes.
Do you intend to dispute them? Well? What is your response?
Commander Riker, these proceedings are closed to everyone.
I think I just opened them.
Sir, this is a private matter. We are grateful for your recent help, but that gives you no right to interfere with our personal concerns.
I want you to know what really happened. It's all my fault. I was attracted to Soren. I pursued. I insisted. I didn't understand your ways until she explained them to me and rejected me. Nothing happened between us. I ask your forgiveness. I behaved inappropriately.
Is this true?
No.
Soren.
I am tired of lies. I am female. I was born that way. I have had those feelings, those longings, all of my life. It is not unnatural. I am not sick because I feel this way. I do not need to be helped. I do not need to be cured. What I need, and what all of those who are like me need, is your understanding and your compassion. We have not injured you in any way. And yet, we are scorned and attacked. And all because we are different. What we do is no different from what you do. We talk and laugh. We complain about work and we wonder about growing old. We talk about our families, and we worry about the future. And we cry with each other when things seem hopeless. All of the loving things that you do with each other, that is what we do. And for that we are called misfits and deviants and criminals. What right do you have to punish us? What right do you have to change us? What makes you think you can dictate how people love each other?
I congratulate you, Soren. Your decision to admit your perversion makes it much more likely that we can help you.
Wait, wait, wait. You don't have to do this.
Commander?
Let me take her with me. She can go back to the Enterprise. We would give her asylum. You would never have to see her again. That would solve the problem, wouldn't it? You'd be rid of her. She would never be able to influence anyone again.
Commander, after Soren's diatribe, you must think that we are a cruel, repressive people. Nothing could be further from the truth.
I'm just trying to find a solution that would satisfy everyone.
We are concerned about our citizens. We take our obligations to them seriously. Soren is sick, and sick people want to get well.
Did it occur to you that she might like to stay the way she is?
You don't understand. We have a very high success rate in treating deviants like this. And without exception, they become happier people after their treatment, and grateful that we care enough to cure them. You see, Commander, on this world, everyone wants to be normal.
She is.
Take Soren to quarters. Treatment will begin tomorrow.
Don't do this. Soren!
No more, Commander.
Riker to Enterprise. One to transport.
I can't just leave her there. They'll give her these psychotectic treatments. I don't know what to do.
Well, I could talk to Noor. Perhaps there's a way to work something out.
Sir, their minds are set. They don't want to hear another alternative.
Then I'm not sure that there's much that we can do.
There has to be. My relationship with Soren is not trivial. She's very important to me. It's my fault that this happened. I have to help her.
Will, if you've come here for sanction to take matters into your own hands, I can't give it to you.
I know that, but I have to do something.
Interfering in the internal matters of the J'naii is prohibited by the Prime Directive.
I'm aware of that.
If you violate it, you may jeopardising your career. Starfleet doesn't take these matters lightly, Will. I can't defend you if you go too far. Do you understand that?
You've made yourself very clear, sir.
Don't risk everything you've worked for.
Thank you. May I be excused now?
Who is it?
Lieutenant Worf.
Come in.
Commander, I have the plan for deploying warning buoys around the null space.
Fine. Leave it, I'll take a look at it later.
Yes, sir.
Thank you. You're dismissed.
Commander, I am aware of what transpired on the planet surface. Are you by any chance considering an unannounced visit? I will go with you.
Lieutenant.
Sir, you are my commanding officer. If you order me to stay on board, I will obey. But I ask you not to give that order. A warrior does not let a friend face danger alone.
Something's happening. They're leaving.
Okay.  Excuse me. I need to speak to her alone for a moment.
Wait.
Don't worry. We'll be out of here in a minute.
Please. don't.
All right, 1e're almost there.
You cannot do this.
I won't let them hurt you. You'll be safe on the Enterprise.
I am so sorry. It was my fault that you got involved in all this.
Everything's going to be all right. Everything's going to be fine.
No, it is not.
What are you talking about?
It was all a mistake, and I should have realised it from the beginning.
What?
That I was sick. I had these terrible urges, and that is why I reached out to you. But it was wrong, and I see that now. I do not understand how I could have done what I did.
Maybe Doctor Crusher can treat you and bring you back to the way you were.
Why would I want that?
Soren. I love you.
I'm sorry.
How long to the Phelan system, Mister Data?
At warp six, fifty three hours, sir.
Commander?
Captain.
Starfleet has sent a message asking us to proceed to the Phelan system to negotiate a trade agreement.
Yes, sir.
I didn't know when to tell them we will be there. Is our business with the J'naii finished?
Finished, sir.
Very well. Ensign, take us out of orbit. Set a course for the Phelan system, warp six.
Aye, sir.
Engage.
Starfleet received this subspace transmission two days ago, Admiral.
Let's see it, Captain.
On viewer.
I am Karnas, governor of Mordan Four. A dissident group of terrorists have taken Federation Ambassador Hawkins and his staff hostage. They will not discuss terms with me. This is a crisis I cannot resolve. The terrorists are demanding a Federation negotiator. I feel there is only one negotiator with the skills to resolve the situation. The lives of the hostages will depend on Starfleet delivering this man to Mordan. Commander Mark Jameson. Admiral Jameson. The terrorists have given you six Earth days to bring him here, or the hostages will die.
Starfleet cannot understand how or why this situation has developed. Mordan Four has finally gained peace after decades of civil war
Forty years of civil war, Captain.
Yes, sir. Karnas was largely responsible for the planet's unification and peace. Why should he now be unable to deal with this rebellious faction?
Forty-five years ago I negotiated a hostage situation on Mordan, Captain. Karnas was a young man then, but so was I. He seems to feel that I can handle the situation again.
I'm detailed to take you to Mordan Four as soon as you can be ready, Admiral.
My wife and I will beam aboard at fifteen hundred hours, Captain. Acknowledge.
Received and acknowledged, sir. Picard out.
Nearly fifteen hundred now, sir.
Well, Number One, let's go and welcome the Admiral aboard.
Welcome aboard, Admiral. This is my Executive Officer, Commander William Riker.
My pleasure, sir. Ma'am.
My wife, Anne. Captain, there are certain details of this mission that you should understand before we begin.
Yes, sir.
I am not simply an advisor. On any assignment I accompany, Starfleet has designated me Senior Mission Officer. I control the away team and all its actions. Is that understood? Of course, Captain, you command the ship, but the mission is mine. I trust you are in complete agreement.
Yes, sir. Of course.
Message coming in from Mordan, sir.
Put it on the screen, Mister Data.
Mordan Four to Enterprise. This is Karnas. I will speak to the Captain.
I am Captain Picard, commanding the Enterprise.
Is Admiral Jameson on board?
He's here, beside my First Officer. Do you wish to speak to him now?
So, Jameson. I see time has not been kind.
It seldom is, Karnas. However, we could save a good deal of it now if you'll outline the terrorists' demands.
They insist all discussions will take place here on Mordan. They refuse to speak to me, only to a Federation mediator. They say they will brook no excuses. If there are any offered, your ambassador and his people will die. Unpleasantly. I believe them. So should you, Admiral.
Tell them I accept the conditions of negotiation.
I will do so immediately.
For a man in his position, he doesn't seem to know much about the situation.
Wrong, Number One. He told me that the terrorists are desperate enough to kill if they're crossed. They are willing to talk, one on one, but not to him.
Counsellor?
From his body language as well as his words and tone, I'd judge that what Karnas said was honest. But I sensed a holding back.
Perhaps he knows more about the terrorists than he's prepared to admit.
Possible, but I suspect it's closer to the mark if we said he doesn't want to admit failure of his own efforts to negotiate. He is a proud man.
That could be, sir. Karnas has established himself as a powerful man on Mordan. Suddenly, in this situation, his power is useless.
Sickbay to Bridge. I'm ready for Admiral Jameson now.
In a few moments, Doctor.
Ready for what, Captain?
Just a routine medical checkup. Ship's regulations.
What I don't understand, sir, is how Karnas knew you were still available.
Still alive, you mean.
So far as he knew, sir, you could have been dead.
Quite right, Commander, but I am not, and I imagine Ambassador Hawkins has told him that. I briefed the Ambassador about Mordan before he left to take up residence.
All right. Karnas has a problem he thinks you can resolve. What do the terrorists need that Karnas can't, or won't, give them?
Mordan has had peace for five years. They have finally come to a state of productivity which satisfies their planetary needs, but no more than that. Perhaps the dissidents feel the Federation could provide them with more.
I have negotiated many treaties on many planets, Picard. I've found that peace, or the appearance of it, is often a prelude to war.
Admiral, are you suggesting the terrorists want arms and weapons?
They may. I am suggesting Karnas is the last man to give them such weapons.
I see. You believe that Karnas would not negotiate on that point, and so the terrorists demanded an outside negotiator.
I know Karnas. He is a warrior. He lives for challenge. These people have insulted his honour by taking the embassy staff hostage. I'll negotiate, but I'll have to be very careful in dealing with Karnas. He'll want revenge for that insult.
Well, it's about time. Couldn't get away from the Bridge?
Didn't want to. Feels good to be on one again.
I'm glad, Mark. Do you want me to help you up?
You're stronger today.
I'm fine. I feel like a kid again.
This ship is magnificent. It even has family quarters. Pity we didn't have them twenty, thirty years ago. We could have been together almost all of your career. Mark!  Mark? I'll get Sickbay.
No. There's no need. It's happened before.
When? You haven't said anything.
It'll pass. Just give me a moment. See, I'm better. It's going away.
What is it? Do the doctors know?
Just body changes. Last checkup they said I'd have to expect it.
You're sure? Don't lie to me.
I'm sure.
All the medical information the Admiral provided is satisfactory, sir.
Excellent, Doctor.
Except for one thing. The test results he gave me aren't two days old, they're two months old. The medical file coder always includes the date as part of the file number. He lied to me, sir, and I don't know why.
He is eighty five years old, Doctor. For some, the memory begins to fail.
He suffers from Iverson's Disease, sir. It affects the body, not the mind. No, I have a gut feeling he's hiding something.
That is an observation I'd expect from Counsellor Troi. Doctor. Doctor, I do respect your opinion, and I'll want you on the Bridge for the next day or so. The Admiral must remain in the best of health for these negotiations, and he might require your services.
Admiral, we're approaching the Idini Star Cluster. Would you like to take the conn as we make transit?
Thank you, Captain. I would.
Well, Admiral, quite a little surprise you've pulled on us.
Yes, quite.
Neglected to mention I began some new therapy before I left. Seems to be working. I haven't felt this good since the last time I was in space. The Gettysburg. All I needed to get me out of that chair was the thought of walking the decks in command of a starship again.
Admiral, you only have the conn temporarily.
A figure of speech. Of course she's your ship. I'll just keep an eye on her for a while.
The admiral displayed a remarkable improvement out there, wouldn't you say?
Captain, no one recovers from Iverson's Disease. There is no known cure, and there are no cases where it has gone into remission. I have never heard of any therapy that would produce results like that.
Then how do you account for it?
I can't. All I can tell you is that the Admiral has been confined to his support chair for the last four years by the effects of Iverson's. By all the medical facts we know, he should never have walked again.
I want you to look into it, Doctor. Thoroughly.
Yes, sir.
The terrorists have given you six Earth days to bring him here, or the hostages will die.
I don't know how much more information you think you can get from that tape.  Mark! My God, what's happened?
It's the new therapy I'm taking. It's working, Annie.
Oh, darling!
Mark?
I told you I just needed to get back into space again.
You really are looking much better.
It's the new treatment.
No. Come here.
I hope you're heading for the bedroom.
You stop it.
Darling, you look like you looked twenty years ago.
You're flatter me.
Now you tell me what the hell is going on?
I don't know
Sickbay! Medical emergency in the Admiral's quarters!
I found traces of chemical substances in his blood and tissue samples, but none of them are in our pharmacopoeia. I'm still working on alien references to substances like these. All I can tell you is that he's ingested something that's strongly affecting his body.
Specifics, Doctor.
Captain, there are so many things going on, I can't give you specifics until I do a lot more tests.
Give me what you have now.
His red cell count is running riot. The cellular structure of his body is radically changing, but we can't make any decisions on that until we know what it's changing to. His DNA is skewed. Don't ask me how, but he even looks younger. And Captain, there are absolutely no traces of Iverson's Disease.
You said there is no cure for Iverson's.
None that we know of. But whatever these substances are doing to his body, at least they've done that for him. But how or why? It's too early to say.
Get me some answers, Doctor. As soon as possible.
Yes, sir.
Captain.
Mrs. Jameson, I have to ask the Admiral some questions.
Ask away. There's nothing to hide now.
Admiral, in addition to your rank, you are a particularly valuable commodity just now. Starfleet has a right to some answers.
I've planned this for a long time, ever since I learned I had Iverson's Disease. Since it put me in that chair.
What did you do, Mark?
There's a planet in the Cerebus system, Cerebus Two. They say the natives have a process that rejuvenates the body, gives you your youth back.
Yes, I've heard of that story. It's a myth.
It's true, Picard. I'm living proof. Oh, it's dangerous. The mortality rate is high, and it's very painful. Aliens are seldom allowed to obtain the process, but I managed it. I negotiated a treaty for Cerebus Two some years ago, and they felt obligated to honour my request for the process.
Obviously it works very rapidly, but how does it work?
The herb and drug combinations are self-administered slowly over a period of two years. Every response is different, depending on a being's DNA. I got enough for both of us, Annie, but I had to test it on myself first. I couldn't risk you. If I died, well, I was half a man, so what did it matter.
It would matter to me.
But I was starting to change, Anne. It was almost undetectable, but the improvement was there. Then when this hostage situation came up, I knew I'd have to be at my peak to deal with it. I didn't have time to wait for the drug to work naturally.
So you took the whole dose.
I took both of them. And look at me, Annie, look at me. I'm strong. I'm alert, Fit. I'm fitter than you are, Picard. And I'm getting younger!
The only question I have, Admiral, is why you thought it necessary to be young to negotiate the release of the hostages. Even willing to put your life at risk for it. I'll be on the Bridge, Admiral, if you want to talk further.
Why didn't you tell me, Mark? We've always been honest with each other, until now.
Annie, I did it for us.
Oh, I'm sure you believed that, until you had a chance to head up a mission, to command again, and then you just upended the bottle or whatever it was, and damn everything. Did you think about me at all?
I obtained enough of the dosage for both of us.
But you never asked if I wanted it. It's just like you, Mark, to assume that what you felt was right was the only answer.
But it was the right answer for me. It was killing you, having to take care of an invalid. Annie, what good was I to you? We can be together again.
Let me go!
I can get you another supply of the drug.
Commander Data, I wish to open a communication frequency to Karnas.
Aye, sir.
One moment, Mister Data. Admiral, this is Picard. May I know the reason for this communication?
Karnas must have tried to negotiate with the terrorists before he was forced to call on me. I want all the information he has access to.
You said Karnas was a proud man, Admiral, probably sensitive about his failure to deal with this situation. Is it wise to press him on this?
I'm the negotiator, Picard.
Karnas will have to cooperate with me and the terrorists, and damn his sensitivities.
Then I suggest a secured channel, Admiral.
A sensible precaution, Picard. Make it so.
Make it so.
Aye, sir. Frequency open and secured.
Karnas.
What is it you want, Admiral?
We're on a secured channel, Karnas. You can talk freely. Who's behind this thing? You said dissidents.
Yes, political opponents who feel the Federation will disavow me as Governor if they stir up enough trouble on Mordan.
Then who is it? Ardan? Gilnor?
They're dead, Jameson. A long time now. For a long time I thought you were dead, too.
I almost died a couple of times on missions, but I always made it through somehow.
Yes. Now you're coming back to Mordan to negotiate for hostages again. It's almost as though the forty five years in-between never happened.
You've never forgiven me.
Of course I have. It was years ago.
There are no dissidents, are there? No terrorists. You have the hostages.
And if I have? You're coming to Mordan, Jameson, and you're going to negotiate for their lives. And I'm going to ask a very, very high price.
What if I refuse?
Then the hostages will die. You've seen how my executioners work. They are still as efficient as they were, perhaps even more skilled now. You'll come, even if you don't have much honour left.
Conn, are we still on schedule to arrive at Mordan in thirty eight hours?
Aye, sir. We're at warp four.
Picard, I want a jump to warp eight, so that we arrive ahead of our announced ETA. It'll throw Karnas off balance, and we can catch him before he's ready.
Ready for exactly what, Admiral?
I believe Karnas has the hostages, and there never were any dissidents.
What has happened to bring you to that conclusion? That's quite a big jump.
I'm not at liberty to say, Picard, but negotiations are no longer the answer.
Isn't the most important thing the hostage's lives?
And you agree with that too, Riker?
I do, sir.
Good. Because I plan to personally lead an away team on an armed rescue mission to get them out of there.
Commander Data, bring up the plans I requested on the viewscreen, please.
Aye, sir.
Most of Mordan's principal city was devastated during the war. What was left consisted largely of a network of underground tunnels. A rat's maze. When they rebuilt the city, they simply built over the tunnels.
I have it, sir.
Pardon me, sir, but where do these tunnels come into the picture?
This is where Karnas held his hostages before and where I believe he has them now.
Wouldn't that be a little obvious, Admiral?
Karnas is a dogged strategist, Picard, not a brilliant one. He sticks to what works. He will kill the hostages if we do not get them out of there.
Therefore you see this armed raid as the only option.
You don't agree?
With respect, Admiral, I would point out no one else has heard or considered Karnas's demands. The Federation might view them differently if they knew what they were.
Starfleet has given me command of the away team, Picard, and I intend to use them as I see fit.
Our anniversary is next week. Our fiftieth.
In his heart, he's still the same man you married, Anne.
That's true. He still cares for you, despite the physical changes he's undergoing.
But he's getting younger, and I'm, well look at me. Why did he do this?
Because there are lives at stake, Mrs. Jameson.
What about our lives, his and mine? I was looking forward to time together finally. Our retirement. Now he's young again, and has his life to live over.
Doctor, she has to know.
Know what?
Anne, your husband.
What is it?
He's not stabilising. He may not have that life to live over.
We'll be at Mordan in three hours.
I couldn't sleep either.
I never could before a mission. I always wound up in the observation lounge, staring out at the stars, thinking.
Perhaps in this case, rethinking?
Why is this mission so important to you? Why did you risk your life to lead it personally?
I want to save lives, Captain.
Noble sentiments, but that's too easy an answer. You've been here before. You negotiated a release of the hostages with Karnas before. Why is it now your answer is an armed raid? It's my away team you're sending in there. I think there's something you're not telling me, and I have a right to know what it is.
Do you know the background? The Mordanites had some sophistication, but were still ruled by tribal family units. Karnas's father was the ruling chief of one of the families. Another tribe had him assassinated. Karnas seized the passengers of a starliner and held them hostage, demanding that Starfleet provide him with weapons that would enable him to defeat his rivals.
That's the official record.
Officially, the story is that after two other mediators were murdered, I went in and negotiated with Karnas to bring out the hostages safely.
Are you saying that's not the truth?
It wasn't my golden oratory that saved them, Captain. I gave Karnas the weapons he wanted.
You did what?
I gave exactly the same weapons to his rivals. My interpretation of the Prime Directive. Let them solve their problems with those arms on an equal basis.
And that decision plunged them into forty years of civil war.
I didn't know that would happen. I thought a minor war. It would be settled in less than a year. How would I know it would take four decades? But I falsified the reports to Starfleet, and I lived with that on my soul, Picard. Sixty-three people came away safe but millions died on Mordan because I delivered those weapons.
Karnas could have worked for peace during those years instead of continuing the war. It's not all on your head, Admiral.
But I started it. I lit the match. Now finally I can vindicate myself, if only in a small way. I came to negotiate, but that isn't what Karnas wants.
Revenge. That's why he demanded you when he knew that you were still alive.
And I'm not going to give it to him, Picard. I'm going to do what I should have done the first time. We're taking the hostages out by force, if necessary. No deals.
Prepare to energise, Chief.
Belay that. Admiral, your proper place is on the Bridge.
I will remind you one more time, Picard, I am the Senior Mission Commander and I'm leading this team.
Sir?
The Admiral is correct, Number One. He has that right. But I am the Captain of this ship, and I have a right to accompany him. Riker, you're in command of the Enterprise. Energise.
Yes, perfect. We are in the M4 tunnel, directly under the Governor's residence. M-4 is a subsidiary tunnel, but it crosses and links with several main ones.
I am sorry, sir. That does not correspond with the information in my tricorder, sir. JAMESON Your information is incorrect, Commander. I know these tunnels like the back of my own hand. Keep scanning for signs of human life forms. Karnas held his hostages in these tunnels before. He'll do it again.
Captain, the Admiral is definitely incorrect. The tunnel schematics we have show this to be a dead end. It was sealed off two years ago.
No doubt you're right, Mister Data. However, forty five years ago, I'm sure it linked in with the tunnels the Admiral remembers.
Damn.
Geordi?
This is steelplast, sir. Fairly recent installation.
This is the most direct route. Set phasers to cut through it.
If you have the coordinates where you think the hostages are, sir, we could just beam in over there.
Karnas may not have them in the same place. There's no substitute, Lieutenant, for personal reconnoitre.
Admiral, there's an infrared light signal ahead. Steady beam, straight across the tunnel, chest high. There's another at waist level.
An alarm trigger or
Reset phasers to stun.
Take cover!
Sir, look out!
Their phasers, sir, set on kill.
Thank you, Mister Data. I have heard the sound before.
Is he hit?
No sign of a wound.
Enterprise, this is Picard. Six to beam up, now!
The Admiral?
Sickbay. Not good is a galactic understatement.
Sir? Karnas again, sir. On screen.
Enterprise. There has been an armed intrusion in the tunnels beneath the city. That smells of Jameson. Where is he?
Karnas, this is Picard. I'm sorry to inform you the Admiral is critically ill.
That is not my concern. Sick or well, you have ten minutes to beam him down.
Sickbay to Bridge.
Picard.
Doctor Crusher
Requests your presence in Sickbay immediately, sir.
I'm on my way.
Sickbay.
What is it, Doctor?
I think you'd better see for yourself, Captain.
Picard. Picard, I have to get to Karnas.
I can't allow him out of my care, Captain.
It's my last option, Picard. The raid failed. All I have left to bargain with is myself.
Bridge to Picard.
Picard here.
A new message from Karnas, sir.
If we don't deliver Jameson in five minutes, one of the hostages will be executed.
Fifteen minutes after that, another.
He promises the method of execution will be most painful.
Let me go. If I give myself over to him, he'll let the hostages go. It's me he wants.
It means almost certain death for you, Admiral.
My life for how many hostages, Picard? Twenty? Let me go.
Number One, inform Karnas we'll be beaming down in less than five minutes.
Did you say we, sir?
You have your orders, Number One.
Aye, sir.
Who are you? I want Jameson.
Karnas, this is Admiral Mark Jameson.
This charade will accomplish nothing, Picard. Beam down Jameson, and the hostages will be freed. Continue this and I promise you they will die. And you with them.
Peretor Karnas, you always were a stubborn man. I thought you wanted me. I'm here. Release the hostages now.
Peretor was my old title. Why do you call me that? I warn you, Picard. This trick is going too far. He has been coached for some devious reason. If this farce does not stopped immediately, you and the hostages will be put to death.
Doctor!
I am waiting for an explanation, Captain.
He is the Admiral, Karnas. Before he left on this mission, he administered an overdose of an alien de-aging drug to himself. He wanted to face you with strength again, on even terms. This is what the drug has done to him.
This story you are telling is unbelievable. Jameson is a man of more than eighty years, not this. I want that old man, Picard. I want to show him this world he helped to make. The scars on old soldiers' bodies. The graveyards of our young dead. The wasted cities we are still rebuilding. And all of it caused by him.
As I understand it, Karnas, you were the one who demanded the weapons to avenge your father's death.
But Jameson didn't give weapons to only us. If he had, we would have quickly triumphed over our enemies, and there would have been peace in all these decades. I want him to pay for that, Picard.
Captain, I think Mrs. Jameson should beam down now.
Enterprise, this is Picard. Have Mrs. Jameson prepare to beam down. Karnas, I asked Doctor Crusher to bring with her the visual records we've made of Admiral Jameson's deterioration. Will you look at them?
You're wasting my time, Picard.
Just a few moments. You saw the Admiral on the Enterprise when he was en route to Mordan?
Yes.
And you recognised him?
Yes.
Is this the man you saw?
This is the man I want.
He's here, Karnas. Look. Once he took the compound there was no way to stop it.
You'll have to deal with me, Karnas. Whatever you wanted from Jameson isn't possible any more. And you wanted revenge. You blamed your war on him, and there's no doubt he had a lot to do with it. But you had the weapons and you used them. You could have tried for negotiations for peace on your planet long ago. Instead you chose to fight. How many of those forty years of civil war are on your head, Karnas?
Jameson has to pay for his crimes. I have sworn it to my people.
Forty five years ago he made the wrong decision. He wanted to come here to somehow right it, to atone for what he did. Now all he can do is to give himself up to you. He brought this retribution on himself.
No. I don't believe you. You're shielding Jameson on the ship and you're telling me this tale to save his life.
Peretor Karnas, there were only two of us in the meeting. You didn't even trust your lieutenants there. You told me that old Peretor Sain had ordered your father's assassination. You told me that you wanted arms to destroy him. Peace wasn't on your mind. All you wanted was revenge. And I gave you the weapons to do it.
Jameson told you this. If it is you, show me the scar.
There. The blood cut you gave me to seal our bargain.
It is you. Somehow it is you.  Then die by your own weapon! No. No, my revenge will be in seeing you live like this. Such pain.
The compound he took is forcing his cells and organs to go further, younger, and they can't take the stress. It's like they're imploding. And I can't give him anything to stop it.
Can you ease the pain?
Mark, can you hear me?
Yes.
I'll always love you.
Annie with the golden hair.
Flatterer. It's grey now.
I see only the gold.
Rest, Jameson. Your long night, and mine, are over. The hostages will be freed immediately, Captain. I'm prepared to be cooperative.
The hostages have been freed by Karnas, unharmed, and the body of Admiral Mark Jameson has been buried on Mordan, at the request of his widow and by the permission of Karnas. The quest for youth, Number One. So futile. Age and wisdom have their graces too.
I wonder if one doesn't have to have age and wisdom to appreciate that, sir.
I hope not, Number One. Mister La Forge, prepare to take us out of orbit. Set course for Isis Three.
Aye, sir. Leaving orbit.
Shields up, maximum strength.
Shields up. Sensors do not indicate the presence of any armed space vehicles operating in the Rana system.
They could be cloaked, or otherwise shielded. Mister Crusher, bring us in well clear of the planet's three moons.
Aye, sir.
Captain, we are not receiving Rana Four's call sign.
Open a frequency to Colony Operations.
No response. Rana Four is emissions quiet.
Captain, there are eleven thousand inhabitants in this colony. At this range, I should be sensing something. I'm not.
Mister Data, put the planet on the main viewer. Magnify.
My God!
Helm, put us in high equatorial orbit. Scan for survivors.
Survivors? Down there?
Sensors are scanning ninety degrees of longitude as we orbit. I am detecting no bodies of water, no vegetation, no artificial structures.
Life form readings are negative.
Could the colonists have escaped?
That is highly unlikely. Rana Four possessed no interstellar spacecraft.
Who would cause devastation on that order?
Hold it. Captain, I've got something here. Thirty seven degrees north and sixty two degrees east. It's a structure.
Life?
Two life forms, possibly human.
Put that area on the main viewer. Magnify.
The structure is located at the centre of the vegetation.
An entire planet obliterated except for a few acres of trees and grass and one building?
It must be some kind of illusion.
Negative. It is as you see it.
Number One, I think you had better see who's at home.
If they're the only survivors of a nuclear holocaust, they can't be in very good shape.
I understand. Counsellor?
What I sense of them is human.
And something else?
It's difficult to explain. I feel there's something different about these two people. I'm sorry. I can't be clearer than that.
We're ready.
Good luck, Number One.
Energise.
Geordi, what can you tell me?
The house is a typical settlement structure with adaptations. Its thermal properties all seem to conform to known materials.
If there are indicators as to why this particular area has remained intact, I cannot detect them.
Worf, the interior of the house?
There is one individual is located at the south end of the house, the other toward the north. There is a weapon, a low-yield phaser, nonfunctional, in proximity to the front-room individual.
I guess a frontal assault is unwarranted. Stay here. I think I'll try an old-fashioned knock on the door.
Commander, wait. There's something concealed under the surface
What are you doing there? This is private property Who are you people?
I'm Commander William Riker of the USS Enterprise. Crewmembers. May I comet down and approach you?
You leave him right where he is.
Should I incapacitate him, Commander?
No. We're a rescue party. We picked up your colony's distress call and we came as fast as we could.
Kevin! Kevin, what are you doing? Can't you see they're here to help us? Can't you see they're human?
Go back in the house, Rishon. This could be some kind of a trick.
We'd almost given up hope. We were afraid maybe the whole Federation had been attacked.
What about the colony? Do you know of any other survivors?
It's been days since we've seen or heard from anybody. No, don't. Don't tell me that we're the only ones.
They came in a spaceship so big you could see it in orbit. They took our world apart piece by piece.
Who?
We don't know. We never saw their faces.
You don't know where they came from? Where they are now?
I guess they've gone away.
Oh, I'm sorry. I'm only performing a physical. Could I have your names, please, just for the record.
I'm Rishon Uxbridge and this is my husband Kevin.
Botanists. Originally from the aquatic city New Martim Vaz in Earth's Atlantic Ocean. Residents of the Rana Four colony for five years. You, ma'am, are eighty two years of age and a composer of Tao classical music. You, sir, are eighty five years of age and a specialist in symbiotic plant life. You have been married for fifty three years. I memorised the colony register on the way to Rana Four, in the event that such information would be needed.
Is something wrong?
With your permission, I'd like to look inside of the house.
Why? What could interest you in there?
Mister Uxbridge, as far as we've been able to determine, you and your wife and this house are all that survived that attack. That's was either a bizarre coincidence or by design, and I don't favour the coincidence theory.
Are you saying that we were kept alive intentionally?
Yes.
I don't understand. You don't think Rishon and I did something that merited survival, do you? I mean, betrayed the others?
I'm not accusing you of anything, Mister Uxbridge. The attacking force spared you for some reason. We'd like to know why. Now, may I go inside?
I'll make everyone a nice cup of tea. We have lovely tea here on Rana. It grows wild nearly every
Sir. May I say your attempt to hold the away team at bay with a nonfunctioning weapon was an act of unmitigated gall.
Didn't fool you, huh?
I admire gall.
Go ahead, pick it up. It's a music box. It's been in my family for generations.
There's nothing unusual about this house, except the fact that it's here. What about them?
They're in reasonably good health. Both show signs of stress, which is understandable considering what they've been through.
Somehow, they're different. Let's get back to the ship. We'll take them with us. Excuse, Mrs. Uxbridge. We'd better return to our ship now.
But I haven't finished fixing your tea, Commander.
I'm sorry, but we're finished here. Now, I can allow time for you and Kevin to pack.
What do you mean, pack?
You're not thinking of taking us with you, are you?
Surely you don't want to remain here? How can you take care of yourselves?
Kevin, I can't leave my home. Don't let them do this to us.
No one's going to make us leave.
You'll be protected on our ship. You could still be in danger here on Rana.
Commander, we appreciate your concern but we're not going anywhere. We'll manage. We always have.
All right. I can't make you come with us.  Are you familiar with one of these? We'll be in the system for the next several days at least. If you reconsider, please contact us.
We'll be fine, Commander. We have each other.
Are they collaborators? Did they provide the colony's assailants with something that abetted the total destruction of Rana Four in order to protect their own lives?
What could two botanists in their eighties possess that could possibly aid whoever attacked the planet?
We don't know what the enemy needed, Doctor. Love? Fear? Hope?
Maybe they're being held hostage in some fashion?
Nothing in the tricorder readings indicated they were under that kind of stress.
Counsellor? Counsellor Troi?
I'm sorry. I don't sense them well enough.
Number One, you say the couple is incapable of sustaining themselves?
There's a fusion reactor in the house, good for another five years of power. But their water table is tainted. They have nothing to feed themselves except for a small garden.
They won't come to the ship?
They were adamant.
We'll do all that we can to help them but in the meantime I want them kept under surveillance.
I'm sorry, I'm not feeling very well. I'd like to go to my quarters.
By all means.
Is there anything I can do?
Captain, a search of the Ranian system has determined that the hostile force that attacked this planet is no longer present.
I remember a Starfleet admiral once saying the same thing about some renegade Andorians in the Triangulum system. It turns out that they had dismantled their ship and hidden it.
Those Andorians did not have to contend with someone of my thoroughness. I will stake my reputation.
Don't listen. Think of something else. Stop! Please, stop!
Yes?
I was concerned. I came to see if I could be of any help.
I'm fine. There's nothing wrong. I'm just tired, that's all.
Now, I may not have your gifts at reading emotions, Counsellor, but I can tell when someone is in pain and hiding it.
It's so silly. I hear music. In my mind. Music that won't stop.
Perhaps it's a symptom of fatigue. We've all been inflicted one time or another with that melody that won't go away.
No, it's deeper than that. The song doesn't stops for an instant. It plays in perfect clarity from beginning to end over and over again. I don't even know what song it is. I never heard it before.
When did this start?
A few hours ago, while the away team was on the surface. I was trying to, I was thinking of Rishon and Kevin.
Rishon and Kevin? And?
I can't explain it, Captain. They're elusive. They're, I'm sorry
Well, try and rest. Take the necessary sleep inducements if you have to.
Data, give us a visual. Magnification factor fifty.
Look at the size of that!
Now where did that come from?
Apparently it was riding a Lagrange point, hiding behind Rana Four's furthest moon.
Our vehicle classification index can put no identity to it. Its design is completely foreign.
But that's our boy. Approximately five times our mass and carrying enough armament to pulverize a planet.
Lieutenant?
I, er, cannot explain this, Captain.
It's heading for the planet.
Hailing frequencies.
Open.
Mister Data, ask them to identify themselves and match our orbit.
They have received the message, Captain, but are ignoring it.
Maximum shields, ready all weapon systems.
Aye, sir.
It's assuming an attack posture. Don't be surprised if
The vessel is firing jacketed streams of positrons and antiprotons. Equivalent firepower, forty megawatts. Shields are holding.  Again, forty megawatts. No damage.
If that's the best they can do, this should last about five minutes.
Mister Worf, let's raise our voice a little. Fire phasers. Just a warning shot. Mister Data, invite them to stand to.
The vessel has assumed a position outside of the Rana system, and it is rapidly increasing velocity.
Helm, initiate pursuit.
Aye, sir. The vessel has reached warp two and continues on a steady acceleration curve. We're not getting any closer, Commander.
Give us a superior curve, Mister Crusher.
Warp three. Warp four. The warship continues to match our curve simultaneously point for point. Warp four point five. Warp five. Warp five point five.
Riker to La Forge. Give us everything you can to close the gap, Geordi.
Yes, sir.
I'll get you to nine point three seven in fifteen seconds.
Warp eight point five. Warp nine. The warship continues to match our acceleration curve perfectly.
Number One, I have the distinct impression that we're being toyed with. Take us back to Rana Four.
Back?
We have unfinished business there. I need to have a talk with those two people. You have the Bridge.
Reduce speed. Bring us around on a return course. This one's getting away.
Good afternoon. I'm sorry if I startled you. I'm Jean-Luc Picard, Captain of the Enterprise. I have brought you something you will need if you're going to stay on Rana Four. It's a matter replicator. It has limited capabilities, but
Thank you, but we have no use for such a thing.
It will provide you with clothing, food and clean water. Lieutenant Worf demonstrate its operation.
We don't need it.
Kevin, you know we do. Thank you, Captain. Kevin and I were about to have afternoon tea. You and Mister Worf must join us.
I'd like that very much.
Rishon, they only want to spy on us like this morning.
Kevin Uxbridge, I have never turned anyone away from this house, and I'm not going to start now. Captain.
Thank you.
Stop! Stop! Please, I'll do anything! Make it stop!
Please. I'm here to help.
It's so loud! It's getting louder! Please, I can't stand it. Make it stop!
Move her to the bed.
This will help you relax.
I hear it. It's still there! It's so loud!
Take her to Sickbay.
No, I want to stay in my quarters.
I can get you to sleep.
I don't want to sleep. The music will only follow me.
I can induce delta sleep. Lock out even your deepest dreams.
It's not a dream. It's real.
Kevin and I first saw each other on a ship at sea. He was a starving student with this threadbare suit and mismatched shoes. I was travelling with my parents who did not like the way that he kept hanging around. Two hours after I met him, I asked him to marry me. And he knew I was serious. I don't think that he has ever recovered from that day.
Well, what do you think, Mister Worf?
Good tea. Nice house.
Why did you leave the Earth and come to a brand new planet when you did?
You mean at our age. Well, we thought it might make us fall in love all over again. It worked.
Must have been terrible when the colony was fighting for its life.
Yes, it was. Fires lit the sky. There was thunder, this unbelievable thunder. The ground never stopped shaking.
And yet you survived.
We don't know why we survived and the others didn't. I've tried to put some purpose to it, but I can't.
I was wondering, Captain, when you and your ship would be leaving.
I don't have an answer for that. A few hours ago, we encountered a warship. Possibly the one which attacked you. We forced it to leave the system but we were unable to affect it otherwise. It could return.
Kevin, you said it had gone away.
I guess I was wrong. Don't worry. It didn't hurt us before, it won't hurt us now.
Do you know that for a fact, Kevin?
No, but I don't enjoy seeing my wife frightened. We've told you time and time again, we don't know why we were spared.
But there had to be some reason. In some way, you were different from the other colonists. Your geographical location, your philosophical beliefs, the colour of your eyes. In some way you were set apart from them.
There was a difference. I'm a man of special conscience. While the others were doing what they could, I chose not to fight.
Well that is your protected right.
But I can assure you the attacking ship had no way of realising this. I expected to die like all the others. There's no reason for you and your ship to remain, Captain. We can manage without you.
Kevin grieved for the others, Captain, but he did nothing. He is a very gentle man. You must understand that.
What about you, Rishon? Is that how you feel?
I wanted to fight but I stayed with my husband. Well, Captain, thank you again for the replicator. I'd better clean up now.
Before we leave, I ask you one more time to come to the ship. For your own safety.
Captain, I am frightened but I can't leave Rana, even if it means my life.
I don't understand it. I've inhibited almost all the activity of the neocortex and she continues to behave as if she's hearing the music. We're going to have to shield her from all outside stimuli by inducing coma.
I have a positive identification, Commander. It is the vessel that attacked us earlier. It is re-entering the system at high velocity and is approaching Rana Four.
Give us a tight visual, Data. Is it my imagination or does it look a lot meaner this time? Shields up. Weapons ready.
Our friend is back.
I'm not surprised. Mister Worf, open a hailing frequency. Warn the vessel to stay clear of the planet.
Aye, sir, but they are already within firing range.
Shields are down. Captain, they hit us with four hundred gigawatts of particle energy.
Damage?
Superficial, but I'm having trouble reassembling the shields.  Shields down. There is thermal damage to the hull.
The warship is capable of striking us with far more powerful bursts.
They're manoeuvring to come between the Enterprise and Rana Four.
Number One, we have been exemplary in our patience.
Lieutenant Worf, fire phasers on full with a simultaneous spread of torpedoes.
The vessel appears undamaged, sir. Its defences are apparently able to absorb incoming matter and energy.
Commence rapid fire with all weapons on full.
Shields down. Internal damage. Weapon systems control has been lost.
Riker to Sickbay. Medical assistance to the Bridge!
On our way, Commander.
Mister Crusher, move the Enterprise out of range of the attacking vessel.
Aye, sir.
Mister Worf?
The vessel has terminated its pursuit. It is assuming an orbit around Rana Four.
Kevin and Rishon?
We can't help them. But it's my guess they're in no danger.
Number of casualties?
Sixty-six.
Fatalities?
None. We've been able to treat everyone.
Can you help her?
I've done everything I can. I don't understand the nature of this music she says she's hearing, or where it's coming from.
Could it be telepathic?
Yes. But I'm not the expert at determining that.
They're blocking her sensitivity. They're stopping her from seeing the truth.
Who's stopping her?
Kevin and Rishon.
What?
They wanted us to leave Rana and that's exactly what we're doing. Picard to Bridge.
Yes, Captain.
Number One, I want you to maintain this course for another hour
And then turn the Enterprise around and take it back to Rana Four.
We still won't have our shields restored by then.
Take it back, Number One, and this time nothing is going to lure us away.
Sir, sensors indicate no spacecraft in the vicinity of Rana Four. But, Captain
Forget your previous error, Mister Worf. There is no way you could have prevented it.
Captain, the Uxbridge house is coming into transporter range.
Mister Worf, will you accompany me to the Transporter Room? You have the Bridge, Number One.
Captain, I think you should reconsider. The warship has come after us twice. It could come back.
I disagree, Number One. I don't think it knows we're here. I think it believes that it has run us off for good. However, that will all change once I'm back on board.
Sir?
It's protecting Kevin and Rishon. It responds to their wishes. Indirectly or directly, I'm not sure, but that's what I'm going to put to the test.
Celebrating?
What are you doing here? What do you want?
This is the second time that you have shown surprise at my appearance, Kevin. The first time was understandable, but now? Unless it is because you never expected to see me again.
Why do you keep interfering with our lives, Captain?
It is not my intention to interfere. Only to help you and Rishon.
Then please, leave us alone.
I promise you that when I leave this house I will never set foot in it again. But the Enterprise will remain in orbit over the planet.
Why?
To protect you.
That's not necessary. I thought you understood.
It is necessary. You're in great danger. A warship has returned.
Kevin!
He's lying, Rishon.
We have fought a pitched battle with it, and lost. Many of my crew have been injured including a woman who's mind is slowly being destroyed by telepathic manipulation.
No. Please no.
This is a form of intimidation. I have my rights.
Your rights? What about Rishon? Is she in favour of being here left here? Come to the Enterprise. Let me take you where you'll be safe.
No. I can't leave Kevin.
I'm staying. She's safe here with me. in this house.
Why are you safe?. Why is this house a sanctuary? Does it have to do with you? With your refusal to fight? Tell me this. If Rishon were in danger, would you kill to save her life?
No, not for her. Not for anyone. I will not kill.
Please stop hurting him. Captain, leave our house.
It is my sworn duty to protect you. The Enterprise will remain in orbit around Rana Four as long as the two of you are alive.
Number One, an update, please.
Little change, Captain. Our shields are still inoperable. We have partial control of our weapons, and I've doubled the repair crews.
The warship is approaching from high orbit. It is very close three hundred thousand kilometres distant.
How is that possible? Is something wrong with the sensors?
That's no concern, Number One. It's here and it's precisely on schedule.
The vessel has altered its course to a direct intercept with the Enterprise.
Worf, arm phasers and photon torpedoes. Prepare to fire.
Belay those orders, Mister Worf.
The vessel is now within twenty thousand kilometres of the Enterprise and closing.
Let it come, let it come. Activate the main viewer.
Evasive action, sir?
The Enterprise will hold its position, Mister Worf.
Weapons, sir?
On my orders, not before.
The vessel is entering a low orbit around Rana Four. It appears it is preparing to fire at the planet, Captain.
Understood.
My calculations indicate that its target is the house of Kevin and Rishon Uxbridge.
There will be no interference from us, Mister Data.
The house has been obliterated.
Scan for survivors.
There are no survivors.
Mister Worf, prepare a photon torpedo. Fire at the enemy vessel when ready.
Aye, sir.
Number One, what reason does the Enterprise have for remaining at Rana?
The unknown vessel has been destroyed. The Uxbridges have been destroyed. There's no reason for the Enterprise to remain.
Good. Helm, move us into a higher orbit so that we may keep the surface of the planet under surveillance.
Aye, sir. But, Captain, what are we watching for?
Anything. Everything. I'll be in my Ready room if I'm needed. That will be all for now.
Come.
Captain, may I speak with you?
It's my pleasure, Number One.
We've been observing the planet very carefully for three hours. We've seen nothing. I have the feeling you're waiting for something to happen.
Your Captain is acting on an assumption, Will, and I'm not sure what the result will be, or even that my assumption is correct. We found two people alive in a house on a devastated planet. But there was only one survivor of the war on Rana Four.
Why is it we maintain watch on a planet that is now totally dead?
Bridge to Captain Picard. You had better come see this.
Captain. Commander. The house is back. Trees, grass, everything. Happened right in front of us.
Mister Worf, do you see any survivors?
I detect two life forms inside the house. It appears Kevin and Rishon were not destroyed.
Helm, take us within transporter range. We're going to beam them aboard directly onto the Bridge.
But, Captain, will they not protest?
Let them.
My apologies if I interrupted a waltz.
Why have you brought us here against our will?
I want to end the suffering of one of my crewmembers.
I don't understand.
Kevin does. He's the cause. At first I couldn't understand why your house survived the holocaust when the others hadn't. Then it occurred to me. It had been destroyed. That dwelling, where you served me tea, where you danced your waltzes, is a reproduction. Real to the touch but capable of being created, destroyed, and created. All on a whim.
You're joking with us, Captain. Can't you see this is hurting my husband?
Rishon. Hear what he has to say.
More than anything else, you wanted the Enterprise away from Rana, because the house, the plot of land, your very existence, were incongruities that you were not prepared to explain. The warship, another recreation, tried to chase us away twice, and failed. But when I came to your house the second time, I provided you with the only condition that would make the Enterprise leave. Your deaths. You did your best to satisfy that condition.
I'm deeply sorry about the woman. I will help her. But I must know what you intend to do with me afterwards.
You'll be taken to the nearest starbase and held responsible for the attack on the Enterprise, and possibly the deaths of eleven thousand people.
No. He never killed anyone.
The destruction of the planet happened just as I told you.
But you haven't told us the whole story. How it ended. The part about Rishon.
What is he saying?
Rishon, I can touch you. I can hear your voice, I can smell your perfume. In every respect you are a real person with your own mind and beliefs, but you do not exist. You died along with the others, defending the colony. He recreated you, just as he recreated the house.
You are the only living thing that really exists on Rana. And though you look human, you're not.
He's in the turbolift.
Let him go.
Captain, he is dangerous!
So dangerous, Mister Worf, that he could have destroyed us in an instant had he wished. Track him. Alert the crew to keep clear of hm. I want him to understand we mean him no harm
Will he return to the planet?
If he is the creature of conscience I believe him to be, he has someone to help first.
I've taken the music from her mind. She's alright now. She's sleeping. She was beginning to sense who I really was. I've been living as a human for over fifty years but I couldn't hide from her. She has suffered because of my pride and selfishness. It will not happen again.
What happened on Rana Four? The truth this time. All of it.
Very well. For what it's worth. I am a Douwd. An immortal being of disguises and false surroundings. I have lived in this galaxy for many thousands of years although until today, no one has known my true identity. Once, while traveling in human form, I chanced to fall in love with an Earth woman. I put aside my powers and became her husband. Our life was happy and rich. Eventually we came to this planet to live our final years. Now she is dead. She never knew what I really was.
Your colony was attacked by a warship.
Belonging to the Husnock, a species of hideous intelligence who knew only aggression and destruction. I could have destroyed them with a mere thought, but I did not do so.
You had the power to stop them but you didn't?
I refused to for the same reason I refused to stop the Enterprise. I will not kill.
So you let the colonists fight a hopeless battle.
I tried to fool the Husnock as I tried to fool you. It only made them angrier. More cruel.
And then what you most feared, happened. Rishon went to fight with the colonists, and died with them.
How I wish I could have died with her.
But you couldn't. You were left alone.
Yes. I saw her broken body. I went insane. My hatred exploded, and in an instant of grief I destroyed the Husnock.
Why did you try to hide this from all of us? Was it out of guilt for not helping Rishon and the others when they were alive?
No, no, no, no. You don't understand the scope of my crime. I didn't kill just one Husnock, or a hundred, or a thousand. I killed them all. All Husnock everywhere. Are eleven thousand people worth fifty billion? Is the love of a woman worth the destruction of an entire species? This is the sin I tried so hard to keep you from learning now. Why I wanted to chase you from Rana.
We're not qualified to be your judges. We have no law to fit your crime. You're free to return to the planet and to make Rishon live again.
Helm, break orbit. Full impulse.
Captain's log, Stardate 43153.7. We are departing the Rana system for Starbase One Three Three. We leave behind a being of extraordinary power and conscience. I am not certain if he should be praised or condemned. Only that he should be left alone.
Jean-Luc! You delicious man. You were just thinking of me, weren't you?
As a matter of fact
Well think no further, dear heart. She's here!
Yes, indeed.
Oh, serious. You're always so serious.
Lwaxana, as a matter of fact, I am rather busy at the moment.
And you're always busy with something or other. Never the right thing, though. My daughter tells me that we're picking up someone interesting here.
Yes, the leading scientist of Kaelon Two and
Oh, Kaelon Two? I've never heard of that.
Well, Lwaxana, it is something of a rather delicate situation> It's the first real contact with a rather reclusive race, and this is in the nature of an official greeting, so
Diplomacy. I adore diplomacy. Everyone dresses so well.
Mister O'Brien, energise.
Doctor Timicin. I'm Jean-Luc Picard, Captain of The Enterprise. This is Lieutenant Commander La Forge.
I beg your pardon, Captain. This is my first time aboard a Federation starship. Oh yes, they told me. Shaking hands, a form of greeting.
I beg your pardon. Doctor Timicin, allow me to present Lwaxana Troi of Betazed. She's also a guest on board, and
And Daughter of The Fifth House, Holder of the Sacred Chalice of Rixx, Heir of the Holy Rings of Betazed, and what are you doing for dinner?
Well, I don't know, really.
Lwaxana, we have quite a bit of work planned.
The man's never been on board a starship before, Jean-Luc. Certainly somebody ought to make him comfortable before you get started.
It seems that Mrs Troi is our acting ambassador of goodwill for today.
You just think of me as your Entertainment Director.
That man is in a lot of trouble.
Captain's Log. Stardate 44805.7. For generations, the people of Kaelon Two have been working to revitalise their dying sun. The Federation has offered to assist in testing what may be a solution to this problem.
Of course, the basic theories of helium fusion enhancement have been discussed for over a century, but there's been no practical method of application until now.
The modifications that you have made to the torpedo's guidance systems are remarkable, Doctor.
Well, we'll see. They still have to be proved. But now at least it's possible. I'd never dared hope for such a perfect match with our own sun.
My only regret is that it took us three years to find a suitable sun after you had first contacted us.
We're not used to dealing with other worlds. We're not used to asking for anything from others. Your offer of help has given us a possible means of survival. It has taken forty years of my life to develop the programming that will control your photon torpedoes. It has been my life. Thank you for this opportunity. My only wish has been to find a way to revive our sun before I die.
Mrs Troi, I must protest your unauthorised presence on the Bridge.
What does that little one do, Mister Woof?
Please, Madame! That is a torpedo launch initiator, and, it is Worf, Madame, not Woof.
Oh. Ah, there you are, dear. Where've you been? I've been waiting for you.
So nice to see you again so soon.
Mrs Troi.
Mother, what did you want?
What?
You were waiting for me.
Oh yes, dear, of course I was. You really must let me do something to relieve the tedium of all this work, work, work.
I'm afraid I'm expected in Engineering. I'm really terribly sorry.
Mrs Troi, I have to ask you to clear the Bridge, please.
I don't see why. There are lots of other people here.
Mother. Please.
Well, don't you worry. We'll just have our little chat later.
I'd never have thought her old enough to be your mother. She is so vibrant.
If you look at the next simulation you'll see that we need the temperature to stabilise at two hundred twenty million before there's a secondary or tertiary reaction.
Enough is enough. Rescue is at hand. Doctor Timicin, would you clear all this mess from the table, please?
This mess, Mrs Troi
Now, now, now, you boys have been shut up in here for hours. Now, if you don't eat something, you're going to get sick, and who's that going to help? I've made some perfectly marvellous Mantickian pate. Mister Homn will lay it out for us. Mister Homn is my valet. He doesn't say much.
How can he?
It is true that the intellectual efficiency of high order beings does diminish proportionately with the deprivation of nutritious fuel or
All right, all right. Don't you start.
Mrs Troi, you're a wise woman. I'm sure we could use a respite.
These two call me Mrs Troi. You call me Lwaxana. Mister Homn? Spread it.
So, knowing that my daughter's starship would be passing fairly close to Betazed again, I manoeuvred a ride and here I am. Deck eight.
I also have a grown daughter. She has a small son of her own.
Then you're married.
My wife died quite some years ago.
You know, one thing I don't understand. If your people have known for generations that their sun is dying, why not simply evacuate the planet?
It is our home. It defines who we are as a people. If Kaelon Two ceases to exist, so do we.
Then you definitely should fix it.
With the Federation's help, I hope we will.
And the Federation will be pleased to offer whatever help it can.
Would you come in for a nightcap?
That's extremely kind of you, but
My valet sleeps elsewhere.
You are delightful. You make me laugh. I mean, I don't mean your invitation makes me laugh. I mean I took it quite seriously. I mean
Just say yes. I'll make you laugh some more.
I wish I could. But I must say no. Goodnight, Lwaxana.
Captain's log, stardate 44807.5. The Enterprise has arrived at the Praxillus system, where we will conduct Doctor Timicin's helium ignition test.
Mother, how much
Little one, why do you refuse to use telepathy even when we are alone?
We're not alone, Mother. Now how much longer is this going to take? You've been selecting for twenty minutes.
I am a woman dressing for a man. Something you might try now and then, dear. I wonder if Timicin likes green.
That's not very telepathic of you.
Oh, I tried telepathy on him. He's the wrong species. Right species for everything else, though. You might try that once in a while, too.
You know, you're not just incorrigible, you're insatiable.
I have completed long range scans. There are no other life forms are present in this system.
Spacecraft?
None within sensor range.
Picard to Engineering.
Mister La Forge, the system is clear.
Final pre-launch diagnostic, level five.
All systems verified.
We're ready here when you are, Captain.
Very well. Mister Worf?
Photon torpedoes armed and targeted.
Fire in sequence.
First volley released.
Tracking torpedoes. Entry programme confirmed.
Second volley released.
Torpedoes now entering the stellar core.
Their shields are holding. Guidance systems normal.
Ignition sequence, six seconds
Five seconds. Four.
Three seconds. Now. Shock wave patterns within predicted range. Seventeen hundred percent rise in gamma radiation levels. Helium fusion rate increasing.
What about heat and pressure levels?
Steady so far. Density at eleven hundred grams per cubic centimetre. Temperature approaching sixty million degrees Kelvin.
We want it to stabilise at two hundred and twenty million.
Pressure wave harmonics dispersing. Temperature in target zone increasing to eighty one million degrees, sir.
Still rising.
Temperature at ninety million degrees Kelvin. And now one hundred ten million. Looking good. One hundred thirty seven.
Radiation and pressure levels still stable.
Temperature is one hundred and seventy million degrees Kelvin.
One ninety. And now two hundred million.
It's happening.
Two oh seven and rising. Two nineteen. And twenty. Two twenty. And holding. Looks like congratulations may be in order.
Mister Data?
Turbulence patterns are within predicted parameters.
Two twenty two.
Temperature is rising in the core again, Captain. Two hundred and thirty million degrees Kelvin.
Still rising, Captain.
Two fifty one.
Rate exceeding critical level. Core density is becoming unstable.
Let's get the hell out of here.
Ensign, warp two now!
Sorry.
Captain Picard?
Doctor?
Permit me to express my appreciation to you and your crew. I am most grateful. Most grateful.
Ensign, lay in a course for Kaelon Two. Warp factor five.
Aye, sir.
I'm so sorry, Timicin. I had one of those named after me once. Brilliant young astronomer from Rigel Four. Of course, I sparkled a bit myself in those days. You see, that's called fishing for a compliment. You're supposed to tell me I still sparkle. I'm sorry, I'm not helping, am I?
You're very kind. I'm just not adequate company right now.
Oh, that's all right, I can make enough conversation for both of us. I'll leave you alone.
No. Please stay. I wanted to tell you how much I wish we had met years ago.
What difference do a few years make?
Unfortunately, a great deal. You see, Lwaxana, I'm on my way home now to die.
Captain's log, stardate 44812.6. We have returned to Kaelon Two, and established contact with Science Minister B'tardat.
The experiment achieved a stable core temperature for a short time, Minister. That's a significant step forward.
We've been studying the sensor logs and the torpedo telemetry to determine if there was any malfunction. If there was, and we are able to isolate the problem, another test might be successful. In the meantime, all of our facilities would be made available to Doctor Timicin.
B'TARDAT:A most thoughtful and generous offer, but Timicin has obligations at home. And it would take us some time to select a replacement.
We would be more than willing to extend our visit, sir.
B'TARDAT:That will not be necessary. We'll contact you as soon as we're ready. We expect Timicin to return home as soon as possible. And again, gentlemen, many thanks.
Come.
Are you aware these people you are so graciously helping are murderers?
I beg your pardon?
Well the next thing to it. When a person on this benighted little planet reaches the age of sixty, which Timicin is about to do, they're expected to simply kill themselves. Did you know that?
Mister Data?
The people of Kaelon Two are isolationists, almost to the point of being xenophobes. Regrettably, we know very little about their customs.
Well, I know. Timicin himself just told me. He is supposed to go down there, to his loving friends, be wined, dined, honoured for his achievements and then kill himself. It's a barbaric ritual. The Resolution, it's called. Obviously, you can't let him go, Jean-Luc.
I'm afraid I have no choice.
I don't think you've been listening to me. The man is supposed to kill himself. You don't just let that happen. You don't just turn your back. What's the matter with you!
Lwaxana, I'm sorry, but whatever my personal feelings, I have no jurisdiction here. I simply cannot interfere.
But you have to. In a situation like this, you absolutely have to interfere. You've got to go down there and talk to those people, Jean Luc. Open their eyes, educate them.
The Prime Directive forbids us to interfere with the social order of any planet.
Well, that's your Prime Directive, not mine!
Computer, locate Counsellor Troi.
What do you mean, I can't go down there? Are you telling me that I'm a prisoner on this ship?
Mother? What's going on? What are you doing?
O'BRIEN:I'm sorry, Counsellor, I'm not sure what to do here.
Well, I am sure! I am a Betazoid ambassador. I'm a Daughter of the Fifth House, and those people are going to answer to me! So you just energise this damned thing and get me down there!
He can't, Mother. He has his orders.
His orders don't apply to me.
No, they apply to him.
Don't you try your professional patronising on me, young lady. They expect Timicin to die, don't you realise that? Just because he's sixty! What's sixty? It's nothing.
O'BRIEN:I'll go check the pattern buffers.
Come on, Mother, let's sit down.
I'm sorry, little one. I don't know what's wrong with me. I'm sorry.
There's no need to be.
But I'm crying. I don't cry.
You cried when father died.
You remember that?
Of course I remember. We both cried.
But this isn't the same. Is it?
What do you think?
I don't know. I just can't accept that fate will allow me to meet him like this and then take him away. I mean, he's not ill. He hasn't had a tragic accident. He's just going to die, and for no good reason. Because his society has decided that he's too old, so they just dispose of him as though his life no longer had value or meaning. You can't possibly understand at your age, but at mine, sometimes you feel tired and afraid.
You're feeling very vulnerable. Very mortal, if I may say so. I know you, Mother, and believe me, you will never be one of those who dies before they die.
Come in.
I've been studying the preliminary reports of the test. I don't understand where I went wrong. I thought I'd taken into account all of the variables. Deep convection patterns, proton reactions, neutrino count.
I will say it again. You are a kind woman.
No, no, I'm a hateful woman. I hate what you're going to do, and I hate you for doing it.
It is the way of my world. I wish you could accept that.
I never will. Never.
How long have you been sitting there?
I don't know. A minute. An hour.
Lwaxana
Do you want anything? Some tea?
I want to explain. I want very much for you to understand. Fifteen or twenty centuries ago, we had no Resolution. We had no such concern for our elders. As people aged, their health failed, they became invalids. Those whose families could no longer care for them were put away in deathwatch facilities, where they waited in loneliness for the end to come, sometimes for years. They had meant something, and they were forced to live beyond that, into a time of meaning nothing, of knowing they could now only be the beneficiaries of younger people's patience. We are no longer that cruel, Lwaxana.
No, no, you're not cruel to them. You just kill them.
The Resolution is a celebration of life. It allows us to end our lives with dignity.
A celebration of life. It sounds very noble, very caring. What you're really saying is you got rid of the problem by getting rid of the people.
It may sound that way, but it is a time of transition. One generation passing on the responsibilities of life to the next.
What about the responsibility of caring of the elderly?
That would place a dreadful burden on the children.
We raise them, we care for them, we suffer for them. We keep them from harm their whole lives. Eventually, it's their turn to take care of us.
No parent should expect to be paid back for the love they've given their children.
Well why the hell not?  Oskoids.
What's that?
Oskoids. A Betazed delicacy.
Looks very interesting.
You should have tried it while you were still alive. No reason to bother now. Why sixty? Why not sixty two, or fifty eight?
A reasonable age had to be set.
But it's not reasonable. Certainly not in your case. You're as vital and healthy a man as I've ever known.
That is why I wish to say goodbye to my family and colleagues while I am this way, in complete command of my faculties, knowing they will always remember me as a strong and vigorous man.
But it makes no sense. Some of your people could still be active at seventy or eighty, and others might be seriously ill at fifty. How cruel of you to make them wait so long to commit suicide.
Setting a standard age for the Resolution makes it uniform for everybody. To ask individual families to decide when their elders are to die, that would be heartless.
I agree. Why not let everybody die when they die.
Lwaxana.
You have a grandson, you said.
Yes, almost seven.
Well, wouldn't it be better for him to know his grandfather? Not some vague memory of someone who once loved him, but a real living person who does love him. Don't you really think that would be better?
I attended the Resolution of my parents when it was their time. It was beautiful. Lwaxana, this is a custom I've known and accepted all my life.
The women of Betazed used to wear these enormous wigs with large holes in the cenre for tiny caged animals.
Yes.
First, it was a fashion. Then it went on long enough to become a custom, a tradition. But it was uncomfortable for the woman and cruel to the animal. So then one day, one very formidable woman finally said so, refused ever to wear another of those wigs. fairly soon the custom stopped. She had the courage to stand up and fight for change.
She must have been a lot like you.
Timicin, there is no one more qualified, more experienced, or more likely to save their planet than you. And they would have you kill yourself.
Younger scientists will take my place. My work, the work will continue.
Your planet has what, thirty, forty years left? What if your scientists can't find the answer without you? What then? What chance do you think your grandson has of reaching the age of sixty?
Enough, please. It is my time, Lwaxana, and that is the way it is.
If that's the way it is, I don't know why anyone's bothering to try to save your world at all. If its time has come, let it die. Where's the difference, Timicin? Where?
Convection boundary uncoupling. The reaction caused gas turbulence of a totally unexpected magnitude. Why?
There was a evidence of a delayed surface shock.
No, I'd anticipated that. I thought I'd anticipated all possible variables, but stars, they're like living entities in a way. Quite unpredictable. You know, I wouldn't be at all surprised if this were the result of. Look here. Forty two seconds into the test, there is a sudden rise in the level of hydrogen alpha emissions. And here, here's another. I'm right, aren't I? There had to be neutron migration within the star's inner core as the reaction grew.
Perhaps, Doctor, but there is no known method for controlling a neutron migration.
Yes, yes, but theoretically it is possible. Using these test results, we could construct a new computer model of the energy dynamics of a star that can test a new detonation programme. I'm certain it can be accomplished. Certain. It's just a matter of time. A matter of time.
Come. Timicin. Time for you to leave us, then?
Captain, I have come to officially request asylum aboard The Enterprise.
B'TARDAT:Timicin, I cannot believe this. Why asylum? Asylum from what?
I turn sixty in four days, Minister.
B'TARDAT:Yes, and your family and colleagues are already gathering for your Resolution.
I believe that it is time for us to re-examine, as a people, the wisdom of The Resolution.
B'TARDAT:Are they forcing you into this? Are you being coerced?
Influenced, perhaps. Coerced, no.
Our only influence, Minister, is by example. Timicin's decision is his own free will, I assure you.
B'TARDAT:I cannot believe that a man of Timicin's stature would freely choose to reject his own culture.
No one on Kaelon Two understands this project as I do. There are new theories that would take others a decade to test and confirm. With my guidance, it can be done in half that time. I must finish my work.
B'TARDAT:Others started your work, others will finish it. It's always been this way. It always will.
Captain, scanners indicate two Kaelon warships rising on an intercept course.
Acknowledged, Commander. Minister, we're here in friendship, hoping to provide assistance.
B'TARDAT:You have helped quite enough, Captain. I suggest you return Timicin and depart. If you attempt to leave orbit with Timicin on board, our ships have been ordered to open fire.
B'tardat, there's no purpose at all in letting this become
It shouldn't have happened. I've handled this poorly.
You acted in good conscience, Doctor. I don't see what else you could have done.
I could have let well enough alone. I could have returned home. What do you think, Captain? Have I done the right thing?
I'm afraid you're the only one who can answer that.
Lwaxana would have me lead a revolt. I'm only a scientist. I wish I had her strength. She is a woman of extraordinary conviction, isn't she?
Isn't she.
Any communication, Number One?
No, sir. We have an open channel.
The warships are taking a standard attack posture. Staggered approach vectors, within weapons range.
Shields up. Red alert.
Captain.
Doctor, I suggest that you return to your quarters.
I don't want there to be any bloodshed because of my decision.
They will be doing everything they can to avoid it. I think we should get out of their way now.
Yes. Yes, of course. I understand.
Mister Worf, ascertain their offensive potential.
Aye, sir.
We must transmit the new analysis of the neutron migration immediately. If I can make them see the direction I've taken
We've already tried.
They refuse to accept further reports from you, Doctor.
They have to accept them. If I can re-establish computer interface with the science ministry.
They've disengaged the link-up, Doctor.
Why don't they answer? Even if I find the solution, you will not accept it! Because I do not terminate my life, they terminate my work. Alive, I am a greater threat to my world than a dying sun.
But Jean-Luc will find a way to settle this. He always does.
No, my decision will only lead to more distrust of other worlds. Nothing will change.
Now don't be foolish.
I am not being foolish! Lwaxana, I want to live because I see in you how much I have to live for. You make me realise that my life still has value. I can be an example to my people. I can finish my work. But discovering these new desires and not being able to do anything about them, not being able to finish my work, not being able to reach my people.
You have made a statement about the sanctity of life, and it will be heard, Timicin.
Who will hear it from light years away? Where will I go now, Lwaxana? I'm a man without a world. I can't go home.
Timicin.
Bridge to Doctor Timicin. You have a visitor coming aboard.
B'Tardat?
No, sir. It's your daughter.
Dara.
Father.
This is Lwaxana Troi. She has been a host and a friend.
I've been looking forward to meeting you, Dara.
Whatever you have to say to me, can be said in front of her.
I see. Father, come home. This is wrong.
Dara, if I could show you the work I have begun. There's still so much for me to do.
There's nothing for me to look at. It is irrelevant.
Your father's work may save your world, my dear. I would hardly consider that irrelevant.
All I'm concerned with now is you, not your work. Your work is over. It is your time to rest.
Perhaps you will feel differently as you get a little older, say approaching sixty.
My father taught me to cherish The Resolution. I don't know how you have poisoned him to reject it.
It's an obscene ritual.
How dare you. How dare you criticize my way of life, my beliefs.
Please. Please, Dara. Please.
Where will you go?
I don't know.
And where will you die? I cannot bear the thought of you being laid to rest on some other world. That you will not lie beside my mother. That I will not be able to lie beside you when my Resolution comes. I'm sorry. I don't know how you can go on with your life knowing that each day you live is an insult to everything we believe in. Father, I love you. But I am ashamed.
I would like to be alone now, please.
I am suddenly suddenly not sure of myself. It's a feeling I'm not at all used to. I don't think I like it very much, little one.
Not sure of yourself?
My life has been full. Now and then, perhaps it's overflowed a little, but I enjoy living. And now I am asking myself is it possible I was wrong to encourage Timicin to choose life?
You were honest with him, Mother. You had to be.
Maybe I want him to live just to keep me company.
Of course you do. But you didn't do this for yourself, you did it for him.
Did I? Then look what I've done to him. He's like a man who's lost his faith. I never considered how deeply ingrained this Resolution liturgy is.
Ritual provides a structure in society, good rituals and bad rituals alike.
Well, this is a bad one.
Your point of view.
It should be the point of view of any reasonably intelligent middle-aged person. Unfortunately, it is not.
I'll see you later, Mother. Excuse me.
Thank you.
You're going back.
Do you believe I love you? I do, you know. But finally, if that is my only reason to stay alive.
It's not enough.
Almost. Almost but not quite. I can't be that selfish, Lwaxana. I am not the person to lead the revolt.
I do apologise for all the turmoil I've created.
Doctor, I would deeply regret it if you were returning only to ease diplomatic tensions.
It is more. Much more.
Then I wish you and your people well.
When it is time for another test, I will encourage my people to seek your assistance again.
If for any reason you would like to wait a few minutes.
No. We have already said our goodbyes.
Lwaxana?
It is the custom for your loved ones to join you at this Resolution, is it not?
You do not have to do this.
Yes, I do. Permission to disembark, Captain. I promise I won't cause any problems down there.
Permission granted.
We're ready, Mister O'Brien.
Most people on this colony will remember my grandmother as a healer, but her abilities went beyond that. She didn't just relieve pain and fight illness. She knew that wellbeing is more than a healthy body. Her remedies often included words of advice as well as medicinal teas, and often they were just as bitter tasting. I will miss Felisa Howard very much. Her healing, her advice, and most of all, the inspiration she has provided me throughout the years. Rest in peace, Nana.
And so now we commit her body to the ground, earth to earth, ashes to ashes, dust to dust, in sure and certain hope that her memory will be kept alive within us all.
Amen.
That was a beautiful.
Oh, thank you. Deanna, did you notice a strange man at the service? He was in his mid-thirties with longish hair?
No.
He threw a flower on Nana's grave. A camellia. It was her favourite flower. She used to keep them all over the house.
Maybe he was a friend or one of her patients.
It was a very personal gesture, and he gave me a remarkable look. Well, I guess I should be going back to the house. There are some things I need to do. It's only a few minutes from here. Would you mind coming along?
I'd love to.
Thanks.
How long do you plan on staying?
A few more hours. Why?
Well, as you know, Caldos is one of the first terraforming projects of the Federation. Our weather controls and fusion systems are nearly a century old. I wouldn't mind having a starship Engineer take a look at them. Perhaps give us a few upgrades. Maybe in exchange for a tour of the colony and a home-cooked meal?
Well, we are due at Starbase six two one tomorrow morning, but we could delay for a few days. Yes, I'm sure we could find the time.
Excellent.
I would enjoy that tour. Caldos Colony is a most impressive accomplishment. I actually feel as if I'm in the Scottish Highlands.
That was the intent. The cornerstone of every building in town was brought from Edinburgh, Glasgow, Aberdeen. The founders wanted everyone to feel they had a piece of the real thing here. They didn't want to just imitate Scotland, they wanted to recreate it.
Tell me, Governor, I'm curious. You're obviously not Scots yourself. What was it that drew you here?
Something about the culture, the heritage. When I was a boy, my family visited Glamis Castle in Scotland. As I looked out across the highlands, I felt as if I had come home.
Your grandmother had remarkable green eyes.
Every woman in the Howard family has had green eyes, except for my mother and me.
How well do you remember your mother?
Very well. I loved her very much. I can remember her face smiling down at me, and I can remember the sound of her voice and her scent. But mostly I remember Nana, who raised me after my mother died.
That's beautiful.
It's a family heirloom. It's been in the Howard clan for generations. It's supposed to symbolise the enduring Howard spirit. Wherever they may go, the shining light to guide them through their fortune. Nana always kept it lit. I remember sitting here listening to ghost stories with only the candle burning.
You should take it with you.
I think I will.
I'm going to head back to the ship.
You don't have to leave.
I just thought you'd like some time alone. I'll see you later.
Thanks.
Who's there?
What the hell are you doing? Get out of my house.
I wouldna be so high and mighty with me, Beverly Howard Crusher. I've spent more time here in the past five years than ye have in the past twenty.
How do you know who I am?
I'm Ned Quint. I took care of your grandmother's house and her affairs.
Nana never mentioned you.
There's a lot of things she didna talk about. Let me get rid of that candle.
Why?
That candle has brought nothing but misery and bad luck to your grandmother.
Look, Mister Quint, I don't know what your relationship was with my grandmother, but this is my house now and these are my things.
That candle has been a curse on your family for generations. If ye have a lick of sense, you'll listen to me right now and do away with it. Now give it to me.
This is a family heirloom and I intend to keep it. Now would you please get out of my house. Now!
Howard women. Always the same stubborn fools. I wash my hands of it now. You stay on in this house and you keep that damned candle. I'll not be responsible for what happens.
Get out.
The colony's aqueduct system is functioning normally, as are the communication relays.
We've been having a few tremors over the past couple of months. Could you check the seismic stabilisers?
Certainly.
You can't imagine what it's like trying to enjoy afternoon tea while the earth is shaking.
Governor, did you know you had a power fluctuation in your weather control system?
No. Our weather control's been working perfectly for the last twenty two years.
I can't isolate the exact source, but the fluctuation seems to be originating from one of the substations that regulates atmospheric humidity for the colony.
Is this going to be a problem?
No, not yet, but power distribution patterns are already off by five percent.
I suggest we analyse the planet's weather patterns to see if they have been affected. I am reading unusually high humidity across the entire southern desert region and there is increasing cloud activity above the northern coastal area. Possibly the formation of a storm system.
A storm? It's the middle of summer. We don't have rain at this time of year.
Data, let's see if we can correct this. I'll check out the colony's climatic flow array.
I will run a diagnostic on the thermal regulators.
Don't worry, Governor. We'll keep you dry.
I certainly hope so. There's a caber toss scheduled for tomorrow afternoon. I'd hate to see it spoiled by an unexpected downpour.
You wouldn't believe what I've been reading about in my grandmother's journals. You know she had a lover? Can you believe that? Nana was a hundred years old.
It would seem the Howard women have exceptionally vigorous libidos.
I certainly hope so. After all, I hope I can find a handsome young man in his thirties when I pass the century mark.
Thirties?
Yes. According to these journals, his name is Ronin and he's thirty four years old. They met just after my great-grandmother's death. And I think I saw him at the funeral. A handsome young man tossed a camellia onto her grave. But the strange thing is, she never mentioned him in her letters. Never once. And yet it appears they spent almost all their time together. It's as if she led an entire life that I knew nothing about.
Well it looks like we're going to be on Caldos for a few days more. This will be a good opportunity to get your grandmother's affairs in order.
Thank you.
Thirties?
Beverly.
You dreamt you were in bed with someone?
Not exactly. I was in bed but there wasn't another person in my dream. It was more like a presence.
You said you felt a touch.
A pair of hands. They were moving across my skin.
Like a caress?
Yes. And there was a voice, a man. He whispered my name. It was as if I knew him, or more like he knew me. He knew exactly how I liked to be touched. It was the most physical dream I've ever had. The sensations were very real and extremely arousing.
Frankly, I'm envious.
I did fall asleep reading a particularly erotic chapter in my grandmother's journal. She wrote very detailed descriptions of her experiences with Ronin.
Well, that's bound to cause a dream or two. So, shall we start going over the personnel reports?
You know, I think he had a ring on one of his hands when he touched my shoulder, my neck. I wonder if I'll have another dream tonight.
I'd read two chapters.
You probably want to be alone. I'll leave.
No, Ned, it's okay. Look, I'm sorry we got off to a bad start yesterday. I've been reading my grandmother's journals and I know how much you meant to her.
Aye, she was a grand lady. You'll not see many more like her. You have your grandmother's fire, that's for sure.
Ned, you're welcome to stay at the house after I've gone. I need someone to take care of the place.
That's verra kind of you, lass, but I'll ne'er set foot in that house again. And I recommend that you dinna, either.
Why?
Like I tried to tell your grandmother, the hoose is haunted.
Haunted?
You believe what you want, lass. Just dinna light that candle.
Why not?
It'll bring the ghost. It's his home. Oh, he's out now, wanderin' across the land, angry, angry at being driven out. That's why he's bringing the storms.
Ned, the weather systems control is malfunctioning. The Enterprise is trying to repair it.
Oh, sure. But who do you think is causing the malfunction?
I think your imagination is
Think what you want. See what you want. Just do as I say. Dinna light that candle or dinna go to that hoose, or before you know it, they'll be burying another Howard in this cemetery.
Captain, I am detecting atmospheric turbulence over the colony and large pockets of electrical activity.
On screen.
It is growing in intensity, sir.
That's one hell of a thunderstorm.
Bridge to Engineering. Mister Data, we're reading
An extremely large storm system over the Caldos colony.
I thought that the weather control malfunction was not severe.
It began as a minor power fluctuation, sir, but the effect has spread throughout the control grid. It has caused an unusual concentration of cumulonimbus activity above the colony.
Captain, I suggest we set up a power transfer between the Enterprise and the weather substations. Try to give them enough power to stabilise the storm.
Make it so.
Who's there? Ned? Is that you? Hello? I know somebody's here, so I suggest you
All right now, that's it. If you don't show yourself right now I am calling the Enterprise and there will be ten security guards here within thirty seconds.
Beverly. Beverly, I've come back for you
Who are you?
Don't you remember? I came to you last night while you were asleep.
No, that was a dream. I'm calling the Enterprise.
Now do you remember me?
Yes. What's, what's happening to me? Right now I feel so strange.
I love you, Beverly, just as I loved Felisa before you.
Are you Ronin?
Yes. You saw me at the funeral.
Who are you?
I'm a spirit.
I don't believe in
Ghosts? Nor did I in the beginning. I was born in sixteen forty seven, in Glasgow on Earth.
You're telling me that you're an eight hundred year old ghost?
I found a home with Jessel Howard. She was a pretty lass with a mane of red hair, and eyes like diamonds. I loved her very much. When she died, I stayed with her daughter, and her daughter, and on down through the years, generation after generation.
And now you're here on Caldos, two hundred light years away?
When your family moved out into the galaxy, I moved with them.
I don't believe you.
I believe you are the most beautiful women I have ever known.
What's, what's happening to me?
We're becoming one, Beverly. We're going to be together.
I don't understand. Stop it!
Come in.
Hi, Bev. I just wanted to see if you were going to mok'bara class this morning.
No, I think I'll skip it today. I'm exhausted.
Did you have another dream last night?
Not exactly.
Is anything wrong?
Not at all.
Beverly, if I didn't know any better, I'd say you were seeing someone.
Deanna.
Now I know you're seeing someone.
I'm not seeing anybody. I met someone, that's all.
Well, you obviously have romantic feelings for him. Beverly, when are you going to realise that you can't fool me? Who is it?
All right. I met Ronin.
Ronin? Your grandmother's lover?
He's unlike anyone I've ever met before. I know this sounds crazy, but I have never known anyone who was so
Passionate.
Exactly. I can see why Nana fell in love with him. This sounds very strange, doesn't it?
I admit it's unusual. I'm very happy for you. But I want you to consider something. You and Ronin have both suffered a tremendous loss. Very often, shared traumatic experience can create the illusion of closeness and romance.
Thank you for your concern, but I think I know what I'm doing. Besides, I didn't say I was in love with him. I'm just intrigued.
You know, Captain, I moved to this colony because it was a recreation of Scotland, but I must admit it's getting to be a little too realistic.
What the hell is going on?
There appears to be a condensed suspension of water vapour, approximately one degree Celsius.
Fog.
It just sort of rolled in on us, sir.
There has been a malfunction in the ship's environmental control.
We've traced the problem to the power transfer beam. There's some sort of feedback coming from one of the colony's weather substations.
Another power fluctuation?
Captain, the temperature in Ten Forward has dropped to below freezing and deck thirteen has lost gravity.
Mister Data, disengage the power transfer.
I am unable to terminate the connection, sir. A feedback loop has formed in the transfer beam. I will have to go to the substation and attempt to correct the problem from there.
Make it so.
In the meantime, I think I'll go get my jacket.
I have analysed the control module in the primary weather control grid. It appears the station is experiencing a system wide power failure.
This is impossible. The back up systems should have
Excuse me, sir. You are dismantling the primary power conduit. I must ask you to stop.
No!  Get away from me! You dinna understand. He's trying to kill us all.
He is dead.
From what I can tell, he was trying to shut down the entire weather control system. He was pulling out the primary plasma conduit. That's probably what caused the plasma discharge that killed him.
I knew Ned Quint. He was an honest man. He mostly kept to himself. I don't know why he'd try something like that.
It's going to take us some time to get the system back online. I'd say we need another day at least.
In the meantime, Governor, you should expect the weather problems to continue.
I think you'd better take a look at this.
Data, you said there was a plasma discharge from the console when Quint was killed.
That is correct.
Well, that wasn't what killed him. I'm detecting an anomalous energy residual throughout his body, right down to the cellular level. Whatever it is, it wasn't the result of a plasma discharge.
Anything?
I cannot identify the energy residual. However, it appears to have the same anaphasic signature as the power fluctuations we observed from the weather control system.
Then it's possible that whatever caused the weather malfunctions also killed Quint.
It is possible.
We should scan the colony for any energy readings that match this anaphasic signature.
Governor, with your permission, I'd like to take the body back to the ship to run further tests.
Of course, Doctor.
Ensign, ask Doctor Selar run a biospectral analysis.
Yes, Doctor.
You're not going to run the tests yourself?
No. I have some things I need to attend to.
Ronin, I've got to talk to you. Are you here?
I'm here. Beverly, did you miss me?
Yes. But I must talk to you. There's been an accident.
I know. Quint is dead.
Why did it happen? What was he doing?
Beverly, there's something more important we should talk about.
Ronin, I've got to know. Quint's dead.
Ronin?
Yes. I need you to help me.
Help you?
It's not easy for me to take corporeal form. I can't do it for long. I want you to light the candle.
Quint said you lived in the candle. Is that true?
Yes. If I'm away from it for too long, I begin to weaken. That's why the women in your family have always kept the candle lit.
The candle's on the ship. I'll go get it.
No. I must go with you.
How?
The power transfer beam. I can travel along it.
And when the candle's lit, then what happens?
Then we'll be together, always.
Computer, secure door.
I lit the candle. Where are you?
It's all right. We're together. we're going to be one. I'm going to become part of you, Beverly. Would you like that?
Oh, yes. More than anything.
As it was with your grandmother, and your great-grandmother, and all of the Howard women before them. I'll take care of you. And you will feel love as you've never felt it before.
Beverly, what the hell is this?
I thought it was pretty self-explanatory. I'm leaving Starfleet. Energize.
Belay that order.
Aye, sir.
Beverly, you can't just resign.
I can, and I have. I've decided to stay on Caldos and become a healer like my grandmother. It's a proud Howard tradition and I've decided to uphold it. Energise. I've resigned my commission, so unless you plan on kidnapping me?
Beverly was attracted to Ronin in a very intense and intimate way. I warned her that it was all very sudden but she didn't want to talk about it, so I let her alone. I sensed that she was holding something back, that she wasn't telling me the whole truth.
Do you think this Ronin could be exerting some sort of influence over her? That it's because of him that she's staying?
It's possible. But she may really believe she's in love with him.
This is a rash decision, ill considered. It's not like Beverly at all.
I agree, but she does have the right to make that choice, even if we don't feel it's a good one.
Come.
Captain, Geordi and I have detected an energy residual with the same anaphasic signature as the one we found on Ned Quint's body.
Where?
Approximately seventeen kilometres from the centre of the colony, sir. It is coming from the cemetery.
Data, I want you to go down to the cemetery. See if you can pinpoint the source.
Aye, sir.
In the meantime, I would like to meet with this Ronin.
The energy readings are coming from this direction, but I can't get an exact location. I'll try narrowing the scan field.
The energy readings appear to be originating approximately two metres below the surface. I believe they are concentrated within this burial site.
I'm so glad you're here. I can't imagine what life was like before I met you.
And it will only get better.
Oh, Ronin. I had no idea I could feel this way.
We're nearly merged now. As two candles join to form a single light, so we will flourish as one.
I love you, Beverly.
I love you.
Beverly?
Jean-Luc.
Sorry I startled you. I knocked but there was no answer. The door was open. I hope you don't mind.
What do you want?
Well, I'd hoped to meet your new friend, Ronin.
He's not here.
Well, perhaps I could wait, if you don't mind. I'm really anxious to meet this remarkable young man who swept away not just one, but two of the Howard women.
Jealousy doesn't suit you, Jean-Luc.
Have you changed the colour of your eyes?
I just grew tired of the other colour. Don't you think it suits me?
I think that I preferred your eyes the way they were before. I think I preferred you the way you were before, Beverly.
Well, this is the way I am now. And this is my life. I've made my decision and I'm not going to change my mind, so please leave me alone.
Oh, no, there's something's wrong here. Now, Beverly, this is more than just an obsessive love affair that has got out of hand. Tell me, why is it that no one has seen this Ronin except you?
All right, Captain. Here I am. I believe Beverly asked you to leave her alone.
So, you're Ronin. It's a pleasure to meet you. Where are you from?
Earth. Scotland.
How long have you been on Caldos?
All that matters is that I'm here now, and that Beverly and I plan to be together for the rest our lives.
Data to Picard.
Go ahead, Data.
Captain, we have located the source of the energy residual. It appears to be concentrated within Felisa Howard's coffin.
Captain, we'd like permission to exhume the body.
You can't do that. Leave her alone.
Why not? What are you afraid of?
I'm not afraid of anything. But I cannot allow you to desecrate her grave.
Data, ask Governor Maturin's permission to exhume the body. Picard out.
I won't stand for this. I'll go to the Governor myself.
Go on. I wouldn't be surprised if he doesn't know who you are. He'll probably have the same questions that I do. How did you get here? What ship did you come on?
Jean-Luc, leave him alone.
Why don't you answer my questions? What ship? I'd like to look at the passenger list. Where have you been living here? What's your position? Who are your neighbours?
Come on, Beverly, we've got to get out of here.
Jean-Luc.
Beverly, we must stop the others. They cannot exhume the body.
We can't just leave him. He might die.
You must come. I am your love. I am the one who will take care of you.
I can't just let him die.
Beverly, come with me.
No. No!
I'm sorry, I'm going to stop them.
Come on, come on.
I'm all right. Beverly, go after him. Go to the cemetery.
La Forge to Enterprise. We're ready down here.
Aye, sir.
I am reading definite signs of anaphasic energy in her body. It appears to extend to the cellular level.
That's impossible. She wasn't anywhere near the weather station when Quint was killed. She died of natural causes.
I suggest we run a deep tissue scan to look for any signs of
No! Ronin, stop this. Stop this, please.
Beverly, it's all right. Have trust in me.
You're not Nana. Nana's dead. Leave her alone!
Beverly! Forgive me. These men were trying to stop us from being together. Once they're gone, everything will be right.
No, it won't. You've been infusing me with the same sort of anaphasic energy that killed Quint.
He was trying to destroy me. I had to defend myself. My love. I could never harm you. I am here to protect you.
No, you're not. There's no such thing as a ghost. You are some sort of anaphasic lifeform. Anaphasic energy is extremely unstable. It needs an organic host in order to maintain molecular cohesion or else you'll die. Isn't that right?
Beverly.
I also scanned the candle. The flame is plasma based. You were using it as a receptacle for yourself in order to get to me, in order to merge with me. You have been using me, Nana, my entire family for centuries.
And I loved all of them! And they loved me. Give me the candle, Beverly.
No. No.
Put it down, or I will kill him. Set it down and walk away.
No!
Crusher to Riker. Will, close off all the plasma conduits in the weather control system. I'll explain later.
Understood.
You've nowhere left to go.
Yes, I do.
Keep away from me.
Beverly. I love you. Beverly.
Captain's log, supplemental. Commander La Forge and Mister Data have recovered from their exposure to the anaphasic energy, but I'm afraid Doctor Crusher's recovery will be of a more personal nature.
Somehow, he realised that one of my ancestors had a biochemistry that was compatible with his energy matrix. I imagine that he took human form and seduced her like he did me. I was about to be initiated into a very unusual relationship. You might call it a family tradition. But there's a part of me that's a little sad.
How so?
I re-read the entries in my grandmother's journals. Whatever else he might have done, he made her very happy.
Work crews were down here installing seismic regulators when they found some remarkable artefacts.
And it's been determined that they date back to the late nineteenth century?
Yes.
The bifocal vision aid is typical of the era. The weapon is a forty five calibre double-action cavalry pistol invented by Colt Firearms in 1873.
Here, look inside the watch.
What makes you think that extraterrestrials are related to these discoveries.
The crew was having a problem with the regulators. Something inside the cavern was interfering with the phase conditioners. It turned out to be the cavern itself.
The composition of the exposed rock face has been altered by exposure to triolic waves.
Which you're not going to find on Earth in either the nineteenth or twenty fourth century.
Triolic waves?
The by-product of an energy source employed by very few species because of its deleterious effect on living tissue.
We've confirmed that no one has been in or out of this cavern in centuries, so we're left with a five hundred year old mystery.
I'm curious, Doctor. There are far greater experts on Earth to investigate your mystery. Why bring the Enterprise all the way home?
As we continued our excavation, we found one other thing I haven't shown you yet. We've tried to leave everything as we found it.
Captain's log, stardate 45960.2. We have transported the materials discovered in the cavern back to the ship for analysis. I wish I could be as dispassionate about the implications as my second officer.
Interesting. There is a twelve percent decomposition of the bitanium in the neural pathway links. That suggests the alloys are vulnerable to
Data, how can you look inside that, analyse the decomposition without
Emotion, sir?
Yes..
I am simply trying to make an objective assessment.
Data, is this yours?
I believe so, sir.
Could it be Lore?
No, sir. My brother's positronic brain has a type L phase discriminating amplifier. Mine is a type R.
Type R?
Yes, sir.
Can you predict how long this has been in the cavern?
Decomposition strongly indicates that life was terminated approximately five hundred years ago. That would be consistent with the other artefacts we recovered.
Your head is not an artefact.
In relative terms, perhaps not. Nevertheless, it seems clear that my life is to end in the late nineteenth century.
Not if we can help it.
There is no way anyone can prevent it, sir. At some future date, I will be transported back to nineteenth century Earth, where I will die. It has occurred. It will occur.
Well, I can't tell you exactly who the aliens were, but I have found out a few things. The triolicised rock face tells us we're probably dealing with a species with microcentrum cell membranes. Triolic waves wouldn't harm them. It also might mean they're shape shifters of some kind.
So they could have appeared on Earth as humans.
I don't think it's anyone we've run into before. Nothing we found matches up with any known lifeforms. What does match up is a cellular fossil which might have been along just for the ride.
A cellular fossil?
A microscopic ciliated lifeform. Not unlike a thousand other single-celled lifeforms you'd find on any planet surface, except this particular one is LB one zero four four five. And LB one zero four four five is only known to exist on one place. Devidia Two, in the Marrab sector.
Number One, lay in a course.
On my way.
So, do you want to talk about it?
Are you referring to the foreknowledge of my death?
Yeah.
I have no particular desire to discuss the matter. Do you need to talk about it?
Yeah.
Why?
Data, this has got to bother you a little.
On the contrary. I find it rather comforting.
Comforting?
I have often wondered about my own mortality as I have seen others around me age. Until now it has been theoretically possible that I would live an unlimited period of time. And although some might find this attractive, to me it only reinforces the fact that I am artificial.
I never knew how tough this must be for you.
Tough? As in difficult?
Knowing that you would outlive all your friends.
I expected to make new friends.
True.
And then to outlive them as well.
Now that you know that you might not?
It provides a sense of completion to my future. In a way, I am not that different from anyone else. I can now look forward to death.
I never thought of it that way.
One might also conclude that it brings me one step closer to being human. I am mortal.
Picard to Bridge officers. We're approaching the Devidia system. Report to your stations.
I'll see you later. Let's get together for a game of chess or something, okay?
That sounded like a very intense discussion.
Yeah. They found Data's head a mile beneath San Francisco. Been down there about five centuries.
That's why the Enterprise has been sent back to Earth. I didn't realise.
It's something, isn't it? He seems fine about it. Better than I am. Well, I'd better get to Engineering.
Full circle.
I heard about Data.
Yeah.
It's having an unusually traumatic effect on everyone.
Yeah.
If you don't want to talk about it, it's okay.
I'm fine. I'm just
Angry.
I'm not angry. Yeah, I'm angry. Why should I be angry?
Maybe because it reminds us of our own mortality.
I just don't want to believe it.
Have you ever heard Data define friendship?
No.
How did he put it? As I experience certain sensory input patterns, my mental pathways become accustomed to them. The inputs eventually are anticipated and even missed when absent.
So what's the point?
He's used to us, and we're used to him. It's like finding out someone you love has a terminal illness and
Data.
Counsellor. Commander.
Would either of you mind if I made a personal inquiry?
Personal inquiry? No, go right ahead.
I am perceiving an apparent change in the way others behave toward me. For example, people abruptly end conversations when I appear, just as you did when the turbolift doors opened. Is that an accurate observation?
Not at all.
Yes.
Yes.
You're right, Data. And it's not a very nice thing to do.
It's just that our mental pathways have become accustomed to your sensory input patterns.
I understand. I am also fond of you, Commander. And you as well, Counsellor.
We're in orbit.
Any sign of life?
Negative, sir.
Captain, sensors are picking up an unusual temporal disturbance on a small area of the planet's surface. Forty two degrees seven minutes north by eighty eight degrees declination east.
Temporal disturbance?
Put us in a standard orbit above those coordinates.
Spectral analysis shows a high level of triolic waves emanating from the same location.
Any correlation with the readings from Earth?
Affirmative, sir. The magnetic signature is identical to the one found in the cavern.
Would these triolic waves be dangerous to humanoids?
Only with long term exposure, sir. There is no immediate threat.
Take an away team.
Worf. Geordi. Troi. Join me in transporter room three for an away team.
Commander.
Mister Data, I'll need your help to monitor the sensor readings during this investigation.
Captain, may I speak to you alone?
Sir, it is standard procedure that the second officer accompany the away team.
Yes, yes, Mister Data, I am aware of that.
Then I must assume your decision is related to the discovery on Earth of
I think it is reasonable to take precautions.
Captain, there is no rational justification for this course.
Then I'll be irrational.
It is possible, sir, that the events leading to my death will not occur for years, even centuries.
I hope that's true, Mister Data. Nevertheless, this investigation began with your death. I am simply trying to see that it doesn't end that way.
I appreciate your concern, Captain, but, to employ an aphorism, one cannot cheat fate.
Cheat fate? Perhaps we can't, Mister Data. But at least we can give it a try.
The concentration of triolic waves falls off about here. It increases exponentially the closer in we go.
What's the source? Something underground?
Negative, Commander.
What's the explanation?
I don't have one yet. La Forge to Enterprise.
Go ahead.
Data, run a spectral field correlation for me. Let's find out if these triolic readings are in any way related
To the temporal distortions.
Acknowledged.
Deanna?
There's life here. A child. An old woman. Dozens more. Hundreds. Terrified.
Terrified?
My God, Will. They're human.
Whatever they are, Troi's convinced they're human. They may be trapped somehow. We're not sure.
Captain, the results of my temporal analysis may be pertinent.
Go ahead.
Geordi, it indicates a synchronic distortion in the areas emanating
Triolic waves.
That explains a few things. How much, Data?
A positive displacement of point zero zero four percent.
Well, whatever or whoever is there, we're out of phase with it, but we're only talking by a fraction of a second.
A fraction of a second would make them invisible?
A millisecond, a year, it wouldn't make any difference. If what we're reading is true, then we're occupying the same space but in a different time.
How do we compensate?
Commander, we might be able to
Manipulate the synchronic distortion.
Maybe. If we were to create a contained subspace force field.
But to get a point zero zero four variance, we'd need an incredibly sensitive phase discriminator, Data. I don't think we've got one that would come close.
Yes, we do.
It is built into my positronic decompiler. It will be necessary for me to join the away team, sir.
Proceed, Mister Data.
Mister Data.
Sir.
Let me give you a hand with that, Data.
Once I have adjusted the forcefield, I will no longer be visible, Commander. I have taken steps, however, to ensure that you will still be able to hear me. If you would assist me in a test of the comm. system. My voice will be transmitted on a delay correlated to the phase adjustment. That should allow me to maintain verbal contact.
Will we be able to talk to you?
No, sir. That will not be possible.
The subspace field has been established. You're set to go, Data.
Adjusting the synchronic distortion. Point zero zero one. Point zero zero two.  Point zero zero three. Point zero zero four.
I have made visual contact. There are lifeforms here.
They're either unaware of me or choosing to ignore me. I am moving approximately ten metres north of my starting position to observe more closely.
They range from two to three metres in height. Silver grey in colour. They have four limbs. No eyes or ears are noticeable. There is a single orifice where a humanoid forehead would ordinarily be. They are reclined against the rock face surrounding an apparatus of some sort approximately one point five metres in height.
It is releasing what appear to be energy fragments, which are then ingested by the entities through the orifice. Perhaps some sort of nourishment.
The upper portion of the apparatus seems to be a holding facility for the energy segments. There are hundreds, perhaps thousands of these fragments inside. I have resumed a northerly direction. There is no evidence yet of humans.
Okay, that's enough Data. Come on back now,
I have encountered
Another lifeform. An ophidian. It seems to be restricted by a forcefield.
Two of the silver-grey entities are approaching it. They have released the forcefield.
I am reading a temporal distortion of massive proportions. The ophidian is cap  time-space continuum.
Caught in the after effect. I am attempting
Data!
Over here.
Commander Riker, report.
We've lost him.
Excuse me. Pardon me. I am searching for two individuals with an ophidian. A snake.
Frenchman.
Could you help out a Forty Niner? I fell down a shaft. I got blown up in a tunnel.
That is unfortunate.
It is most unfortunate. I require large amounts of whiskey as a linament.
I am sorry, but I have no whiskey to give you.
I'll take a dime.
I am sorry, but I have no form of legal tender.
Well, we're in the same boat, huh? Well, this is my street. You'll have to go find one of your own.
I would be happy to do so, but I am presently in need of information.
Stockbrokers are cheap as hell. Don't even bother to ask. Your best handout is from a young fella with his lady. You give him a chance to show her he's generous. Steer clear of sailors. Most likely you'll get a fist across the jaw for your trouble.
Thank you for your advice, but I'm trying to find two individuals with a snake.
A snake? You're an odd fellow, aren't you? But just don't be too particular where you get your funds from.
You are in need of medical attention. I will get a doctor.
No, no, no, it's too late for that.  Could you help out a Forty Niner?
Thanks.
Hey, put it on Gentleman Jim. Knockout in the fifth.
All right.
Sir, I need temporary lodging.
Looks like the missus booted you out in the middle of the night.
I understand the source of your misperception. However, this is not sleepware and I do not have a missus.
Well.
I am a Frenchman.
Oh. Well, everybody's from somewhere. That doesn't matter at this hotel. It's six bits a day or four dollars a week.
I have no money.
Well, now, that matters.
But I am capable of performing significant tasks both mental and physical. Perhaps your hotel would offer me a job.
Geez, I don't know. We're pretty happy with the maid we've got. Cook's decent. Dishwasher's drunk all day, but at least he gets here on time. And there's me. I do everything else. Sorry.  Lady Luck not with ya, tonight, Mister Lane? Poor fella. Hasn't filled a straight in five weeks.
Poker?
Fold.
Me too.
Go to blazes.
A poker face carved in marble.
Excuse me, gentlemen.
What in hell do you want?
I would like to join the game.
Pale face.
I don't like Easterners, personally.
I am a Frenchman.
Ah. Mes parents sont originaires de Bourgonais. Je suis ne a la New Orleans.
Alors, nous sommes presque frères. Je suis heureux de vous connaitre.
Please, sir.
The game is poker. The deal is yours. The ante is four bits.
Family heirloom?
In a manner of speaking. It is a crystalline composite of silicon, beryllium, Carbon seventy, and
Gold.
Gold.
I'll give you three bucks for it.
I accept.
Did you see the looks on their faces? I did everything I could not to laugh.
To whom are you referring?
Frederick La Rouque and Joe Falling Hawk. Those guys are card sharks. Oh sure, they play easy at first not to scare off the marks, but you give them a little time, they'll bleed a man dry. Especially an out-of-towner like yourself..
What was the source of your jocular reaction? What was it you found humorous?
Don't you see? They had you pegged for a sap. The clothes you got on, the way you talk, it's like you were born yesterday. You sure fooled them, though.
It was not my intention to deceive.
Have it your way. This is the place. Breakfast is six to eight. Checkout's at noon when you're ready to leave.
Thank you.  It has been a pleasure.
It would be advisable to monitor that cough. I have read that there is currently a cholera epidemic in San Francisco.
Never felt better.
Of course. The gratuity. Thank you for your assistance.
A dollar? If there's anything you need. It can get lonely in San Francisco. You might want some company. I can introduce you to Lillian.
I have no need for companionship. However I do require some supplies.
Anything you need. I can get it for you wholesale. I can get it for you less than wholesale if you don't ask me where it came from.
What do you need all this stuff for?
I am an inventor.
No kidding. Well, this stuff's going to take a while. I'll have to go clear cross town. And it's not going to be cheap.
Will this be enough?
More than enough.
You may retain the surplus for yourself.
Keep the change?
Exactly.
Done.
Help out a Forty Niner. Fell down a shaft. Forty Niner. Help me. Help me out.
No. No.
Captain's log, supplemental. Close range sensor analysis has yielded no further trace of Commander Data. Despite the emotional repercussions among my crew, I must move this mission forward.
I'm not willing to accept that he's dead and just leave it at that.
We cannot make Mister Data our priority.
What is more important than Data?
Look at what we have so far. Evidence that these aliens have been travelling back in time to Earth.
What if they're trying to undermine our history for some reason.
Some kind of guerilla war?
We must assume that there is a threat, if not to us then to 19th century Earth. We have to determine what that threat may be. Mister La Forge, we have to find some way to communicate with these life forms.
It's not going to be easy to reproduce what Data did. We can create a contained subspace field, but we'd need an extraordinarily sensitive phase discriminator to get that point zero zero four variance.
Can you build one?
It won't be as good as Data's.
Will it be good enough?
I don't know. I can try. It's going to take some time though.
I don't want anyone else going in alone.
I can probably create a large enough subspace field to encompass everyone. But adjusting the phase inside the field, that's going to be the hard part.
Make it so.
We have to assume one thing, sir. Wherever Data may be, he's doing the same thing we are, which is trying to get to the bottom of this. He may have a better idea about what's going on than we do, so it might be in the best interests of this mission to find him.
Perhaps in the course of this investigation, we will. I hope so.
If we find Commander Data, it may be our fate to die with him in the past. If our remains are in that cavern, they would have turned to dust long ago.
I'm afraid to interrupt.
Captain, you didn't have to come all the way down here. I would've been more than happy to come up to you.
And miss all this? I haven't seen such a complex operation since the Academy lab final in exochemistry.
It's a Tzartak aperitif. It's very, very touchy. The trick is to change the evaporation point of the main ingredient. You want the temperature where the liquid goes to vapour to be a half a degree below the body temperature of the customer. That way, when the liquid touches the tongue, it evaporates, and the flavour is carried entirely by the vapour. A few molecules off, the vapour point crashes, and poof! It's all gone. All of it.
What is it you wanted to see me about?
I hear you're sending an away team down to the surface. Are you going?
Well, now, this is rather unusual for you to be curious about an away mission.
Maybe it's an unusual away mission.
If you have something to say, I'm listening.
Starfleet captains don't usually accompany away teams.
It's general policy.
This time, you have to.
Why?
You just do. Do you remember the first time we met?
Of course.
Don't be so sure. I just mean, if you don't go on this mission,  we'll never meet.
Sorry it took so long, Mister Data.
Apology is not necessary.
Ow.
Are you all right?
I believe I have overexerted myself.
Yeah, I'll say. Did you get it working?
Yes.
Whatever it is.
This is for your trouble.
What are you going to do with the anvil?
I require a low intensity magnetic field core. I believe the iron mass of the anvil will provide that.
What's it going to be when it's finished?
What do you think it is going to be?
If I were to guess, maybe a new kind of motor for one of those horseless carriages.
That is a good guess.
Hot damn. You really think there's money in those things?
Perhaps.
Isn't that what makes America great?
To what are you referring?
Well, a man rides into town in his pajamas, wins a grub stake at a poker table, turns it into a horseless carriage and makes a million bucks. That's America.
I believe I have given you an erroneous impression.
You know, some day my ship's going to come in.
You have a ship?
Oh yeah, and it's full of gold too. I'm just biding my time til it gets here, raising a stake any way I can. I've been a newsie, cut fish at a cannery. Heck, I've even been an oyster pirate.
You have had a considerable spectrum of occupations.
Yeah, well, you can't stay in one place too long. I'm always looking for the angle, you know. Say, maybe you and I could go into business together, selling your horseless carriage and all. You invent them, I sell them. I can sell anybody anything. What do you say?
I believe your plan is a bit premature.
Keep it in mind, though. I better get back. Oh, I forgot. I got you something at the bakery on Third.
Thank you, Jack.
Oh, no, no, no. It's on me, partner.
The eminent scientist Alfred Russell Wallace has revived the theory that Earth is at the centre of the stellar universe. This distinguished natural philosopher has reaffirmed our planet as the only habitable globe in the heavens. A world, furthermore, constructed for the sole benefit of man. He's got a lot of folks excited about the notion.
My dear Mister Clemens, why do I think you're not one of them?
Your suspicions, Madam Guinan, are undoubtedly based upon your keen observational skills. Now, if you'll permit me, I'll continue my character assassination unimpeded.
My dear Mister Clemens, please do. Please do.
According to our best geologic estimate, the Earth is approximately one hundred million years of age. Perhaps it is less, perhaps more.
Perhaps a great deal more.
Indeed. But regardless, it is ancient in the extreme. Now, geology also tells us that man himself has existed for but a microscopic fraction of those years. Curious, isn't it, that the world got by for such a great long while with no humans around to fill up space? I suppose Mister Wallace and his supporters would say that the Earth needed all that time to prepare itself for our illustrious arrival. Why, the oyster alone probably required fifteen million years to get it to come out just right.
But if the Earth is not alone, and there are millions of inhabited planets in the heavens.
Quite my point. Man becomes a trivial creation, does he not? Lost in the vastness of the cosmic prairie, adrift on the deep ocean of time. A single one among countless others.
Someone may argue that a diamond is still a diamond, even if it is one amongst millions. It still shines as brightly.
Someone might say that, dear lady, if someone thought that the human race was akin to a precious jewel. But this increasingly hypothetical someone would not be me.
Good afternoon, sir.
Good afternoon. I would like to speak to Guinan.
And you are?
Data.
Mister Data. Could it be under another name?
No.
I can't seem to find your name on the guest list, sir.
I am a personal friend.
Madam Guinan has discovered many personal friends since the newspaper announcement, but if your name is not on the guest list, there's nothing I can do.
It is urgent that I speak to her.
Sir, unless you leave this house immediately, I will send for the police.
That is an excellent idea. I will wait for them in there.
Sir, please, you can't go in there.
Guinan! Excuse me. I must speak to you immediately.
Forgive me, madam. He just barged right in.
I am sorry for the disruption, but he would not believe me when I told him we were friends.
Do I know you, Mister?
Data. Yes. We were on a ship together.
I do so much travelling. What ship would that be?
The Enterprise.
Is that a clipper ship?
It is a starship.
A starship? What registry would that be?
Of course! Mister Data. Excuse us. We have so much to catch up on. Excuse us. How are you?
What exactly are you?
Android. Artificial life form.
Ah. Did my father send you here? Because if he did, you must go back and tell him I've not done listening
I was not sent by your father. Circumstances demand that I take you into my confidence. I require your assistance.
Sorry.
I am from the twenty fourth century, where you and I serve aboard a starship.
And?
Our ship encountered a species who appears to be threatening 19th century Earth. I investigated, and was inadvertently pulled into their temporal vortex. When I saw your photograph in the newspaper, I assumed you had joined me from the future, from the Enterprise. I knew your species was long-lived, but I did not realise you had visited Earth so long ago.
Eavesdropping is by no means a proper activity for a gentleman. Nonetheless, the deed is done.
Captain's log, stardate 45965.3. An away team has beamed to the surface with a device which may enable them to phase-shift into the alien world.
Okay, Counsellor, right over there.
The triolic waves end right here.
Mister Worf?
Sir.
How soon will you be ready?
We're ready now, Captain. The subspace field is established.
I'd be more comfortable if you'd monitor our progress from the Bridge, Captain.
I have reason to believe that my presence on this mission is imperative.
Imperative?
Yes. Mister Worf, you will report back to the Bridge.
Sir, as Chief of Security, my place is at your side.
The security of the Enterprise is of paramount importance, Mister Worf.
Yes, sir. Worf to Enterprise.
Go ahead.
Beam me up.
Proceed, Mister La Forge.
I've modified this tricorder to interface with the subspace generator. It should allow me to control the phase discrimination, assuming this is going to work at all. I need everyone within the field. Adjusting synchronic distortion. Point zero zero one. Point zero zero two.  Point zero zero three. Point zero zero four.
If we can see them, why they can't see us?
The phase displacement might not bring us far enough into their perceptual range.
These strands appear to be biomagnetic. Variable flux. Possibly organic in origin.
A life form.
No. There is no life here. What I have sensed is more like an imprint. An echo of the last moment of life. Human life. They all died in terror
My God. They're delivering more of them for the others to ingest.
Look at what he's carrying.
One.
Are you trying to fill another inside straight, Worf? Don't say I didn't warn you.
Pah!
I fold.
I will raise you three.
No cards? The best poker face I've ever seen. Dealer takes two. Your three and ten more.
I will see your ten, and raise you twenty.
Data, Have you got a flush or a full house?
It will cost you twenty to make that determination, sir.
Dealer folds.
You two have successfully divided the evening between you.
I suspect conspiracy. Far be it for me to accuse my superior officers.
You're getting harder and harder to bluff, Data. You've learned this game very well.
Yes sir, I believe I have.
Tell you what. I'll bet that I can find any card that you hide in this deck. And furthermore, I will make you help me find it.
Careful, Data.
Your guidance is much valued, Counsellor. However.
Pick a card. Don't let me see it.  Now lose it in the deck. Cut the deck into two even piles.
Okay. Once more time. And again. How many cards?
Eleven.
Take five. Throw them away.
Pick three more. Okay, now pick one of those. Is that your card?
Incredible.
Not at all, Counsellor. You surreptitiously placed the edge of your left thumb against the card. When you divided the deck to reshuffle, you kept that card on top. You thus were able to have me either save or discard, depending on the location of the card, which you followed at each step until we were left with just one. The card I originally chose. Sir, I believe under the circumstances
Picard to Riker.
Captain?
We've received a distress call. We're changing course to intercept.
Captain's log, stardate 44215.2. The Enterprise has bypassed its scheduled archaeological survey of Camus Two in response to a distress call from the Federation freighter Arcos, which has assumed an emergency orbit around Turkana Four, birthplace of our late comrade, Tasha Yar.
We will be entering the Turkana system in eleven minutes, Captain.
Engine status.
Stable. But we have maintained warp factor nine for longer than is recommended, sir.
Subspace message from the Arcos. Their transmitter is failing, sir. Audio only.
Let's hear it.
TAN TSU:Enterprise, this is Tan Tsu, Arcos engineer. Estimate five minutes till warp drive containment breach. Make that three minutes. Thanks for trying, Enterprise.
Ensign, warp nine point three. How much time?
Seven minutes and fifteen seconds will bring us within transporter range, Captain.
Nine point six.
Mister O'Brien, prepare to lock onto the two crewmen.
O'BRIEN:Aye, Captain.
We are now entering the Turkana system, sir.
Slow to impulse.
Visual contact.
Get them out of there, O'Brien.
Status, O'Brien?
O'BRIEN:There's nothing to lock onto, Commander.
I am reading an ion trail characteristic of a freighter escape pod.
Unable to establish contact.
It could have been damaged by the explosion. They may have been able to maintain orbit.
Let's hope they stay clear of the colony.
That is exactly where the ion trail is leading, Commander.
Hail the colony.
I've been trying to, Captain. No response.
They haven't been able to maintain reliable communications since their government fell apart.
The last Federation vessel to make contact was the Potemkin, six years ago. They were warned that anyone transporting down to the colony would be killed.
Number One, ready an away team.
Captain's log, supplemental. We are in orbit above Turkana Four, an Earth colony that severed relations with the Federation nearly fifteen years ago. I am concerned about sending an away team, but if we are to discover the fate of the two missing Federation crewmen, I see no alternative.
The surface settlement appears to be all but destroyed. Sensors show that the colonists now live in structures that extend nearly three kilometres beneath the city.
Have you located the escape pod's landing point, Chief?
O'BRIEN:Yes, sir. Three hundred metres beyond the colony perimeter.
Sir, we can anticipate a violent response to our presence. Perhaps the Doctor should wait here until we signal.
I appreciate your concern. I think it's exaggerated.
The colony is completely lawless. Lieutenant Yar spoke of rape gangs and
Mister Worf, I can handle myself.
She's coming. The Arcos crewmen may require immediate medical assistance. Phasers on maximum stun. Energise.
The dispersion trail continues in this direction. The concentration gradient definitely increases along this vector. The escape pod was apparently moved into the tunnels ahead of us.
Hardly the response we expected.
PASSER-BY:Pardon me.
Maybe things have changed here.
Freeze! Identify yourselves.
We're from the Federation Starship Enterprise. We tracked two of our crewmen to this area. Do you know anything about them?
Possibly.
What do you mean?
They found us.
Proximity detectors. I've seen them used on Manu Three.
Follow me.
The Alliance is holding your men hostage, Commander Riker, not us. You can expect a ransom demand.
The Alliance?
Our good friends. Our good friends are going to be upset when they realise we took their last crate of Telluridan synth-ale.
Maybe I should take this to the authorities.
We are the authorities. The Coalition, our cadre, runs this side of the city. The Alliance controls the other side. Take your choice.
Are you offering to help us?
In return for some consideration. Phasers are in short supply down here. A starship isn't going to miss a few.
That is no better than a ransom demand.
No matter what you give the Alliance, they'll eventually kill your crewmen anyway. With our help, at least there's a chance you'll get your men back alive. All I'm asking for is help in maintaining our defence. We are trying to keep the peace.
Everything we've seen would indicate otherwise.
A prank. The proximity implants prevent either side from doing any serious damage. They warn us when an enemy is approaching.
Then why do you need more phasers?
The Alliance just discovered a large cache of weapons. I'm just trying to make things even, to preserve the peace.
You keep using the word peace. We've heard a different version of life on Turkana Four.
Ancient history. Where did you hear that?
A former crewman was born here.
Where's he now?
She was killed in the line of duty.
That's as good a way to die as any. As I said, ancient history. This is now, and your men are in trouble.
We'll return to the Enterprise and consider your proposal.
A gift for your Captain.
Riker to Enterprise. Energise.
I want everything there is to know about the starship Enterprise.
According to Hayne, the Coalition and the Alliance raid each other for supplies, much of it non-essential.
Why?
A battle exercise.
Their defences apparently prevent deep strikes into each other's territory. Minor skirmishes are all that's left.
Coalition. Alliance. It all sounds so reasonable, but what you've described is the behaviour of urban street thugs. We certainly won't trade weapons for crewmen. How do you suggest we deal with them?
We have to tell them something.
No promises, no denials.
For now, Hayne's Coalition is our only safe access to the colony. We'll keep the door open, see where it leads us.
Captain. Transmission coming in from Turkana Four, on a secure channel.
On screen.
Hello, Enterprise. Commander Riker, would you introduce me to your Captain?
I'm Captain Jean-Luc Picard.
I have someone here you might like to meet. This is Ishara. Ishara Yar.
Tasha was my sister.
There's an old saying, Captain. The enemy of my enemy is my friend. I've decided it's in my best interest to help you get your crewmen back.
With nothing from us in return?
You could be forced into paying my adversary a ransom in weapons. I'll do anything I can to avoid that possibility.
What do you propose?
Ishara will be our liaison.
I know Alliance territory. I can help you with a rescue plan.
One moment.
Mute.
Reactions?
I do not trust him.
She could be a fake. We told him a member of our crew was from the colony.
All Hayne had to do was search through their database had on Starfleet to come up with Tasha's name.
Counsellor?
He's deceiving us, and he's clearly hoping to manipulate us. As for the identity of the young woman, I can't really tell.
Neverthe less, this is an option we cannot neglect. We'll continue on other fronts as they present themselves. For now, let's see what she has to say.
Open.
I have decided to accept your proposal.
Thank you. Good luck.
Welcome to the Enterprise, Ishara. I am Commander Data.
You're not human.
I am an android.
Built for fighting?
On what do you base that assumption?
A cybernetic device serving on a starship.
The Enterprise is not a ship of war. It is a ship of exploration.
The first thing to do is help you map the colony. This is a general grid of the tunnel system. I can fill in the specific details from memory.
My orders are to escort you to the Observation Lounge. Please come with me.
Your sister never spoke of you.
That's not surprising.
It is surprising to me. Tasha and I spent much time together. We had a considerable number of conversations.
Did she talk at all about the colony?
Only to say that she was lucky to have escaped.
It wasn't luck. It was cowardice.
Cowardice is a term that I have never heard applied to Tasha.
Is something wrong?
No. It is just that for a moment, the expression on your face reminded me of her.
It's been fifteen years. I don't even remember what she looked like.
You don't believe I'm Tasha's sister.
We have considered the possibility.
I'm not surprised. You can sample my DNA if you like.
Yes, I will.
Please, sit down.
Thank you.
Perhaps it would help if you gave us some idea of what we're dealing with on Turkana Four. The last information describes a colony in almost complete disarray.
It started falling apart almost thirty years ago. There were dozens of factions. They fought until the city above ground was in ruins.
The Coalition and the Alliance are all that's left?
We were the two strongest factions. When the government couldn't stop the violence, they gave us police powers. The proximity detectors were originally designed by the government to keep us under control.
Apparently, that part of the plan didn't work very well.
No. After a few months, we didn't need the government any more.
Tasha left you in the middle of all that?
She didn't abandon me, if that's what you mean. Tasha asked me to go with her, but I had already joined the Coalition. They were my family. Captain, we don't have a lot of time. Maybe we should get started.
Incoming transmission from the colony, Captain.
On screen.
TAN TSU:Enterprise, I'm being held by Turkana Four Alliance. I've been instructed to say that you have twenty hours to make reparations for Federation intrusion into this colony, or my pilot and I will be killed.
Ask them if we can at least send some medical
Take that threat seriously, Captain. They'll torture them and then they'll kill them. My cadre has never recovered a hostage alive from the Alliance. Your crewmen could be held in any number of places. The Alliance has two main headquarters and thirteen ancillary bases of operation. All underground, all heavily guarded.
Captain, if I could get to the myographic scanner.
What's that?
A sensing device from the escape pod. It monitors the bioelectric signatures of the crew, in the event they get separated from the pod.
I could install a booster on the device that would relay its signals to the Enterprise. Then we could track the men from up here.
Unfortunately, we don't know where the escape pod is.
Level three C, section five four seven. We have our sources.
Access tunnels are here and here.
We could transfer the away team right into this intersection.
Don't underestimate them, Commander. They'll be ready for that. I've seen them use this kind of strategy before. I know it looks isolated and easily accessible, but my guess is they have hundreds of men on the levels above and below just waiting for you to make your move.
We will need a diversion.
Transport a couple of photon grenades into the adjoining chamber. At minimum intensity it wouldn't kill anybody, but it would shake them up a bit.
That won't give us enough time. We need to occupy them long enough for you to install the relay.
Transport me into this corridor. My magnetic implant will set off the defence alarms. They'll think it's a raid by the Coalition.
Too dangerous. We've seen what those tunnels look like. You could easily be cut off from the rest of us. Worf, if we
Commander Riker. I was ordered to assist you in any way possible. That doesn't mean as long as it's safe or convenient. If you had the time, we could come up with another plan, but you don't. Right now, I'm your best option.
She would have to be armed, sir.
I'd like to discuss this with the Captain. Take Ishara down to see Doctor Crusher.
You have Tasha's DNA on file?
The ship's computer does. There's always some differentiation between sonomic chromosomes, but not enough to affect results. It should take me a few hours to run the sonomic comparison.
That wasn't too bad. So, all that's left of my sister is a file in a computer.
Tasha exists in our memories as well.
How did she die?
Lieutenant Yar was killed on Vagra Two by a malevolent entity.
In battle?
No. She was killed as a demonstration of the creature's power, without provocation.
That's not how I intend to die.
The Captain approves. You're with us.
Enterprise, we're in position.
Mister O'Brien, energise.
O'BRIEN:Aye, Captain.
They're at level two.
Tunnel sixteen.
Come on.
Josh, you're with us.
Spread out.
Let's check five.
GUARD 2:Yes, sir.
Check on three.
Checking.
Somebody's here.
Watch your backs.
I'm right behind you.
This way.
Go, go.
Damn!
Geordi, what is taking so long?
There's a lot of damage here. The myographic scanner is operational, but the power source keeps fluctuating.
Can you fix it?
I can probably run a shunt from the convertor.
How long will that take?
Ten minutes?
Do it. O'Brien, lock onto Ishara and get her out of here!
O'BRIEN:There's a transformer substation directly above the chamber she just entered. It's masking her signal.
Stand by. Stay here and cover La Forge.
Commander!
That's an order. Return to the ship as soon as you're finished. I'll signal for transport as soon as I can.
Get us out of here.
O'BRIEN:Energising.
Come.
How is she?
A couple of cracked ribs. She'll be all right.
Doctor Crusher just called me with the results of the DNA comparison. Ishara is Tasha's sister.
After what she did for us down there, that doesn't surprise me one bit.
You took some unnecessary personal risks, Number One.
We lost Tasha on an away team under my command. The thought of the same thing happening to her sister
That's an emotional response, Will. We can't afford it.
Understood, Captain.
Commander. Well done.
I've fused the bone tissue along both fractures. The muscles around the area will be weak for a day or two, but you shouldn't feel any pain.
Thank you, Doctor.
Ishara, I wanted to thank you personally for what you did for us down on the colony. It was more than I expected.
I don't run away when things get tough, like some people. Like my sister did.
Let me tell you about your sister. The first time I saw Tasha Yar, she was making her way through a Carnelian mine field to reach a wounded colonist. Her ship had responded to their distress call, as had mine. When it was all over, I requested that she be assigned to the Enterprise. Her ship's captain owed me a favour. In the months that followed, she never once failed to put the safety of the crew before her own, and she died doing the same. I'm sorry you never knew the woman Tasha became. I think you would have been proud of her. And she of you.
What is this structure?
A main fusion source. There's one next to each of the Alliance headquarters. It powers all of their defensive systems. This chamber is accessed from the level below. Entry points are evenly spaced along this wall every twenty five metres. Data, where was Tasha's post?
Tactical station. Where Lieutenant Worf is now.
Did Tasha have many friends here?
Yes. She was especially close to Commander Riker and Lieutenant Worf. And to myself.
Are you able to have friends?
Yes.
But you don't have feelings, do you?
Not as such. However, even among humans, friendship is sometimes less an emotional response and more a sense of familiarity.
So you can become used to someone?
Exactly. As I experience certain sensory input patterns, my mental pathways become accustomed to them. The inputs eventually are anticipated, and even missed when absent.
Like my sister.
Yes, like your sister.
They've been moved so far underground it's been difficult to pinpoint their signatures. But the men are here, next to one of the Alliance headquarters. That's about two kilometres of solid granite above their heads.
So much for the transporter.
Not necessarily. We could use the ship's phasers to cut a shaft through the bedrock to this storage tunnel here. With a clear path through the rock, we'd be able to transport through the tunnel. That would put us close enough to get to the crewmen. But I'll need two hours to refit the ship's phasers for drilling.
It's a real maze down there.
I spent a lot of time in that section before they took it over. There are blind tunnels and dead ends that don't even show up on this map.
We do not have much choice.
If it wasn't for my implant setting off all the alarms, I could guide you to your men.
We could remove the implant.
No, it has a micro explosive inside that detonates on contact with air. When you join a cadre, you join for life.
A small force field containing xenon or another inert gas could be placed over the incision site. The explosive could possibly be disarmed at the same time it is removed.
This is something you're going to have to decide for yourself, Ishara. Think about it while we're waiting for Geordi.
Our parents were killed in some crossfire just after I was born. Some people took care of us for a few months, then one day we came home and they were gone. So Tasha took care of me, and when I was old enough I joined the Coalition.
And Tasha did not?
My sister hated the cadres. She blamed them for our parents death. For everything. She refused to join, and she left as soon as she had the chance. I always thought she was weak for doing that, but maybe I was wrong. Maybe, maybe she made the right choice. To work together for something besides killing, to be close to someone without having to protect your back. Very appealing. You're the perfect example. I hardly even know you, Data, but already I completely trust you. I even consider you a friend.
Thank you. I would like to consider you my friend as well.
If I had known about this place fifteen years ago, things might've been different. Maybe it's not too late.
Ishara is willing to have the implant removed, sir.
Good. Inform Doctor Crusher.
She also expressed a desire to leave the colony. She hopes to apply to the Academy and eventually join Starfleet.
Does she understand the magnitude of these decisions?
She claims to, Captain.
I get a sense of ambiguity from her. Her loyalties are clearly divided, Captain.
Are you suggesting we deny her an escape from this environment?
No, I'm just not sure she wants to escape. It's the only way of life she's ever known.
Ultimately, it is her decision to make, not ours. Mister Data, proceed with the mission as planned.
Data?
Yes, Counsellor?
You seem so strong in your support. I'm curious.
We must free the crewmen. She appears to be our best hope of doing so. In addition, I have become used to her.
Ishara.
Thank you, Data.
You are welcome. Doctor Crusher is expecting you in Sickbay.
It's all so different.
To what are you referring?
On the colony, nobody does anything for anyone else unless they have something to gain from it.
But I do have something to gain from it. Your continued presence on this ship. Is something wrong?
I have to tell Hayne and the others. I owe it to them. Guess I ought to get it over with.
If you desire privacy, you may use the Observation lounge.
That would probably make things a little easier.
Report.
It's working.
Captain's log, stardate 44225.3. Doctor Crusher has successfully removed Ishara's magnetic implant, enabling the young woman to guide our rescue attempt. Without my intending it, she has virtually become an active member of the crew.
Cardiovascular functions normal. Metabolism, immunity, all other vital signs excellent. How do you feel?
Better than I've ever felt.  Thanks for staying with me.
You might want to keep this. It's been with you a long time.
You keep it, Data, so you won't forget me.
Have you reconsidered your decision to stay with us?
No. Just in case something goes wrong down there.
I understand you wish to join Starfleet.
Some day. If I'm lucky.
On that day, it is we who will be lucky.
Picard to Riker. Is your away team ready?
Waiting for your signal, sir.
Status, Mister La Forge.
Phasers in alignment and ready to fire.
How far must we penetrate to safely allow transporter function?
One point six kilometres.
Fire phasers.
Aye, sir.
One point three kilometres. One point four. One point five kilometres. One point six kilometres. Deep enough for transport, sir.
Cease fire. Mister O'Brien, energise.
This way.
Caution is indicated.
We're near the heart of the Alliance. Security is minimal here. They aren't expecting anybody this far in.
Ishara?
Follow me.
Are you certain?
No, I'm not. I'm trying to remember. I was here, but it was a long time ago. There have been changes. It's through here.
There. Your men are behind that door.
Hold out your hands.
Let's get moving.
Where is she?
Commander, look.
What the hell happened here?
She probably tried to draw their fire. It triggered the alarm.
Worf, get these men back to the Enterprise.
Come on.
Data, you're with me.
Ishara. What are you doing? The fusion generator is overloading. You are attempting to disable the defence system. For what reason? We have rescued the crewmen.
I don't care about your crewmen. We have three thousand troops waiting at the perimeter. When the defences go down, they'll come in. The Alliance will fall.
The Federation will be responsible for the resulting deaths. I cannot allow that.
You don't have a choice.
That is not so.
I don't want to kill you, Data. But I will.
We will both be destroyed by the explosion.
The Coalition's been all I've had for fifteen years. They've given me a life. I don't mind dying for them. But you won't have to if you just get out of here now.
Was this your intention from the beginning?
We never could have gotten this deep into Alliance territory without your help.
Our help was not deliberate. You deceived us.
What's the difference? You got what you came for. Why do you care about what we do?
Your friendship with me was part of the deception, was it not? You misled me at each step, and yet I was completely unaware.
That doesn't matter now! None of it does! Now get out of here, Data, please. Now!
My duty requires me to intercede.
Ishara!
What was she doing?
Disabling the detection system so her forces could attack.
Set to kill.
Your strategy failed.
It was a calculated risk. You gave us an opportunity we couldn't ignore. Ishara, are you hurt?
No.
I want her returned immediately.
You're not in a position to dictate to anybody. She attacked two Federation officers.
You have no jurisdiction here!
Don't talk about legal rights. Your jurisdiction is based entirely on the threat of violence.
You have your crewmen back. Isn't that enough?
What do you know about
Commander Data, escort Ishara to the transporter room.
Thank you, Captain. I'm just trying to preserve the peace.
Close the channel.
You're far more charitable than I would have been, Captain.
I understand your feelings, Number One. I share them. But perhaps the fault lies in ourselves. We were so eager to accept her. Each of us, myself included, wanted to see something of Tasha in this woman. We saw more than what was there.
You haven't said one word to me.
What do you wish to talk about?
I did what I had to do. I'm sorry if I hurt you in the process.
I am an android. It is not possible for me to be injured in that fashion.
O'BRIEN:Whenever you're ready.
You know, Data, I wasn't always lying to you. That time we spent talking, that was the closest thing to friendship I've ever had. If that means anything to you.
Energise.
Come in.
Data, what's on your mind?
Recent events have left me puzzled, sir. It has been days since Ishara left, and yet my thoughts seem to dwell on her. Almost as if I were experiencing a feedback loop in my mnemonic network.
I know what you mean.
It is curious that I was so easily misled.
Make that we.
Yes, sir.
Data, sit down.
Thank you, sir.
In all trust, there is the possibility of betrayal. I'm not sure you were prepared for that.
Were you prepared, sir?
I don't think anybody ever is.
Then it is better not to trust.
Without trust, there's no friendship, no closeness. None of the emotional bonds that make us what we are.
And yet you put yourself at risk.
Every single time.
Perhaps I am fortunate, sir, to be spared the emotional consequences.
Perhaps.
Enter. Enter.
Worf, they're going to be here any minute.
I am having problems.
If I didn't know you better, I'd say that you were procrastinating.
Klingons do not procrastinate. It is a tactical delay.
You have spend about five minutes greeting the Iyaarans maybe an hour making small talk at this reception. I'm the one who has to escort them around the ship for the next three days.
I do not enjoy these diplomatic situations.
It's all part of being in Starfleet. There.
I do not see why it is necessary to wear these ridiculous uniforms.
Protocol.
They look like dresses.
That is an incredibly outmoded and sexist attitude. I'm surprised at you. Besides, you look good in a dress.
What's keeping them?
Ah, you're just in time. They're about to disembark.
Ambassador Loquel, Ambassador Byleth. I'm Captain Picard. Welcome on board the Enterprise.
It is our pleasure to be here, Captain.
It is an honour to be the site of the first cultural exchange between the Iyaaran people and the Federation.
The next seven days should prove most illuminating.
Allow me to introduce Voval. He will be taking you back to our homeworld.
How do you do. I'm looking forward very much to meeting with the Premier of Iyar. There will be a reception held in your honour when you will meet the rest of my senior staff. I, of course, shall be on my way to your home world, but I shall be leaving you in the safe hands of my most experienced officers. Lieutenant Worf, of the Klingon Empire, is my head of Security. He will be in charge of your safety while you're on board. Counsellor Deanna Troi of the planet Betazed will be your personal liaison office, Ambassador Loquel.
Ambassador, it's an honour to meet you. Would you like to see your quarters before we attend the reception?
Please.
Ambassador Byleth, this is Commander William Riker, my First Office, from the planet Earth. He has been assigned to you.
I want this one.
Well, Commander Riker is a skilled diplomat, with wide experience in inter-species contact.
I'm sure, I'm sure. But I have decided. I want this Lieutenant Worf.
Well, that will be just fine. Mister Worf?
Yes. Yes Ambassador, it would be my pleasure to
Yes, yes. Enough of that. Show me to my quarters.
This way.
Good luck.
Do you think there's enough food here, Data?  Good evening.
Good evening.
So first thing tomorrow, I thought I'd take you on a tour of the operational centres and the residential decks of the ship. Then we could spend some time discussing the cultural underpinnings of your society.
Are you going to eat?
Excuse me?
You have no food on your plate. Are you going to eat?
Oh, well, actually, I was waiting until we got to the desserts.
Desserts? What is this?
It's something we eat after the main course. It's usually very sweet, it's usually very bad for you. We eat it purely for pleasure. If you ask me, it's the best part of any meal.
My people eat only for nourishment.
Oh, well, let me introduce you to some of my favourites. This is peach cobbler with whipped cream. Tarvokian powder cake. And this is my favourite. Ktarian chocolate puff. I don't know exactly what's inside, but I think it's made with seventeen varieties of chocolate.
That is, that is
Delicious?
Delicious.
Ambassador, I think we're going to get along very well. Shall we?
This is unacceptable.
I am sorry you do not care for our
Bring me new food. I require a higher protein and enzymatic content.
Ambassador
Yes.
It's the custom usually in a situation like this, for us to serve ourselves. It's called a buffet, and
Bring me new food.
Ambassador
Doctor, it is all right. I am happy to bring more food.
How is your diplomatic assignment progressing?
Fine.
I have heard that in moments of diplomatic tension, it is often helpful to find elements of commonality.
Ambassador Byleth is demanding, temperamental and rude.
You share all of those qualities in abundance. Perhaps you should try to build on your similarities.
So, I understand that your homeworld has some of the most spectacular crystal formations in this sector. Is there any place in particular that you would recommend I visit while I'm there?
No.
Well, I, er, what's our ETA?
Seventeen hours, thirty two minutes.
I think I'll go update my itinerary.
What happened?
There's been a system-wide power failure.
What's the cause?
We have entered an energy disruption field. I do not recognise the configuration. Attitude controls failing.
There is an M-class planet in this system. Can we reach it?
I will try.
Inertial dampeners are offline. Life support is failing.
Entering the planet's atmosphere.
Velocity dropping. Thermal shields at full power.
Prepare for impact.
Voval. Voval, try not to move. You may have a concussion. Picard to Enterprise. Picard to Enterprise, do you read me? Too much interference.
There is a structure of some kind. Some energy readings about two kilometres south of here. Voval, I'm going to try to find help. Do you understand? Now, try to stay conscious and don't leave the shuttle. There's some kind of plasma energy out on the surface. I'll be back as soon as I can.
The Engineering sections encompass twelve decks of the secondary hull. Deck forty two contains the antimatter storage facility.
What is the mass flow rate of the antimatter replenishment stream to the containment pods?
Excuse me?
The antimatter replenishment rate. What is it?
I am not certain of the exact rate.
Perhaps there is someone here who does know the answer. You. Are you smarter than this one?
Why do you ask?
Never mind.
I wish to see the Bussard collectors. Take me to them.
This way.
This deck is devoted mainly to stellar cartography, biological research, and astrophysics. We have over a thousand people on board
Are you sure you don't want some of this, this papalla juice?
No, thank you. I'm still recovering from all those desserts last night.
Are you sure? It is very delicious.
I'm sure.
Please, please. You've been so kind. Please.
Yum. Next we're going to go to deck eight, which is interesting because it's not really finished. It's sort of a multi-purpose deck. Sometimes when we need an extra lab or. Ambassador?
What is this?
It's a child.
Child?
Children are our offspring. They're our young. They grow into adults over a period of many years. They grow into beings like us.
Offspring.
Ambassador, I'm curious. Now does your species procreate?
Post-cellular compounding. We emerge from the natal pod fully grown.
I see.
Do you have a name?
Eric
Eric. Do you like dessert?
May I give Eric some dessert?
That sounds like a wonderful idea. Come on, Eric.
Is someone there? Who's there?
What do you want? Who are you? Who are you?
Shh.
No, wait. Stop. There was someone else in the shuttlecraft with me. The pilot, he's injured. He needs your help.
He's dead.
Hello.  Smells good. Thank you. This is a Terellian cargo freighter, isn't it? Is this your ship? Are you one of the crew?
No. I was a passenger. We crashed.
How many people survived? Were you the only one? Well, you're certainly not a Terellian, unless you've lost two of your arms. What's your name? I'm Jean-Luc Picard. I'm a Starfleet officer.
Anna.
Anna, are there other people on this planet? How long have you been here?
I don't know. You can't see the sun from here. I've lost track of all time.
What was the date when you crashed?
Stardate 40812.
Seven years!
Years?
Anna, Anna. wait a minute.
Seven years? I thought one, maybe two. How could it be seven?
Anna, Anna, listen to me. Listen. On the shuttle, there is a lot of equipment that will have survived the crash. We can use it to contact Starfleet. They'll send a ship for us. We can leave.
Leave?
Yes. Both of us. Now, if you will help me to get to the shuttle. Ow.
Don't move. it's bad.
Don't worry, I won't move.
You have three broken ribs. The restrictor device will hold the bones in place, let them
Let them knit?
It's been so long since I talked to anyone. I used to talk to myself, but then I thought it might mean that I was crazy, so I stopped talking. It'll be a while before you can walk.
Perhaps you could go to the shuttle bring the equipment back here.
I can do that.
Good. Go into the cockpit, and look for a small comm. panel in the instrument array. See if you can remove it. Bring it back here.
Don't move. I'll be back.
I am going to kill him! With my bare hands, I will take him by the throat and I will rip out his oesophagus
Worf.
I have failed in my mission, Commander. I am clearly a bad diplomat. For the sake of the ship and the Federation, I request reassignment.
Denied.
Commander, these Iyaarans are arrogant, irritating. They cannot be reasoned with!
Ambassador Loquel's quite pleasant. I will admit though, he's a little unusual.
What have you been able to find out about him so far?
He seems preoccupied with recreation. I've spent more time in Ten Forward in the last two days than I have in the past two months. And he's obsessed with food. Especially chocolate.
You must be in heaven.
To be honest, he's testing even my limits.
You see? You see? They are insane!
Worf, you've been very patient with Ambassador Byleth, and that's good. But maybe it's time to let him know that some behaviour is unacceptable to us. I think it's all right to suggest limits for the Ambassador.
Bah.
Maybe we should loosen things up a little bit, meet in a less official capacity. How about a friendly game of poker?
What are you doing? You should be in bed.
Anna, why was this door locked from the outside?
For your protection.
From what?
There are dangerous animals here. Come sit down. Look, I have the comm. panel.
Good.
It wasn't easy. I had to force it out of the equipment bay.
If we can boost the output field, I might be able to send a distress signal. Something seems to be wrong with it.
What's the matter?
This transmitter module has been totally destroyed. How could that happen? It looks as though it's been hit by a phaser blast.
I used a phaser to cut it free. Maybe I accidentally damaged it. You can fix it, can't you?
No.
I'm sorry. I'm sorry. I'm sorry.
Anna, we will get out of here. It's not going to be easy, but we need to work together.
I can't believe I did that. That I damaged our only chance. I've waited for so long. At first, I had hoped that I'd be rescued. I kept setting up microfusion flares and looking up at the sky and waiting for someone to come and take me away. But it never happened. There's a precipice near here. I used to go there and stare down at the gorge and I'd think, I can just step over the edge and end it all. And then I realised it was the hope that was driving me crazy, that I had to accept that I would never get out of here.
Anna, no matter how long it takes, we will get out of here.
I knew from the moment I saw you that you were here to save me. I'll do anything you want. Just don't leave me. I don't ever want to be alone again.
I love you.
I found some coltayin roots. They're not much to look at but they taste good. What are you doing? You're going to hurt yourself.
No, no, no, it's all right. I'm just trying to dislodge this power cell. Nearly got it. There. No, no, it's all right. The energy relays are corroded but I think it should be able to hold one more charge. If I can regenerate this, then I may be able to reactivate the shuttlecraft's engines.
Well, I'd say this is cause for celebration. I may still have some Terellian spices around here, and I'll boil these roots and make us a nice broth.
That sounds delightful.
If we ever do get out of here, will you promise to show me this starship of yours? This Enterprise?
Of course. Anna, would you pass me that tricorder, I'm going to try to repair these energy relays.
I meant what I said before. I do love you.
Anna, I'm grateful to you for saving my life, and I think that you are a warm and compassionate person, and I feel a great sympathy for what you've been through alone here on this planet, but I don't think that you can really be in love with me.
How can you say that? Of course I love you.
No, I'm the first person you've seen in seven years. I'm bringing you the hope of leaving this place. Don't you think that you could possibly be just a little confused right now?
So you're not attracted to me.
I think that's a little premature. We hardly know anything about each other.
I understand, and I'm sorry if I made you uncomfortable.
No harm done. It's going to take at least a couple of hours to charge this cell. Then as soon as it's done, we should get it over to the shuttle immediately. This cell casing is already beginning to break down. Anna, we are going to get out of here.
The bet is ten. That's to you, Ambassador.
I will see the bet, and raise ten.
I'm in for twenty.
I'm in. And I raise twenty.
You are  bluffing.
Excuse me, Ambassador. Those are my chips.
You are in error. Those chips are mine.
I saw you take two chips from my pile.
You would dare to accuse me of stealing?
Yes.
You are lying because you are losing the game.
I am losing because you've been cheating all along!
Wait a minute. Calm down.
Even if I were cheating, how would a plodding animal like you know it?
You are an insulting, pompous fool, and if you were not an Ambassador, I would disembowel you right here!
Do not let my title inhibit you, Klingon!
Yes. Good.
Stop, Mister Worf! That is an order!
Wonderful. Very good! Thank you. Lieutenant Worf. I think I understand now. That was a very effective demonstration.
What?
If you'll excuse me, I would like to document this experience.
The power cell is ready. We should take it over to the shuttle.
No. We can't leave right now.
Why not?
The plasma storms are too strong. It's dangerous. Wait a few hours, then we can go.
We don't have a few hours. I told you, this cell is already beginning to degenerate.
Jean-Luc, it's a difficult journey. The restriction field will make it very hard for you to walk.
I'm feeling very much better. in fact, I don't intend to go on using this any longer.
No! You can't remove it yet. No!
There's no pain. It would appear I don't have any broken ribs after all.
Jean-Luc.
What's going on? Why are you trying to keep me here?
Please, I love you.
Why are you keeping me locked in this freighter? You say that there are wild animals out there but I haven't heard or seen a single one of them.
Jean-Luc.
What about that comm. panel? You said you damaged it when you were cutting it out of the shuttle. Did you? You see, I find it hard to believe that you would destroy the one piece of equipment that could get you out of here after seven years. And what was this really for? To keep me immobilised?
I was afraid. I didn't want you to leave me.
So it was necessary to keep me captive?
I was scared. I wanted you to stay, to love me.
I'm going to go look for the shuttle myself.
No.
Anna!
Don't fight me.
Anna, no!
You should love me now. We're together. We depend on each other. I know more about you. Love me.
Anna, stop!
I've failed. You don't love me. It's over.
Anna.  Anna! Anna, where are you going?
Hello! Is anyone in there?
Yes! Inside here!
Hello!
Inside the freighter! The door is on the opposite side!  Over here! The door's over here!
Voval! I thought you were dead.
Dead?
Yes. There's a woman living here. She told me that she'd been to the shuttle. She said that she saw you dead.
Yes. That is understandable. When my species is injured, our metabolic rate slows until our body can heal itself. This state could easily be mistaken for death.
I see.
When you did not return to the shuttle I intended to track you. Surface conditions made it very difficult. So cold. I saw someone running away from here. Was it the woman?
Yes.
Why did she leave the shelter?
She was upset.
Do you think she may harm herself? There's a dangerous precipice near here. She was headed in that direction
It's possible.
Then we should go find her.
You stay here. Keep warm. I'll go and look for her.
We will go together.
Anna! Anna!
Captain, this ridge extends for a kilometre in either direction.
We can search it twice as fast if we separate.
Anna! Anna!
Anna, Anna.
Stay away from me.
You don't have to do this. I found Voval, the shuttle pilot, he's still alive. He can help us get away from here.
I don't care. I'll jump unless you promise to love me.
No. No, I won't promise. You have been manipulating me, haven't you?
Jean-Luc, what are you saying?
The necklace. It broke. I saw it in the cargo freighter, on the floor by the fire. I left it there. Now it's around your neck. It's whole. How?
Tell me you love me. I must know.
Where's Voval? Isn't it convenient that he arrived moments after you left? That he insisted that I come here to look for you? That I find you, here on the ledge, ready to jump? That's very good timing, don't you think?
Jean-Luc.
Are you and Voval working together? He's the only one who could have brought you the necklace.
Tell me about your love or I'll jump!
Go ahead. Why don't you do it? It's a long way down. Must be two hundred metres. You'd die instantly, if that's what you want. But I don't think that it really is.
I have failed.
Failed? Voval, what is going on?
My name is Ambassador Voval.
Ambassador?
My mission was to study human intimacy, specifically the concept you call love. In our study of your culture, we did not understand certain concepts. So we sent three representatives to study them, to experience them.
But why did you believe that bringing me here would give you a better understanding of love?
Several years ago, we discovered the remains of the Terellian freighter on this planet. The ship contained logs made by a single survivor, a human woman. That was our first contact with human culture. The woman lived alone here for seven years until another human crashed on this planet. A human male.
And the man was injured and she nursed him back to health, and they fell in love.
In the logs, she described many concepts we found difficult to understand. Pleasure, antagonism, love. These were alien to us. We wished to experience them for ourselves. Ambassador Loquel was sent to experience pleasure. Byleth was sent to experience antagonism. And I was sent to experience love. Was this wrong?
Let me just say that we would not take such a direct approach. Ambassador, I have tell you that in my culture, what you have done would be considered a crime.
Crime?
Well, we'll can talk about it later. For now, I think we should get off this planet. Am I in assuming the damage the shuttle is not as bad as it seems?
That is correct. We can leave at any time.
I think that now would be quite nice.
You look a little sore.
Lieutenant Worf was kind enough to engage me in eleven hours of holodeck battle exercises.
Eleven hours.
Yes, I learned a great deal about the concept of antagonism.
It was excruciating.
Counsellor, these are bio-enzymatic supplements my people consume for food. I'm afraid you will find they are not as delicious as your chocolate.
After the past few days, I could use something a little bland. Goodbye, Ambassador.
Fascinating species.
Indeed.
Thank you, Captain. This has been an enlightening experience.
For me as well, Ambassador.
I am sorry if our diplomatic methods offended you.
No, on the contrary, I found your approach intriguing. We humans tend to take a rather balanced approach towards life. Never too much, never too little, and it's very nice to find a culture that is willing to take an experience to its furthest extreme.
Goodbye, Captain.
Ambassador.
So, tell me, why is it so important that you find this man?
We had business dealings. He owes me money.
If we had business dealings, I can tell you that I wouldn't disappear.
Maybe we can discuss that possibility. But first, I have to find him, collect the money I'm owed.
I'll be closing in a few hours. Perhaps we can discuss this more privately.
If I don't find him, I'm going to have to move on. Are you sure you haven't seen him?
Human, about two metres tall, smooth-headed. No. I don't remember anyone like that.
You're lying.
And you're a Betazoid. I thought so. Listen, people who come in here, they count on a certain amount of anonymity. And if I were to start answering questions about them, even to a very beautiful woman, well, I wouldn't be in business very long. And being a businesswoman, I'm sure you understand.
Great story. I'll remember it next time I'm in a knife fight.
Any luck?
I think the one over there knows something.
He would not admit to having seen the Captain, but he said that anyone who visited the ruins of Nafir would probably come here eventually. I suspect he knows more.
Let's go.
Commander, I told
My friend tells me you know about the man we're looking for.
The only reason I'm talking to you is that I have a sister, too.
I explained to him that we are looking for a man who impregnated your sister.
So you can imagine how much this means to me.
Family honour is important. If someone had defiled my sister I would do anything, pay anything, to find the one responsible.
And how much might anything be?
As much as five bars of gold-pressed latinum.
I think you've had a little too much to drink. You'd better leave. On your way, Yranac.
I'm sorry, but I think he wants to stay. Sit down.
This is my sister. She's angry. She's got a vicious temper. I wouldn't cross her.
You say one word and you're a dead man.
Perhaps there's an element of risk here that I did not fully appreciate.
And how much more latinum will it take to offset this risk?
This isn't about latinum. As a man with a sister, a sister with a temper, I can sympathise with you, but, how did you come here? Do you have a ship in orbit?
Yes.
Then take me with you. You can drop me anywhere.
Agreed. Now talk.
The man you're looking for was here several weeks ago. There was a group of aliens sitting at this table. He was asking them questions.
Who were these aliens?
I don't know, but they looked dangerous. They attacked him. He managed to incapacitate three of them before he was knocked down. He was thrown against that wall and fell there.
I'm picking up some Starfleet fibre traces and human cellular debris.
Can you establish a DNA reading?
There's something strange here. The cell structures are badly distorted. It's as if they've been exposed to some kind of high-energy field.
A weapon discharge?
It could be. I'm picking up some faint traces of microcrystalline damage in the floor material, but I'm not familiar with the pattern I'm getting.
Who are you people?
You didn't say anything about a weapon.
I hadn't finished yet. You'll like this. The man got what was coming to him. When they knocked him down, one of them took out a weapon and fired. He was vaporised.
He's telling the truth.
Acting Captain:Acting Captain's log, stardate 47135.2. Doctor Crusher has positively identified Captain Picard's DNA. There's no doubt now that he's dead.
Come.
How are you doing?
I'm all right.
The crew's pretty shaken up. I'm arranging a memorial. I think you should be the one to deliver the eulogy.
I think you'd be better at something like that. Or Beverly. She knew him the longest.
I know it's not going to be easy, but I think it's important that we face up to what's happened. You're in command now. The crew's looking to you for guidance.
You don't understand. I can't give the eulogy because I won't be at the service.
A memorial service helps to give everyone a sense of completion. Helps them begin the healing process.
That's exactly the point. I don't want to heal.
Will.
I've an open wound, right here. It hurts like hell. I don't want it to get better, and I don't want to pretend that everything's all right.
I know you're angry.
You're damn right! And I intend to stay angry until I find whoever's responsible for the Captain's death.
That's pretty selfish of you. Do you think you're the only one in pain? Do you think you have the monopoly on loss? Well, let me tell you something. We're all hurting, and we're all angry. And whether you like it or not, you have a responsibility to this crew, and you can't just indulge your personal desire for revenge.
That is enough, Counsellor. Deanna. I'm sorry. This is not about revenge. This is about justice. The Captain died in a bar fight for nothing. Somebody has to answer for that. Then I can mourn.
Commander, I am receiving a transmission from Admiral Chekote at Starbase two twenty seven.
I'll take it in the Ready room.
Aye, sir.
Sir.
I read your report, Commander. My condolences to you and your crew. Captain Picard's death is a loss to the entire Federation. I see that you've asked to postpone your mission to the Argus sector. For what reason?
I have a request, sir. I would like to conduct an investigation into Captain Picard's death.
The Dessican authorities have jurisdiction in this case, Commander.
I know that, sir. Frankly, I don't have much confidence in the authorities on Dessica Two. There's every reason to believe that they're corrupt.
I suspect you're right. The question remains, are you the one to pursue this?
The Captain's death hit me pretty hard, and I may not be completely objective, but there is no one who is more determined. I won't rest until I find out who's responsible.
All right, Commander. I'm officially placing the Enterprise on detached duty. Your mission is at your discretion. Good luck.
Thank you, sir.
Ah, Commander Riker. I've been meaning to speak to you. I was wondering if you could move me to better quarters. I don't care much for the decor here.
These are the best quarters we have. I was hoping now that you've had a chance to relax you might have remembered some of the details about the aliens you saw. Something you may have forgotten.
Sorry, my memory isn't what it used to be.
They murdered a man in cold blood in full view of everyone in the bar and you can't remember anything about them?
Now that you mention it, I do remember one thing. They said they'd kill anyone who talked about what happened.
Do you know where they went?  So you know who they are and you know where I can find them.
Perhaps I do.
What do you want?
Not a great deal, Commander. Just a shuttlecraft. I believe I'd like to travel for a while, see more of the galaxy. You understand.
A shuttlecraft? Well, here's my offer. Instead of the ship, I'll give you some time.
Time?
If you're lucky, you'll only spend the next five years in prison instead of the next twenty.  You've got twelve outstanding arrest warrants for fraud and petty theft in the Klingon Empire. Tell me what you know, and I'll pull some strings. Maybe they'll reduce your sentence after you've been extradited.
If I tell you what I know, you must promise not to give me to the Klingons.
I'll think about it.
Perhaps you could send me to a Federation rehabilitation colony instead.
Talk.
The aliens were some kind of mercenary group. They've been operating in this sector for the last six months.
Where do we find them?
I heard one of them mention the Barradas system. I think they were headed there.
You think?
That's all I know.
Riker to Data.
Data here.
Take us out of orbit. Set course for the Barradas system, warp six.
Aye, sir.
Barradas Three is the only class M planet in this system, and it is listed as unpopulated. However, sensors have detected intermittent energy signals emanating from its surface.
What's the source?
The signals are difficult to localise, but they could be emissions from some kind of power converter.
Which could indicate a base or a ship.
What else do we know about Barradas Three?
The planet was used as an outpost for the Debrune approximately two thousand years ago. The Federation's Archaeological survey has catalogued numerous ruins on the surface.
Mister Worf, I'd like a security detail to accompany the away team to the surface. I'll lead the team. Geordi, you're with me. Mister Data, you have the Bridge.
Aye, sir. Commander, as Acting First Officer, I must question your decision to accompany the away team. If Captain Picard were here
He's not.
I realise that, sir. But if he were, and he wanted to lead an away team, you would tell him that the Captain's place is
On the Bridge. Not this time.
Ensign, you take that area.
Yes, sir.
Geordi?
It's tough to get accurate sensor readings. There's an awful lot of interference in the area.
From what?
I'm not sure. It's very unlocalised. It could be atmospheric.
What do you make of these?
Well, these ruins around here are pretty ancient but I'd say that this indentation was made fairly recently. Could be the site of some battlefield.
It doesn't look like any blast point I've ever seen. The shape is too perfect.
Sir, there's microcrystalline damage all throughout this area. The same kind of pattern that Doctor Crusher picked up in the floor of that bar on Dessica Two.
Commander! I found something.
Looks as if someone could have just dropped them.
La Forge to Enterprise. We are under attack down here.
I repeat, we are under attack.
Commander, we've lost contact with the away team.
Is there a malfunction?
No, sir. The comm. system is being jammed.
What is the source?
Somewhere on the surface.
Bridge to Transporter room two. Can you get a lock on the away team?
Negative, sir. There's too much interference.
I'm going to head for those trees over there. If I can get there, we might be able to set up a crossfire.
Data to away team. Please respond.
Data, we've been attacked.
We've got one casualty and Commander Riker has been taken captive.
Sir, the mercenaries have beamed away. They must have a base or a ship nearby. Can the sensors locate anything?
Commander, we're picking up a vessel leaving orbit.
Why was it not detected earlier?
They could have been using the planet as a shield. Sir, they are powering up their weapon systems.
Raise shields. Red alert.
Damage report.
Minor hit on the port deflector. No damage. They're running, sir. Their speed is warp eight point seven and holding. I think they're at their maximum.
Take us to warp nine and pursue. Lock phasers on target.
Sir, we should be within phaser range in twenty three seconds. Switching to long-range scanners. Commander, the sensor image of that ship is extremely weak. It's fading. The ship doesn't register on the long-range sensors. I'm sorry, sir. We've lost them.
Increase the sensor field bandwidth. Patch in the lateral sensor arrays.
It's no good, the signal's gone. It just disappeared.
Plot a course and take us back to Barradas Three. Notify the away team to prepare for transport.
Aye, sir.
Starfleet Intelligence confirms that a ship matching this configuration has been linked to raids on several other planets in this sector. For the short time it was within our visual range, we were able to take sensor readings of the mercenary vessel. It appears to be encased in an energy absorbing material. Although we can see the ship, this energy sheath renders it virtually undetectable to our long range sensors.
There must be some way we can track it.
Data, I know this is a long shot, but if I remodulate the long range sensor array, I might be able to make it sensitive enough to detect the ship.
Without a full compositional analysis of the energy sheath, the chances of finding the correct remodulation sequence are remote.
Sir, they have taken Commander Riker. We must do something. We cannot just sit here.
On the contrary, Lieutenant. That is precisely what we must do. Since there are no viable alternatives, we will return to the surface and attempt to determine what these mercenaries are doing on this planet. An investigation might reveal some indication of their purpose. Please notify me when you have assembled your search teams. Dismissed.
What's the problem?
I warned you not to push the engines so hard. Two of the power shunts are on the verge of collapse. We'll be lucky if we can maintain warp six.
How long will it take to repair?
I can try to realign the warp core. It'll take at least eleven hours, but I'll have to shut the engines down completely.
We're not stopping. We can't afford to be sitting helpless in space. I want warp eight available in five hours, and I don't want to hear your excuses.
What were you doing on Barradas Three?
William T. Riker, Commander, SC two three one dash four two seven.
Oh really? Well, I am Arctus Baran and I don't have a number. Now what were you doing on Barradas Three, Commander?
We were studying the ruins. It was a scientific expedition.
Don't patronise me. Those ruins have been studied for centuries. There's nothing new to learn from them.
Then what were you doing there?
Don't bother, Commander, you can't remove it. It's a neural servo connected directly to your nervous system. It lets me control precisely how much pain you feel. This setting is usually sufficient. However, if necessary, it can go much higher. These devices were the idea of my predecessor. It's a convenient way of enforcing discipline.
What happened to him?
He failed to enforce it with me.
This is a waste of time, Baran. Get rid of him now.
You should be more patient, Vekor. It might be rewarding. We will wait. Let the memory of his pain argue with him for a while. It might change his attitude.
Vekor is right. We should get rid of him. It's dangerous to have someone from Starfleet on board.
Dangerous? It might be profitable. A Starfleet Commander is a valuable hostage.
Starfleet won't negotiate with us, but they'll pursue us as long as we have him.
This discussion is over. Get back to your post, Vekor.
They're right, Baran, and you know it. I say kill him. Now.
If he has nothing to give us, we should kill him now and be done with it. Everyone seems to recognise that fact except you.
I don't need a consensus to run this ship, Galen.
What's going on?
I'm bypassing the aft plasma couplings. The power loss should only last for a few seconds.
You should learn not to limit your options. Riker could be very useful to us in the future.
He may not be as useful as you think, if this is the same Riker that I've heard about.
And what Riker might that be?
Commander of the Enterprise formerly assigned to the USS Hood.
That's right.
Then you must be the William T. Riker with a history of insubordination. He was even once relieved of duty, during the Cardassian incident at Minos Korva.
How do you know all this?
Look, I've been smuggling artefacts from Federation sites for years. You can't help developing a familiarity with certain Starfleet personnel. If we hadn't have captured him, he'd probably have ended up before a court martial.
I've gotten out of them before.
Look, he's no use to us. Finish him now. Let me do it for you.
Watch him.
We're accelerating.
What have you done?
It has nothing to do with my repairs. I think there's a malfunction in the engine's intermix chamber.
Plasma pressure is rising.
Where's the malfunction?
It could be one of any thirty subsystems. It'll take time to locate.
I don't think you're going to have the chance. Plasma pressure has reached critical levels.
Seal off the intermix chamber.
I can't. The override sequence won't engage.
The antimatter flow regulator is locked open.
Logic subsystems still not responding.
Get out of the way.
Plasma pressure has exceeded maximum levels. Eight percent above critical and rising.
We have to jettison the core.
No, we'll be stranded here.
The flow regulator is frozen.
Let me do it. I've had a lot of experience with this sort of system failures. I might be able to do something.
Plasma pressure is eleven percent above critical. The containment fields are beginning to degrade.
Go!
Flow regulator is not responding to manual override. Containment fields won't hold much longer.
Looks like you've got a control logic lockout in your regulator subsystem. I'm going to attempt to run an active bypass through the plasma flow convertor. You,  start running phase-lock feedback through that regulator. I want about a six second delay.
What are you saying? I don't take orders from you.
You do as he says.
Plasma pressure is fourteen percent above critical.
If you fail
We'll all be dead anyway. Just need a few more seconds.
Plasma pressure is dropping. We're back into safe levels.
If you want to make sure that doesn't happen again, you'd better re-initiate your regulator sub-compressors. A full diagnostic of your intermix chamber wouldn't hurt either.
Do it. Put him in quarters for now.
You still wish you'd killed me?
The search teams have reported in. They found several archaeological sites. Each one has been looted.
It's possible that the microcrystalline damage I found in these indentations was the result of some kind of high energy transporter beam but I still don't understand. There's nothing here that's particularly valuable. Why would anyone want to steal any of these things?
Perhaps these artefacts have a special value to the Romulans.
The Romulans?
These structures were built by the Debrune. That race is an ancient offshoot of the Romulans. The ruins on the planet where Captain Picard was killed were also Romulan in origin.
The leader of the group that attacked us was Romulan. Perhaps they are controlling the mercenaries.
The question remains, why are they stealing these artefacts?
There are several archaeological sites in this sector containing ruins which are Romulan in origin. These are the locations that were attacked by the mercenary vessel.
Looks like they did a pretty thorough job.
The only sites not been attacked were on Calder Two, Yadalla Prime, and Draken Four.
Yadalla and Draken are at the far edge of the sector, but Calder Two? That's less than a day from here at maximum warp.
That would be their next likely target.
According to this, there's a Federation outpost at Calder Two.
But it is only a small science station. It has limited defensive capabilities. I do not believe it could withstand an attack from the mercenary ship. Mister Worf. Send a message to the Federation outpost on Calder Two. Advise them that if a ship matching the mercenary vessel approaches, they should attempt to delay it until our arrival. Ensign, take us out of orbit. Set course for the Calder system. Warp nine.
Aye, sir.
We don't have much time. It's good to see you, Will. I didn't expect to meet you here.
I was looking to find the people who killed you on the surface. A witness said they saw you vaporised.
These mercenaries use weapons that can activate their transporter. It gives them the opportunity to beam things quickly, just by firing at them. That's what they did to me.
I don't understand any of this. Who are these people? What are you doing involved with them?
The site that I wanted to study had been raided. A lot of the artefacts had been stolen. The site had been practically destroyed. I wanted to find out who was responsible. I tracked them to that bar on Dessica Two. I must have asked too many questions. They captured me. They wanted to find out how much I knew about their operation.
And then you became part of their crew?
I convinced them I was a smuggler, and that my name was Galen. I offered to help them appraise the artefacts that they had stolen. Will, these aren't common thieves. They are stealing Romulan artefacts from archaeological sites throughout this sector. Baran has me analysing each one if them for a particular particle signature. Will, they are looking for a specific artefact.
Why?
That's what we have to find out. Baran is the key. I think that he knows more about what we're really looking for than anyone else on this ship. I want you to get close to him. Try and get his confidence.
That's why you set up the engine failure, because you knew that I'd be able to fix it.
He also believes that you're a less than perfect Starfleet officer. Will, I want you to play into that role. Baran and I, well, he doesn't care very much for me, but he has to tolerate me because he needs my help with these artefacts. But if you and I become enemies, then there's a better chance of you and he becoming friends.
All right. I'll do what I can.
What are you doing here?
Getting some answers, because you can't get him to talk.
No one conducts an interrogation on this ship without my permission. Is that understood?
Our next objective should prove an interesting challenge. We're headed for the Sakethan burial mounds on Calder Two.
What? Calder Two isn't just another archaeological site, you know. It's a Federation outpost there.
I don't see that as a problem.
It's defended by Starfleet. You don't think they're just going to stand by while we walk in there and take whatever we want.
I'm familiar with the tactical situation.
What are their defences?
Nothing to worry about. They have a type four deflector shield protecting the outpost and the ruins.
They also have a minimum of two phaser banks and possibly photon torpedoes. Is that enough to worry about?
How do you know so much about this outpost?
Because I tried to smuggle a Sakethan glyph stone out of there nearly two years ago. I barely got away in one piece.
Our weapons are more than a match for their defences. I anticipate that we'll be able to destroy the outpost within fifteen minutes. Then we'll send in Tallera and the landing party to secure the relics.
Why don't we use Riker? He's a Starfleet Commander. He could talk us past the outpost security without raising their suspicions. Then when their shields go down, we can beam the artefacts up here without ever leaving the ship.
Why would Riker help us? Just because he's out of favour with Starfleet doesn't mean that he's ready to betray them.
If he doesn't help us, we'll have to destroy the outpost and kill everyone on it. He's still a Starfleet officer. He won't want to take innocent lives if he can possibly prevent it.
The last time we engaged Starfleet, we lost a man. We can't afford any more casualties. If we can avoid a battle, I think we should.
All right, we'll try it. We'll be at Calder Two within five hours. You all know your duties. I want this ship prepared for battle, in case your plan doesn't work.
Computer, reset diagnostic for new sample, lot number four seven eight B. Access spectral analysis and begin scan, mode three.
Scan complete. Terikon particle decay profile does not fall within specified reference range. Probability of match zero point zero four percent.
Computer, reset diagnostic for new sample, lot number three six nine B.
Access spectral analysis, mode two, begin scan.
Baran wants to see the analysis of the last lot. He thinks you're moving a little slowly.
You can tell Baran if he wants the analysis done faster, he can do it himself. If he wants it done correctly, he can wait.
Do you enjoy living dangerously, Galen? Baran can kill you in an instant if he activates his control device.
I doubt that he'll do that. I've increased the accuracy of the identification process by a factor of ten. I'm the best person to analyse these artefacts. Baran knows that.
He may need you now, but I know Baran, and I can tell you he's not going to back down forever. You accomplish nothing by provoking him.
I don't like operating in the dark. If I knew what the point of this mission were, why I was analysing these relics.
If Baran felt it were wise to let the crew know that, I'm sure he would have.
Do you know what all this is about?
What Baran knows, I know.
Then what's going on here. Why are we risking our lives taking these artefacts? Who wants them?
I see no reason to tell you anything, but you can rest assured I don't necessarily share everything I know with Baran, either. This conversation, for example, will stay between us.
You can tell Baran every word that I've said. He knows that I don't think much of him as a leader.
He's been in charge of this crew for a long time.
Baran wouldn't last five minutes as captain if he didn't have that control device. The crew follow him because they have no choice. Baran's power is based on fear and intimidation.
That almost sounds like a prelude to mutiny.
If someone were to challenge him, the rest of the crew would follow.
I was right. You do like living dangerously. I like you, Galen. I can tolerate a lot from someone like you, but only to a point. I intend to complete this mission successfully and get what's been promised me. If it looks as though you're getting in the way of that, I'll deal with you myself.
Commander, no one is allowed on the surface without prior authorisation from the Federation Science Council.
I'm aware of that, Lieutenant, but your outpost is in imminent danger of attack. I would like to station security personnel on the surface for your protection. Now, I'm ordering you to drop your shields.
I'm sorry, sir, but the regulations are very specific. I can't do it. If you'd like, you can remain in orbit until we contact the Science Council, but we're experiencing some communication difficulties right now, so that
This isn't working. They're delaying on purpose. Someone has warned them. Charge main disruptor array. Destroy the outpost.
No, there's no time for that! Starfleet will be here any minute.
What are you doing?
I'm configuring the disruptors to fire a phase resonant pulse. If I can hit their shield generator with precisely the right frequency, I should be able to take it out with one shot. Firing. Their shields are down.
The artefacts should be located in several small structures arranged in staggered formations.
I'm scanning. I think I've found them.
Lock coordinates and start bringing them up.
There should be at least two more pieces down there.
I've lost transporter lock.
They managed to get their shields back up.
I need those artefacts. Lock all disruptors on target. This time I want that outpost destroyed.
Direct hit on their aft deflectors. They are undamaged.
Ensign, scan for Starfleet combadge signals. Is Commander Riker aboard that ship?
I can't tell, sir. Sensors are unable to penetrate their hull.
Open a channel.
Open.
This is the Federation Starship Enterprise. You are ordered to stand down.
Drop your shields and prepare to be boarded.
You sent them a message. You told them where to find us.
That's ridiculous. When did I have a chance?
This is set to kill. Order your ship to disengage. Activate visual.
Commander. Are you all right?
Tell him!
Mister Data, withdraw the Enterprise. That's an order.
That is impossible, sir. The ship you are on has violated a Federation outpost. It is my duty to stop it.
I'm your commanding officer. I'm giving you a direct order. Understood?
Commander, if you could explain
I've never explained my orders before. I'm not about to start now.
I won't let him blow this ship into space. If I can set up a low level comm. link between the two ships, I can use my personal command codes. I can deactivate the shields.
Do it.
Commander, we are receiving some kind of signal from the mercenary ship. These are Commander Riker's access codes. He is attempting to shut down our shields.
That doesn't make any sense. He knows those codes would have been changed as soon as he was captured.
That is correct, Counsellor. He does know. Mister Worf, prepare to drop the shields.
Sir, we would be totally defenceless.
I am aware of that.
Sir, as soon as they see
Mister Worf, that is an order.
Aye, sir.
It worked. The shields are dropping.
Fire.
Sir?
Mister Crusher, I summoned you almost ten minutes ago.
Sir, I'm sorry. I was in the middle of a very important experiment. I was using some very volatile compounds. I couldn't just leave them lying out
Excuses, Mister Crusher?
No, sir. I was just attempting to offer a
Because I can assure you that will not go down well at Starfleet Academy.
Yes, sir, I'm aware of that. The Academy?
I just received a message from Admiral Nsomeka. She expects you to report in two weeks. A position has opened up in this year's class.
Thank you.
Now, you'll have to work overtime in order to catch up, but I have assured the Admiral that you are capable of that. Please don't make a liar out of me.
Oh, no, sir, I won't.
Well, for your final mission aboard the Enterprise you will accompany me to Pentarus Five while I try to sort out the problems with the miners. Commander Riker has told me you've been studying the effects of outpost judiciary decisions on Federation Law. What better way to get first hand experience?
Captain, I am picking up a general distress signal from Gamelan Five.
On screen.
Please. Does anyone read us?
Open a channel. I am Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Federation Starship Enterprise.
Captain, I am Chairman Songi of Gamelan Four. An unidentified spacecraft has entered orbit above our planet. Radiation levels in our atmosphere have increased by three thousand percent. We can only assume we are under attack, but the ship will not answer our hails. We are a peaceful planet. We have no ability to defend ourselves. Please, can you help us?
Mister Data, are we close enough for a scan?
No, sir, we are out of range.
Any other ships in that sector?
Negative, Commander.
Chairman Songi, we will proceed immediately to your planet.
Thank you, Captain.
Commander Riker, take the Enterprise and investigate the problem. Ensign Crusher and I will proceed to Pentarus Five. The miners have sent a shuttle. We shall leave in ten minutes.
Yes, sir.
You know, I've noticed here that your manoeuvring thrusters are rigged in a configuration I've never seen before.
It's my own modification. It's more efficient. You can study it if you want to.
Excuse me, Captain. I've run safety and operational inspections, Captain. Everything checks out all right, but I won't make any claims as to its comfort.
Captain Picard. Captain Dirgo of the shuttlecraft Nenebek.
Ah, Captain. It's good to meet you.
Captain? Of a mining shuttle?
Yes, Ensign, Captain. My ship isn't pretty, she isn't big, but we've logged almost ten thousand hours together.
Oh, yes. She seems a very sturdy craft.
We should go. Captain, will you take Ops?
I'll let Ensign Crusher perform that task. I have to study up on Regalian law.
Shuttlecraft has cleared the bay, sir.
Ensign Allenby, set a course for the Gamelan system. Warp six.
Aye, aye, sir.
You've done this before?
Yes.
Your Captain back there. If he isn't tougher than he looks, those miners will tear him apart.
Don't worry about Captain Picard. He'll handle them.
I've lost navigation.
The port thruster quad's gone. Guidance coupling's severed. I can't stabilise her.
The port thruster module blew.
Nenebek to Enterprise, emergency. Do you read? Pentarus station, come in. Communication's gone.
Is your navigational system functioning?
Negative. Switching to manual. Fifty million kilometres to Pentarus Five. We may have to put down somewhere else.
Mister Crusher, scan for a class-M environment.
Aye, sir.
I'm going to have to throttle back on the main impulse engines.
Sir, one of the moons around Pentarus Three registers as class M, barely. The mean temperature is fifty five degrees Celsius.
Life forms indicated?
Negative, but scanning is limited. There's a very strong magnetic field around the surface.
We don't have a choice. Save the impulse engine for controlled entry.
Mister Crusher, reconfigure working thrusters to manual input.
I'll try, sir but, this grid looks about a hundred years old.
We don't have the Federation's resources. Captain, take the helm. I'm rerouting the deuterium flow. Hull temperature seven hundred degrees.
Beginning braking manoeuvre.
We're below mach one. Bypass the thrusters now.
Brace yourself for impact.
Dear God. Let's salvage what we can. The first thing we'll need is shelter from the sun. In this heat, the shuttle will act like an oven.
All the systems are out. Can't get a communication channel. Location transponder's gone too.
We'll have to check the craft for something to protect our heads and eyes. And Captain, please recover your medical supplies, food and water rations
Well, the medical supplies are all right.
Food and water?
The replicator, damaged beyond repair.
Surely you have emergency supplies?
This isn't a starship. I have to choose what I carry.
Are you telling me there's no water?
Scanning. Vessel reads as an unmanned sublight freighter.
Origin?
Indeterminate. Propulsion appears to employ a gaseous core fission reactor, but it is not functioning.
The radiation levels from that ship are off the scale.
Could that be leakage from their engines?
No, sir. Engine reactor elements appear to have been inactive for approximately three hundred years. The vessel is carrying various unstable waste products.
You mean, it's a garbage scow.
Precisely.
Mister Worf, open a hailing frequency. Chairman Songi, this is Commander Riker on board the Enterprise.
Yes, Commander.
It appears you've inherited someone else's problem. An old waste vessel caught by your planet's gravitational pull.
Have your people begun to suffer from radiation sickness?
Not yet, but some areas are already detecting dangerous levels.
We'll do our best to get it out of here as quickly as possible.
Thank you, Commander.
We're going to push that barge into the Gamelan sun.
Sir, the Meltasion asteroid belt lies between here and the sun.
Then we'll have to take it ourselves. We'll use our deflectors clear a path through the asteroids.
I don't like the idea of getting close enough to that barge to tow it. The radiation levels are so high we'd be risking the contamination of the entire crew.
Do you have a better idea, Geordi?
We could send over a construction module to attach thrusters to it. Then we could direct it through the asteroid belt from a safe distance.
Commander, a message from the mining settlement on Pentarus Five. The shuttlecraft carrying Captain Picard has not yet arrived.
They left here at oh eight hundred hours.
They have asked if we are beginning a search.
Tell them we have an emergency situation. We'll begin a search as soon as we've completed that.
Aye, sir.
Mister La Forge, prepare to launch the construction module. I'd like to get this over with as fast as possible.
Any luck with the tricorder, Ensign?
I think so, sir. The scanning range may be a bit limited, but it's better than nothing.
These were on board, Captain. They're working.
Excellent. Our communicators may not be able to get a signal through this strong a magnetic field. I'm fashioning an arrow. If a search party finds the wreckage, they'll know we've headed for those mountains.
Are you crazy? They're too far away. We'll never make it.
We can't survive in this sun. Where there's mountains, there's shelter.
You've got no right to make the decisions. I'm the captain of this ship.
If you want to get out of this, I suggest you listen to Captain Picard. He's the one who's going to keep us alive.
Thank you, Ensign, that's enough. Captain Dirgo, you're an able pilot. I welcome your input. Do you feel that there is an alternative we're overlooking?
No.
Very well. I suggest a steady pace, not a brisk one. We need to ration our energy. Try breathing through your nose. That way it will help to prevent dehydration. I'll lead. Captain Dirgo, will you bring up the rear?
And you were worried about how tough the Captain is?
Did you find water?
No, not yet.
What are you doing with that?
Mister Crusher?
I'm not sure, sir. It's an energy reading.
Energy reading? What kind?
Low frequency EM. It's been getting stronger the closer we get to those mountains.
What are you saying? Is something over there, waiting for us?
I'm not sure what it is. It just keeps registers as a repeating energy pattern.
Ensign, are you suggesting this energy is not naturally occurring?
The readings could be indicative of some electromagnetic properties in the rocks, but I don't think so.
A life form?
It's possible. The pattern is fairly organised.
Well, we can't go back and we can't stay here. We've got to keep going for the mountains. No matter what is waiting there.
There has to be water in here. Aren't caves formed by water?
Not necessarily. This could be created by volcanic activity. Lava flows. These walls are dry, Mister Crusher, do you have any moisture reading?
No, sir. But that EM reading? The pattern's changed. The frequency's peaking a lot higher.
You have water!
I wouldn't hide water. That's called dresci. It's from my planet.
It's alcohol.
It's medicinal. It's for emergencies. I was going to share it with you.
This wouldn't quench your thirst, it would make it worse.
I'll take my chances.
I'm not going to let you waste this. This is more valuable to us as a coolant or disinfectant.
It's mine.
Mister Crusher, stow that with the medical supplies. Keep your eye on it. All right, we're going to explore the cave. Mister Crusher, look for any signs of water, no matter how faint. Captain Dirgo, will you lead the way?
We're projecting that the bulk of the radiation will affect three small island groups. Fortunately, they're very sparsely populated. We'll begin replicating hyronalin now and be ready to transport it to them if it becomes necessary. Please coordinate with all the medical personnel on the planet.
Beverly? We've contacted the nearest Starbase for a search vessel. I'm afraid the closest one is almost a week away.
I see. Thank you.
But we have asked the mining settlement to send any vessels they might have. You know, there are many reasons why the shuttlecraft may have been delayed.
Deanna, thank you, but I'm all right. And for now, I have work to do.
Commander, the miners report that they have very few operable shuttlecraft. They want to know when we will be joining the search.
Tell them to stand by. If this works, we'll be on our way.
Aye, sir.
Thrusters are attached and ready, Commander.
Initiate prefire sequence.
Prefire command transmitted. Thrusters to standby.
Fire thrusters. Gradual acceleration to forty percent power.
We've lost one module. Correcting thrust vectors to compensate.
Structural integrity of the barge has been compromised. Disintegration is continuing.
Shut down thrusters. Ensign, take us to one thousand metres ahead of the barge and hold.
External radiation levels increasing, sir.
Coming into position at one thousand metres.
Worf, extend shields around the ship. Lock on the tractor beam.
Aye, sir.
Warning. Radiation levels at seventy millirads per minute and rising.
Allenby, set a new course. We'll take it through the asteroid belt ourselves. One quarter impulse.
Aye, sir.
Doctor Crusher to the Bridge.
On my way.
Mister Data, I'll a projection of the radiation's impact on the crew. Mister Worf, contact the mining settlement. Tell them we won't be joining the search for awhile.
I knew there had to be water.
Mister Crusher what was that?
It seems to be some kind of tightly confined annular force field, sir.
Put there to protect the water.
Yes. There has to be a way to deactivate it, sir.
We can, with our phasers.
Mister Dirgo, I think it would be wiser
Captain, the EM reading. The power level's really spiking now.
I think it's working.
Dirgo!
Stop firing!
Wesley!
Apply pressure to that wound.  This is the worst break.
What was that thing?
Keep the pressure constant.
Ensign, how bad is it?
Your right leg is broken. You have a fracture in your left arm. And you took a blow to the head. But we're getting the bleeding under control.
Well done. I'm going to be fine. I just need to get my breath.
Are you telling the truth?
What truth?
He's bleeding inside. I've seen it before. He's never going to survive.
You don't know what you're talking about.
You're wasting your time. Will you save that dresci for us.
Mister Dirgo, I would appreciate it if you didn't bury me before I'm gone.
The trouble is, he could be right.
No, he's not, sir. You're going to be fine.
Wesley, you are going to have to keep a rein on Dirgo. He's wilful and stubborn. That's dangerous.
You'll handle him, sir.
Wesley, listen to me. I have no feeling in my right leg. My vision is blurred. I'm going to get worse, not better. I'm not going to be able to help you. Now, you are going to have to stand up to Dirgo on your own.
Yes, sir.
Hey. Good man.
First Officer:First Officer's log, stardate 44307.6. Radiation levels on the Enterprise continue to rise. The ventilation system has started pumping hyronalin into our air supply to counteract the effects.
At the rate the radiation levels are increasing, the hyronalin additive will only be effective for another thirty eight minutes.
Crusher to Medical unit one, evacuate and seal off all non-operational areas. Group the crew and their families in the interior corridors of decks nine and ten. Radiation exposure protocol.
Acknowledged, Doctor.
Mister Data, at our current speed, how long will it take us to get through the asteroid belt?
Fifty one minutes, fourteen seconds, sir.
There's going to be a lot of casualties if we can't get there any faster.
Mister La Forge, how much more can we get out of that tractor beam?
We're already at the maximum limits of our towing speed, Commander.
Let's see if we can establish a new upper limit.
Yes, sir. Data, monitor the shearing effect on the beam. Increasing to one half impulse.
Tractor beam is holding. Shearing force, eighty metric tons per metre.
Increasing to three quarters impulse.
Shearing force ninety two metric tons. Ninety three. Tractor beam is destabilising. Se are going to lose the barge, Commander.
Reduce power.
One half impulse.
Geordi, you've got to stabilise that tractor beam.
I can't divert any more power to the shields. We're already hitting our maximum thermal limits. Only other choice is to bring some other fusion reactors online, but we're running at peak coolant pressure.
Do it.
Warning. Radiation levels at one hundred fifty millirads per minute and rising. Lethal exposure in thirty five minutes.
How did this happen?
That thing did it.
These are selenium fibres. Electrically deposited. The EM pattern is back down. It only peaks when we move towards the water. Whatever we saw must act like a sentry to try to guard the fountain. When we're not moving toward the water, the wave pattern stays low. Right between five and fifteen megahertz. Dirgo, move toward the fountain. Dirgo.
There. It just went to forty.
What is this getting us? We've got to get to the water.
If I can figure out how to manipulate the frequency, maybe I can control it. The sentry first appeared when you used your phaser. That means it could respond to heat, or collinated energy.
If you're right, we can use a phaser to lure it away.
Hold on. We need to know what we're dealing with before we start doing anything.
Enough talking, it's time to do something. I'll start firing. When it comes, you fire and draw it away.
Dirgo, I can't.
Put your phaser on automatic. Leave it on that ledge and take cover.
And what makes you think it's going to go for my phaser and not for yours?
Because I'll be firing on the lowest setting. You use maximum.
There is no evidence that it responds differently to higher settings. We have to figure out our options before we just
While we are doing that, your Captain is dying. With those wounds, most men would already be dead. If he doesn't get water. When I start firing, you better do your part.
First Officer:First Officer's log, supplemental. Mister La Forge has diverted power from auxiliary fusion generators in an attempt to stabilise the tractor beam. This is the only hope of increasing our towing speed so we can clear the asteroid belt before radiation levels become fatal.
Warning. Radiation levels at three hundred millirads per minute and rising. Lethal exposure in one minute.
Ready, Commander. I'll be rotating the output of the auxiliary reactors, but it should still give us the power we need.
Proceed, Mister La Forge.
Increasing to three quarters impulse.
Shearing force is at one hundred three metric tons. Tractor beam is stable.
Full impulse.
Tractor beam is holding.
Warning. Lethal radiation exposure in thirty seconds.
We are within visual range of the asteroid belt.
On screen.
Warning. Lethal radiation exposure in fifteen seconds.
Prepare to cut the barge loose.
Warning. Lethal radiation exposure in ten seconds.
We have cleared the asteroids, sir.
Let it go.
Cold.
When the sun went down, the temperature really dropped. This should help.
Good. Thank you. I'm not much good to you, Wesley.
Sir, Dirgo is dead. I should've tried harder to stop him, but he. Captain! Captain Picard! Sir, stay with me.
I'm trying.
Sir, do you remember when we took the shuttlecraft to Starbase five one five? I was dreading it. Six hours alone with you. But it didn't turn out the way that I thought. You opened up to me. I kind of got to know you.
Wesley, it's my fault that you're here. I shouldn't have asked you.
Sir, I'm honoured you wanted me along.
I was selfish. I thought I wouldn't see you again. I'm sorry.
Sir, in the past three years I've lived more than most people do in a lifetime. I think I'm very lucky. no matter what happens. How many people get to serve with Jean-Luc Picard? Sir, you don't know this. No one knows this, because I never told anyone. All of the things I've worked for, school, my science projects, getting into the Academy, I've done it all because I want you to be proud of me. If there is one thing that I've learned from you, it's that you don't quit. And I'm not going to quit now. I've seen you think yourself out of worse problems than this, and I'm going to think us out of this. You're not going to die. I'm not going to let you die. I'll get to the water and I'll keep you alive until they find us. I promise.
First Officer:First Officer's log, supplemental. The Enterprise is returning to the last known location of the missing shuttlecraft.
Are you certain?
It is definitely debris. The primary material is duranium, with smaller proportions of sonodanite and ermanium.
Most shuttlecraft hulls are made of duranium.
Then they're gone.
Not necessarily, Doctor. There is far too little debris to account for an entire shuttlecraft.
So what is it?
You know, Dirgo had his manoeuvring thrusters rigged a funny way. Claimed it was more efficient. If one of them blew it might have left debris like that.
If only one of his thrusters was out, he could still have set down somewhere.
The only Class M planets in the system are Pentarus two and five, both of which have been thoroughly searched by the miners.
Then we'll search them again.
Sir, there are also four moons in the Pentarus system that could support life.
Have the miners searched them?
Not yet, sir.
Which one is the closest one to the debris coordinates?
Lambda Paz, one of the moons of Pentarus three.
Set a course, Ensign.
Aupres de ma blonde, il fait bon, fait bon, fait bon. Ensign, where are we?
We crashed, sir. We're in a cave.
I need water.
Sir, we don't have any water. Don't you remember? We tried to get to the fountain and Captain Dirgo
Yes, I remember.
I think I'm on to something. I've analysed the sentry's energy patterns.
Wesley, I may not make it.
I've taken the transponder element from my communicator and I've used it to modify my tricorder.
No, listen.
I think I can use it to interrupt the sentry's electrical pattern. Stop it, maybe slow it down.
Listen to me.
Yes, sir.
There's so much I wanted to tell you. The Academy, there's someone, someone who meant a great deal to me. He's been there forever. Someone you must get to know. His name is Boothby. Now, you tell him that you and I were friends. Now, when I was there, he helped me. Listen to him.
What does he teach?
He's the groundskeeper. One of the wisest men I ever knew. Oh, I envy you, Wesley Crusher. You're just at the beginning of the adventure. Go on. Get the water. Stay alive. They'll find you.
I'll be back soon.
Of course. Wesley. You remember I was always proud of you.
It worked!
Captain? Captain Picard? Wake up.
Captain?
Wesley? Wesley. Wesley!
Mom?
Yes.
Oh, mom.
Wesley, thank God!
I am so happy to see you.
You're okay. Come on.
How did you find us?
We found the wreckage, and the arrow which indicated your direction. We'll take Wesley by stretcher as well.
No, I can walk.
Doctor.
We're taking you back to the Enterprise. We've stabilised your vital signs. All right, let's go now.
One moment. Mister Crusher?
Yes, sir.
What are you doing in such a filthy uniform?
You don't look so ship-shape yourself, sir.
Wesley, you will be missed.
We must take care that while he is with us, Commander Kurn is accorded all the rights and responsibilities due the first officer of this ship. If he should feel patronised in any way
I'm sure we'd know. One does not patronise a Klingon warrior.
Your experience on board the Pagh will prove invaluable during the commander's tour. Be sure that the crew is prepared for any unusual orders.
The Klingons are very thorough. I'm sure Commander Kurn has studied for his assignment just as I did when I served with them.
I understand that he requested the Enterprise specifically.
Commander Kurn is ready for transport, Captain.
Energise.
Welcome aboard the Enterprise, Commander. I'm Captain Picard. This is Commander William Riker. He will be yielding the first officer's position to you during your tour.
You are relieved. May I take my station, Captain?
I thought that I might show you your quarters first.
I am ready for duty, sir. I ask that I be allowed to take my station.
Very well. If you will accompany us to the Bridge.
I am Kurn, commander rank, Klingon Defence Force. You will address me as Commander or sir at all times. I am fully aware of all Starfleet regulations and they will be strictly adhered to by all personnel while I am in command. It is my intention to bring a sense of discipline that you may not be accustomed to. With your permission, of course, Captain.
Oh, by all means, Commander.
I have studied all of your service records. Impressive. We shall see if you live up to your reputations. Do you wish to speak, Acting Ensign Wesley Crusher?
No, sir, Commander, sir.
The crew awaits your orders, Captain.
Then take us to the outer cometary cloud, Commander.
Set course one one four mark two three zero, one third impulse power.
Aye, sir.
Execute.
Engaged. Increasing to one third impulse power, sir.
Mind if I join you?
No, sir.
Is there something wrong, Wes? Commander Kurn perhaps?
He just doesn't seem to like me. I can't do anything right for him. Every time I respond to an order he jumps down my throat. I don't know what I'm doing wrong.
Problem, Geordi?
Yes, sir. It's our new first officer.
I take it he found something wrong in Engineering?
Just the entire section. He pulled a surprise inspection in the middle of a maintenance cycle! I tried to explain it to him
But he wouldn't listen.
We're all going to be doing double shifts down there just to ready for the next inspection.
His style of command is just different. Klingons believe in obedience and a strict formality of command.
Yeah, but this isn't a Klingon vessel. He's going to have to loosen up, Commander.
It's not just us. He's been leaning into everybody pretty hard, except
Except the one guy who wouldn't really mind it.
Sensors picking up asteroidal debris ahead, Commander.
Can you identify the coordinates, Mister Worf?
Bearing zero zero one mark point oh three. Range, three hundred thousand kilometres.
Excellent. Please scan the asteroid field for me, Lieutenant, and report.
Approximately two thousand small objects. None in our direct flight path, sir.
So, no course correction is necessary. Is that what you are saying?
It should not be needed, sir.
Very good, Lieutenant. You handled that well.
Yes?
Commander. Captain's mess?
Yes.
Resume.
Your knowledge of our systems and procedures is very impressive, Sir. I would like to make one suggestion, sir.
A suggestion?
When I served aboard the Pagh, the hardest part for me was recognising and adapting to the demands of the crew. They needed an iron hand. I imagine it must be very difficult for you to work with a crew that is so different. I would be happy to guide you in that regard, if it would be helpful.
No, Commander. It wouldn't.
This is not a Klingon ship, sir.
No, Commander, it is not. If it were a Klingon ship, I would have killed you for offering your suggestion.
How long has the bird been dead? It appears to have been lying in the sun for quite some time.
It's not dead, it's been replicated. You do understand that we cook most of our foods.
Ah, yes. I was told to prepare for that. I shall try some of your burned replicated bird meat.
I have attempted to select a menu that will allow you to sample a variety of dishes, Commander.
Try some caviar.
The odour is not palatable. What is it?
The unhatched eggs of a large scaleless
Later, Data. A fish, Commander. A delicacy from the Caspian Sea on Earth It's a favourite of mine. Our replicator's never done it justice, but I managed to store a few cases for special occasions.
I am honoured, Captain.
Are you adjusting to your new environment, Commander?
I find the constraints a bit difficult to conform to. Just a short while ago, I had to stop myself from killing Commander Riker. I believe he was trying to communicate the crew's sense of discomfort with my style of command. Under different circumstances, I would consider that a challenge to my authority.
One of the aims of the exchange programme, Commander, is for all of us to learn tolerance. As for my crew, it may be healthy to shake up the status quo occasionally.
The Commander certainly appears to have the crew on its toes
And then some. No offence, sir.
None taken. I never kill anyone at the supper table, Mister La Forge.
Don't you like it, Commander?
Our food has much more taste to it. While I'm sure this is well prepared, it is far too bland for the stomach of a Klingon.
It seems to agree with Worf.
Yes.
Enter.
'el.
Permission to speak freely, sir?
For what purpose?
I have questions I wish to pose.
Are your quarters so comfortable?
They serve me.
This entire ship seems built on comfort, relaxation, being at ease. It is not the ship of a warrior, not the ship of a Klingon. You cannot ask these questions within the boundaries of protocol?
They are of a personal nature, sir.
Permission granted. Pose your questions.
I wish to know if I have given you offence.
I am not human. If you had given offence, you would not need to ask.
Perhaps I have not performed my duties to your satisfaction?
I find you to be a capable Starfleet officer. A credit to your ship.
Yet you dishonour me at every opportunity.
Have I? I did not know that being polite to a Starfleet officer would bring dishonour on him.
I am a Klingon.
Really? Perhaps your blood has thinned in this environment. I simply don't want to hurt you.
mev yap! So your blood is not so thin after all.
I am a Klingon! if you doubt it, a demonstration can be arranged.
That is the response of a Klingon. The response I would expect from my older brother.
I was barely a year old when you left for the Khitomer Outpost. You, our mother and father were not going to stay long. It was decided that I did not need to go. I was left to stay with our father's friend, Lorgh, until you returned. You never did.
The Starfleet officer that rescued me was told by the Klingon High Command that I had no living relatives.
They assumed that I was killed with the family at Khitomer. Lorgh had no sons. He took me into his family. It was not until I had reached the Age of Ascension that I was told the truth.
So you asked to serve aboard the Enterprise to watch me.
It was an excellent opportunity to see what kind of Klingon you were, or if you were Klingon at all.
Your deception offends me, brother.
It should. But it was required.
To satisfy your curiosity.
No. Much more. You are the eldest son. The challenge is yours to make.
Challenge?
The Klingon High Council has judged our father a traitor to the Empire.
What are the allegations, Worf?
My father is accused of aiding and abetting the Romulan attack on the Khitomer outpost.
The attack in which he himself was killed? But why now, after twenty years?
I do not know, Captain. I will hear the evidence when I arrive. The charge has been made by Duras, the son of my father's greatest rival. Our family name will be disgraced for seven generations. It is my responsibility to clear his name or answer for his crimes.
Answer for them?
The family of a Klingon warrior is responsible for his actions and he is responsible for theirs. If I fail in my challenge, I will be executed. Will you grant my leave, Captain?
No. If I understand correctly, a Starfleet officer, a respected member of my crew, could be accused of a capital crime. Your actions in this matter will reflect on this ship and on the Federation. Therefore, it seems only appropriate that your captain should be at your side while you make your challenge. I'm sure you would do no less for me.
Commander Kurn
Sir.
We're changing course. Set coordinates for the First City of the Klingon Imperial Empire.
We arrive within the hour.
Yes.
The Council will receive you at high sun in the Great Hall of
I know the procedure for the challenge.
You'll need a cha'DIch to defend you. While you are accused, you will not be allowed combat. I would be honoured if you chose me.
I ask you to stand with me, to be my cha'DIch.
jIlajneS. ghIj qet jaghmeyjaj. The two sons of Mogh. Together, we will restore the family honour.
No. For the proceeding, you will not reveal your true father.
I must.
You will not.
Because it would mean my death as well if you fail? A Klingon's honour means more to him than his life. Perhaps your human values have clouded your judgment. I insist.
On this ship, you are my commander, and I obey. In Council chamber, you are my cha'DIch. You do not insist. You obey.
Yes, brother.
I am Worf, son of Mogh. I have come to challenge the lies that have been spoken of my father.
K'MPEC:Worf, son of Mogh, you have challenged the judgment of the council. Are you prepared to answer for this if you fail?
Yes. With my life.
K'MPEC:Why do you come before us, Commander?
I am Kurn, son of Lorgh. I will stand by Worf's side. I am cha'DIch.
You claim a birthright you have forsaken?
I have not forsaken my heritage. I am Klingon. My heart is of this world. My blood is as yours.
Yet you come to us wearing a child's uniform, and you bring outsiders to our Great Hall.
I am here at my own request. I am Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Enterprise.
Your words mean nothing here.
K'MPEC:Duras, let him speak.
Lieutenant Worf has served under my command with distinction. He has earned my admiration and my respect. It is my greatest wish that this Council, in its wisdom, will clear his family name and return him to duty.
K'MPEC:The trust of a commanding officer is admirable. The council has noted it. Speak the accusation.
For many turns, the truth about Khitomer has lain dormant. Unknown. Now the truth has been revealed. The traitor Mogh sent the defence access codes to the Romulan patrol ships, allowing them to destroy the outpost. Thousands died on Khitomer. My father died on Khitomer. Their deaths must be avenged. Your father was a traitor. By posing this challenge, you are a traitor.
You will not wear the emblems of our people. You are a fool and your challenge can only result in a fool's death.
It is a good day to die, Duras, and the day is not yet over.
K'MPEC:The council stands in recess. We will return for the Mek'ba, when the evidence will be presented. Qapla'
Mister Data, find out everything you can about the destruction of the Khitomer outpost. Cross reference with Romulan tactics and strategic information on the region, and request access to the Klingon central information net. Computer, presentation overview of Klingon custom and law pertaining to familial accountability.
Accessing.
In my ready room.
K'MPEC:Worf. I would speak with you. Alone.
K'MPEC:You should not have brought the challenge. There was no risk to you. What does it matter?
I am Klingon.
K'MPEC:Of that I have no question. But your life in the Federation would not be affected by this judgement.
My father
K'MPEC:Is dead. He died long ago. I knew your father, served with him. This is not how I wanted to remember him. We must let the past be and protect what we have now. If you leave before the Mek'ba, no shame will come on you. Return to your ship. Go back to your life. The challenge will be forgotten.
Why would you ask me to lay aside the honour of my father, my family? Are these the words of the council?
K'MPEC:I will not be questioned by you! Leave, now, or you too will be condemned as a traitor.
What Federation starship was closest to Khitomer at the time of the attack?
The USS Intrepid was the first ship on the scene, sir.
Contact Starfleet, request all logs of the Intrepid. Riker to Doctor Crusher.
Crusher here.
Doctor, I want you to look over the medical records from all the rescue vessels that responded to the Khitomer massacre. See if there's any information on the aftermath that might help us.
Understood.
I should have known. Worf was right. It is a good day to die.
The time has not yet come. It does not have to come for many turns. I know who you are, Kurn. Son of Mogh.
What?
It was a wise choice to hide your family name. Do not err by embracing it again, for you only embrace death.
We will see.
Worf has made a choice and he will die for it. You can still be safe. Let him stand alone.
He is my brother. I will not betray him!
Then you will die for him.
What kind of a weapon makes a vicious wound like that?
It is a kut'luch. The ceremonial weapon of an assassin.
Fortunately his metabolic recovery is phenomenal. He will be all right
It does not matter. We should have let him die. Now that Duras knows his bloodlines, we will both be executed.
You sound like you've already lost, Worf.
Commander, I have discovered the basis of the charges against Worf's father. Apparently the Klingons recently captured a Romulan ship with logs that provided new information on the Khitomer attack. They clearly indicate a transmission from the outpost to the Romulan ship moments before the shields went down.
From Worf's father?
They do correspond to Mogh's personal security code.
How can we be sure these records haven't been falsified?
We can cross check them against the Intrepid's sensor logs.
I will try, but the Intrepid was at the edge of sensor range during the attack and we cannot be sure if the scan was complete.
Looks like a pretty good match-up, Data
Both the Intrepid and Romulan logs show a series of distress signals from Khitomer.
What happened there.
Those are gaps in the Intrepid's logs. Missing information due to the range.
That is where Mogh's alleged transmission should be.
Right in the middle of the gap?
Wait a second, Data. Back up. Just before the Intrepid's gap begins, the timebase of both files are in perfect sync. But look. Look at what happens to the signal after the shields are dropped.
They are no longer synchronous.
Commander, somebody's been rewriting history.
I do not pretend to fully understand the nuances of your world's law or culture, Lieutenant, but I do understand when somebody is trying to hide something.
K'mpec urged me to drop my challenge, abandon my family honour. It was impossible to believe I was hearing a Klingon speak
Obviously, they did not expect and never wanted this challenge. You're getting close to something, Lieutenant. Something they care a great deal about protecting.
If it is true, it is not just Duras but the High Council itself that is my enemy. Captain, I must choose another cha'DIch. I would like your permission to ask one of the crew.
Well of course, Lieutenant. Choose whomever you wish.
Then I would ask you to stand with me. You may refuse with no dishonour.
Thank you, Lieutenant. I appreciate the gesture, but I know that there are stronger and younger men from whom to choose.
I can think of no one I would rather have at my side.
jIlajneS. ghIj qet jaghmeyjaj. I accept.
My challenge will proceed. No threats, no treachery will stop it. Not even a trap set for my cha'DIch by a coward.
K'MPEC:Duras!
I will not hear lies from the son of a traitor.
Keep your place, Picard!
This is my place.
He is now my cha'DIch.
This is not your world, human. You do not command here.
I'm not here to command.
Then you must be ready to fight. Something that Starfleet doesn't teach you.
You may test that assumption at your convenience.
I've got something. Worf was not the only survivor of the Khitomer massacre.
Another child?
No. A Klingon woman was found with Worf.
Kahlest. Who was she?
I don't know, but the report said she was severely injured, was transferred to Starbase twenty four for treatment. That was when she was separated from Worf. And after her recovery, she returned home.
We've got to find her, if she's still alive. Data, scan the Klingon central net. See if there's any record of her.
The Romulans lowered the outpost shields themselves. They were given the defense access code! The record clearly show the Romulan patrol ship receiving a personal transmission from Mogh seconds before the shields fell.
Riker to Captain Picard.
Stand by.
The Khitomer commander noted in his log that Mogh had been acting suspiciously.
Go ahead, Number One.
We've located another survivor of the Khitomer massacre, Captain a woman who was found with Worf. Her name is Kahlest.
She resides in the Old Quarter of the First City.
Well done. Picard out.
Another witness has testified that Mogh often spoke of his admiration for the Romulans. Their culture. Their women. Mogh betrayed us, and four thousand Klingons died on Khitomer. Only the son of Mogh survived.
K'mpec. May we have a short recess?
K'MPEC:Len'mat.
Have you heard of a woman named Kahlest?
She was my ghojmoK, my nurse.
It is possible she was an eyewitness to your father's activities on Khitomer.
But she died in the attack.
No, she survived. She's living in the Old Quarter. I'm going to find her.
It is too dangerous. You must not go alone.
Hey, I'm your cha'DIch.
Kahlest?
What do you want?
Your help.
No.
You don't even know what I want.
You are cha'Dich. I know.
Then you also know that Worf's life is at stake.
I cannot help. I am dead. A long time dead.
Were you with Worf's father just before the attack on Khitomer?
No. My life ended on Khitomer. I served a proud family, a strong house. All that is gone.
Worf is not gone. The family you served needs you again.
I cannot help.
Was his father a traitor?
No. Mogh was loyal to the Emperor. Mogh suspected someone of plotting with the Romulans and followed them to Khitomer.
Who? Who was the traitor?
I do not know.
Then we have no way to prove Mogh's innocence, and Worf will die as the son of a traitor.
You must leave now, cha'DIch. I am dead.
My appreciation, madam.
You are brave, cha'DIch. Worf chose well.
Kahlest, would they recognise you? Would they know who your are?
K'mpec would remember Kahlest. I caught his eye back then, but he was too fat.
Come back with me. They won't know how much you know. You may shake loose the truth.
I will come.
The evidence is clear. I would ask that the judgment stand. That Worf be condemned as the son of a traitor to the Empire.
K'MPEC:Worf, son of Mogh, the judgement of
K'mpec!
The Mek'ba is not complete. I bring an eyewitness to the Khitomer massacre, one who has new evidence, K'mpec.
Mogh was innocent.
K'MPEC:Len'mat.
What is it you think you know, old woman?
Do not answer. It is the rule of the Mek'ba that evidence be presented in open council.
She will die before she gives evidence.
K'MPEC:Be silent, Duras. Would you kill an old women to cover your dishonour?
Yes. It is your dishonour we are protecting here, isn't it, Duras?
I have no reluctance to kill you, human.
Are you prepared to hear her evidence in open council?
K'MPEC:Obviously, we would not. Kahlest, you can go now. It is good to see you again.
You are still fat, K'mpec.
K'MPEC:I asked you to leave, to let this challenge go unanswered, but you did not hear my words. And now it's come to this.
Why did you judge my father guilty when you knew he was not?
K'MPEC:Someone had to be blamed. The warriors who captured the Romulan ship had learned of the treachery, but only the Council knew whose security code had been transmitted. Ja'rod, father of Duras.
This ha'DIbaH should have been fed to the dogs!
K'MPEC:His family is powerful. If the truth were known, it would shatter the Council, most certainly plunge us into civil war. You were in Starfleet. We did not expect you to challenge the judgment, nor did we know there was another son of Mogh.
Worf's challenge is successful. The honour of his family must be restored.
K'MPEC:You do not understand. His challenge was defeated before he ever made it. You will not be allowed to present this evidence. The judgment stands. You will be condemned. So will your brother. There is no other way now.
You admit the truth and yet expect him to accept punishment? What does this say of an Empire who holds honour so dear?
K'MPEC:The Empire will not be destroyed for one family's honour.
Unacceptable, K'mpec.
You have no say in this, cha'DIch!
I speak now as the Captain of the USS Enterprise and Lieutenant Worf's commanding officer. You will not execute a member of my crew, nor will I turn his brother over to you.
K'MPEC:This is not the Federation, Picard. If you defy an order of the High Council, the alliance with the Federation could fall to dust.
The alliance with the Federation is not based on lies, K'mpec! Protect your secrets if you must, but you will not sacrifice these men.
I will die for the Empire.
Lieutenant.
The cha'DIch will be silent. Allow my brother to return to his life. Only you need know his true bloodline.
Not acceptable. His honour would demand revenge.
If you allow him to live, I will give you something that will serve your purpose far more than my death. I will accept discommendation.
You would do this in open council?
K'MPEC:It would be the same as admitting your father's guilt, Worf.
So be it.
K'MPEC:Your heart is Klingon. It will be done. What has been said here will never be spoken of again.
You are the son of a traitor.
Now I am ready.
Why is he doing this? I was prepared to die.
Worf wants you to live. The name of your father must someday be cleared. He needs you alive with your honour intact.
But to do this
There will be another day, Commander. Do not forget what he does here today. Do not let your children forget.
tlhIH ghIj jIHyoj.
K'MPEC:biHnuch.
You must also, brother.
Unless it's followed by?
The double bars indicate an elongated S sound.
And the inverted T means to hold the Z.
Unless?
Unless it's followed by three wavy lines, in which case the Z becomes a B.
Exactly.
What a language.
But you spell knife with a K.
I spell knife with an N. But then, I never could spell.
Well, this is an insect mind, sir.
My mind is barely working.
Take a break.
No, no. I want to go over this again.
You could be over-preparing. You've been looking forward to the upgrade of the holodeck. You have the time. Captain, you need the diversion.
Dixon Hill.
The program's installed and waiting.
Programme desired location.
Earth, United States, San Francisco, California.
Time period?
1941, A.D.
File or access code.
File Dixon Hill, private detective.
Enter when ready.
Captain's personal log. I'm entering the ship's holodeck, where images of reality can be created by our computer. Highly useful in crew training, highly enjoyable when used for games and recreation.
Very funny, Dix. What'd you do, lose another bet?
I'm sorry, I don't understand.
The bellboy suit. Are you moonlighting at the Fremont?
The uniform. It's totally inappropriate. I should have changed.
Detective Bell, your cop friend, McNary's new partner, was here nosing around. If he'd have seen you in those threads he'd have you sent to the funny farm. Mister Leech called twice, and there's a lady named Bradley waiting in your office. Nice legs. Not you. Her. Got a hot date with my fella. See you in the morning.
I lost a bet.
Oh well, at least you're ready for Halloween.
Halloween?
I need your help, Mister Hill. Someone is trying to kill me.
Captain's personal log. I'm delighted with how the Holodeck has created the fictional world of Dixon Hill, the twentieth century detective who has been a hero of mine since childhood. The illusion is flawless. The characters I meet are generated by the computer, of course, yet they feel real, they seem real in every way.
I'm not sure who wants me dead. My husband, my stepdaughter.
Or a lover, perhaps?
Perhaps. Or perhaps it's Cyrus Redblock. I need you to find out. Name your fee.
Twenty dollars a day, plus expenses.
Agreed.
I haven't said yes yet.
Oh, you'll say yes, Mister Hill.  If it is Redblock, he must think I've got what he's looking for. But believe me, I don't.
I'll take your word for it.
Here's a C-note in advance. Consider it a retainer.  And next time, wear a suit. Au revoir.
Remarkable. Exit.
You'll have to call again. I'm just leaving. I'm not dressed properly. I'll be back.
Mister Hill? Where are you?
Memory, save current setting.
Current setting saved.
Holodeck off.
And when I looked down into the street, I actually saw automobiles!
Automobiles?
An ancient Earth device used primarily for transportation.
Ah.
Also seen as a source of status and virility. Often a prime ingredient in teenage mating rituals.
Teenage mating rituals?
From that window, I could see an entire, er
City block.
That's right. Sounds, Smells.
You make it sound so real.
That's how it felt.
Incredible.
I'm going to go again, only this time I'm going to dress the part. Why not come with me?
Yes, I'd like that.
I want to take that twentieth century historian.
Who? Whalen?
Yes, Whalen. I bet he knows more about Dixon Hill than I do.
Shall I tell him, sir?
Invite him, Mister Data. This is supposed to be a recreational activity. The sense of reality was absolutely incredible. When that woman kissed me, it was so
Exciting?
Real. The subject of this meeting is the Jaradan rendezvous. Mister Riker, will you go ahead with the briefing.
This is primarily a diplomatic mission. The Jaradan are strategically important to the Federation. Previous attempts have failed because they are so easily irritated. A slip in the pronunciation of the greeting caused a twenty year rift.
The Captain has to recite the entire greeting without making any mistakes.
Simple as that, huh?
Yes. If, on the other hand, the Captain makes even the slightest error
The Captain is well aware of the gravity of the situation, Commander.
We are all aware of the tape of the last Federation starship to come in contact with the Jaradan. It graphically demonstrates what happened when that Captain offended them.
Captain Picard is familiar with that, Data.
Should we not rerun it?
It's not necessary, Mister Data. Meeting adjourned.
Why would the Captain not want to review all available information on the subject?
Data, when you've seen the Jaradan react once, you don't ever have to see it again.
This Dixon Hill is a most puzzling character.
Not really. He was just a twentieth-century Sherlock Holmes.
Ah, but was his modus operandi not dissimilar? Worth investigating.
Indubitably, my dear Data. Indubitably.
Computer request all biographical information on fictional character Dixon Hill.
Working. Character first appeared in pulp magazine, Amazing Detective Stories, copyright 1934, AD. Second appearance in novel The Long Dark Tunnel, copyright 1936.
Request complete text of all stories involving said character. Increase speed.
Captain's log, supplemental. The Jaradan rendezvous still is eleven hours away. I am about to reenter the world of Dixon Hill, this time properly dressed. An experience like this is more enjoyable when shared, so I've invited our fiction expert, Whalen, to accompany me. Doctor Crusher will join us shortly.
Ready for San Francisco, Mister Whalen?
More than ready, sir.
Well, if it's anything like the last time, I'm sure you won't be disappointed
Request permission to accompany you, sir. I am totally versed in the genre of the period.
Well, shall we?
Extra! Extra! Read all about it.
Hey Dix. How's tricks?
Oh, she's fine, fine.
He actually thinks you're Dixon Hill.
Say Mac, I would like to buy a newspaper too, but I don't have any money.
You catch me next time, Dix.
Thank you.  Hitler on the move. Roosevelt presses Congress for British aid. DiMaggio streak reaches thirty seven?
DiMaggio, sir. Jolting Joe, the Yankee clipper.
Baseball, sir. It was a national obsession at the time.
The streak they refer to will eventually reach fifty six games. And be snapped by a pair of journeyman hurlers for the Cleveland Indians.
Cleveland? Ha! They got no pitchers! They ain't never got no pitchers. What are you, nuts or something?
The record will stand until the year 2026, when a shortstop for the London Kings
Hey Dix, what gives with this guy? He's not from around here, is he.
No he's not. He's er, he's from South America.
Yeah. He's got a nice tan.
I should have listened to her. She told me someone was trying to kill her.
Captain, she's a page from a book. That's all she ever was.
Well, well, look what the cat dragged in.
Cat?
Where the hell did he come from?
South America. Can't you tell?
Wherever you're from, while you're in my town, keep your nose clean. Well, tough guy, this time you've really done it. Your goose is cooked but good.
I'm sorry about this, Dix.
Don't apologise to him. Where were you last night between ten and midnight?
That would be a bit hard to explain.
Yeah? Well you'll have plenty of time to come up with something. You're going downtown.
What for?
For the murder of Jessica Bradley. We found this in her purse.
Status report.
We're being probed, sir.
The Jarada.
Most likely, but it's long range. Can't be certain where it's originating.
One could get the feeling they don't exactly trust us.
Commander, I'm receiving a subspace message from the Jarada.
That's not part of the plan. Pipe it through.
En-ter-prise. We speak to you in your language. The time has come to honour us in ours.
This is Commander Riker, First Officer of the Enterprise.
You are not captain?
No sir, I'm not. I suggest we commence with screen to screen communication so we can see each other
You offend us! We will not show ourselves to a mere subordinate. We await your Captain's greeting with growing unrest. End of communication.
Terrific. Find the Captain. He's in the Holodeck.
Aye, sir.
Enter when ready. When ready. When ready.
Hiya Doc. What's cooking?
You know I had some trouble getting through. Where's Captain Picard?
He's on ice.
Pardon?
He's being grilled.
What is he, a fish?
H's being interrogated. They think he's committed a murder.
Why aren't we all being interrogated? Maybe I should go and help him.
No, relax. He's having the time of his life in there.
Well, why should he have all the fun?
Come on, Toots, let's go.
Spill it!
I've told you everything I know.
Well, you'll just have to tell us again. From the top. From the top!
Oh, very good. I've read all this before, you know. It's absolutely as it should be.
Spill it!
LaForge to Bridge.
Riker here.
I can't find the Captain, sir.
I told you, he's in the holodeck.
I'm at the holodeck. Something's gone wrong.
What are you saying?
I can't communicate with him, I can't access the programme, and I can't open the doors.
First Officer:Enterprise log, supplemental. First Officer reporting. Due to an unknown breakdown in the holodeck, we are unable to contact the Captain.
Tasha, take over. I'm going to holodeck three.
Commander? I've studied all the technical manuals on the holodecks, sir. I think I can be of some help down there.
Geordi's well equipped to deal with the situation, Wes. Right now, your duty's here on the Bridge.
Will. His mother's missing too.
Come on, Wesley.
And you say you never met her before she came to hire you.
I've already told you that twice.
Yeah? Well you're going to have to tell me again.
Look fellas, this is no longer amusing.
Easy, Dan!
You think you're tough, Hill, but you're nothing!
Don't take him too seriously, Dix. His old lady's been giving him a hard time. You know how it is.
Actually, I do need to get out of here.
I'll see what I can do.
Something on your mind?
Yeah, nut I'm not sure it can be repeated in mixed company.  You're a pretty hep lookin' broad.
Is that good?
It ain't bad. You like Tommy Dorsey?  I got two tickets for the dance tomorrow night.
Have you tried the intercom?
Yes.
Riker to holodeck. Riker to holodeck!
Are you seeing anything?
No, sir.
What can I do?
Not a thing. We have to go through this millimetre by millimetre.
All right. Get it fixed.
Easy, Wes. Slow it down. If there's an anomaly, you could go right past it, okay?
Okay, Dix, we're cutting you loose.
That's welcome news.
You better not try to leave town.
If I leave town, the town leaves with me. I get the feeling your friend doesn't like me.
We know you're dealing with Redblock, Dixon. Take it from a friend, it doesn't help your case.
Redblock? I'll keep it in mind. Thank you for helping me.
Forget it. Hey, Dix, when are you coming over for supper? The kids'd love to see you, and you know how much you love Sharon's cooking.
Soon, my friend. For the moment, I have other duties.
Blonde or brunette?
She's a lady, all right, and her name is Enterprise.
Sounds like a working girl to me. I'll stop by the office with a bottle of scotch. You can tell me all about her.
Have a good time?
I don't know. Sometimes it almost seemed too real. I must say, you wear it well. I'm glad you could make it.
Why, thank you, Mister Hill.
Maybe we should be getting back to the Enterprise.
We are on the Enterprise.
Oh, yes, of course, so we are.
Do we have time to see your office?
Yes, of course. Why not.
Captain, mind if I join you?
Yeah, me too, boss. I'd love to take a gander.
The holodeck makes excellent use of finite space.
Ah, Mister Hill. You've been avoiding me.
It's Felix Leech! It has to be.
You know me, sir?
Well, I've read about you many times.
I'm very sorry, Mister Leech, but we have to be going. Call again tomorrow.
You're being quite rude, Mister Hill. You haven't even introduced me to your charming companions.
That'll have to wait.
But we have business!  Urgent business.
You're not going anywhere. Not until we have a little chat.
Bridge to holodeck. We're approaching the Jaradan sector.
Any word from the Jaradans?
Not a thing, sir.
They may be testing us. Seeing if we'll stick to the arrangements.
What do we do now, sir?
We wait.
Well, everything checks out so far. Ensign Crusher believes the trouble may have been caused by the Jaradan probe. If so, it could be very difficult to locate.
I am not a man to be toyed with, Mister Hill. You were hired to locate a certain object. I demand to know what you have done with it.
Well, I suppose a few moments longer. I'm afraid I can't help you, Mister Leech. The game is over.
I assure you, this is not a game.
Take it from me, Leech, you'll never find it. Now, give me the gun.
But, they're not real.
There's massive internal bleeding. We have to get him to Sickbay.
How could this happen?
It will happen again if you don't cooperate.
You struck me! How dare you! You're going to be sorry! I promise you, Redblock isn't going to like this!
If we don't get him to sickbay, he will die!
Exit! Computer, exit!  Data, try the other exit in the hall.
Computer, identify exit.
There is a programming malfunction. The computer refuses to identify the exits.
I'm losing his pulse!
Computer, this is the Captain! Computer, identify exit!
Standard orbit, Mister Worf.
Aye, sir. Standard orbit.
Riker to Holodeck.
Nothing yet, Commander.
We're running out of time.
The Jarada will expect the Captain's greeting.
Well you may have to stall them.
It's no use. It's just not there.
Suggestions, Mister Data?
I am at a loss, sir. We are in a holodeck-created building of 1941. The computer refuses to accept voice commands. The controls for the environment are, therefore, not accessible.
I could use some light.
Good day, Mister Hill. My name is Cyrus Redblock. I hope you don't mind us dropping in.
I see I have no choice.
Life is an endless stream of choices. Unfortunately, you have chosen to make my life more difficult. I don't suppose you'd be foolish enough to hide it here.
I don't suppose so.
Still, I'm sure you won't mind if we take a look around.
I wish you'd quit asking, since it's obvious you're going to do it anyway. It's just a waste of time.
Good manners, Madam, are never a waste of time. Civility, gentlemen, always civility. Get that stiff out of here.
He's not dead.
From his pallor, he soon will be.
You want I should throw him in the garbage, boss?
The room next door will be good enough for now.
Don't touch him.
Which one struck you?
It was Hill.
For every action, there is an equal and opposite reaction. A Newtonian truism which you have obviously neglected.
Dix, you in there?
I saw your light, figured you were working late. Guess I was right. Nice company you're keeping, Dix. You forget to take the trash out this morning?
I'm a tolerant man, but I do not tolerate disrespect.
Your devotion to etiquette is highly admirable, sir. However, your methods leave much to be desired.
What have we here?
Looks like a ghost.
Yeah. Where do you suppose he's from?
Where were you hatched, anyway?
I was created on a planet
Data.
South America.
I've been all over this world and I've never seen anything like you.
He's not from this world. None of us are. We are from a world, we're from a world of fabulous riches. A world where there are objects far greater than the one you seek.
That's ridiculous! You're a private dick. We've met before and you never even mentioned any of this.
He's right, Dix. That's pretty weak stuff. I wouldn't even buy that line of guff.
I am not Dixon Hill. I just look like Dixon Hill.
He speaks the truth, sir. From your point of view, he is only a facsimile, a knock-off, a cheap imitation.
Thank you, Mister Data.
Sorry sir, that did not come out quite the way I intended.
Very, very, good. What wonderful fiction. Quite entertaining. I admire your skill at trying to obfuscate our sense of reality.
It is you who are not real, sir.
Data.
It is you who are imaginary characters derived from a work of fiction.
Give it up, fellas. These guys are too smart to fall for that story.
I am afraid you are not real either, Lieutenant.
I don't want to hear any more of this. You're making me crazy. Let me shoot them, Mister Redblock. Let me kill them, one by one.
What an interesting situation. Perhaps we should test this theory by killing one of them.
You've already done that. This man is dying. This whole thing is senseless.
Hardly. Senseless killing is immoral. But killing for a purpose can be quite often ingenious.
Well said, Mister Redblock. What is our purpose?
We are on a quest for knowledge, Mister Leech. We want the item.
We don't have it.
Shall I kill him?
No, kill the woman.
Redblock. I have the item.
At last. I knew it. God, man, you are a character you are. Waiting until the last moment, testing my resolve. All right, where is it?
I'll explain. But first, tell Leech to back off.
Put the gun down, Mister Leech.
But I so much want to kill her.
Maybe later. It won't harm us to listen to Mister Hill.
Don't make any deals with that slime, Dix!
All right, let's begin. Make your thoughts fruitful and your words eloquent. Because I don't have to tell you your lovely lady friend's life depends upon it.
There is a price.
By God, I knew you were a man of stripe. All right, what is it?
Mister Whalen's life. You must help us to save him.
We can't delay much longer.
We're going to have to tell them something. Open hailing frequencies.
Frequencies open, sir.
This is Commander Riker, aboard the Enterprise. We demand that you  Cut that off! They're not going to be satisfied with anyone less than the Captain.
La Forge to Bridge.
Riker here.
We think we have something, sir. I'll let Ensign Crusher explain.
The bi-converter interface has been affected
Forget the explanation! Can you do it?
I don't know if I should. If this isn't done correctly, the programme could abort and everyone inside could vanish.
Do you need more time to study it?
Whether we do it now or later, the risk is the same.
Do it.
If we can find away of getting him to our Sickbay by fixing our computer
Computer? I don't know that word.
An electronic or mechanical apparatus capable of carrying out repetitious or complex mathematical operations at high speed. Computers are used to control, process, perform, or store
Enough! Let me kill him. He's really beginning to irritate me.
Captain, the exit.
That's it. The way into our world.
Remarkable. Is this a two-way passage? Can one enter your world and return to this one simply by stepping through?
Oh, yes. Allow us to help Mister Whalen, and we will return with the item.
You really are a scamp, aren't you. Do you actually think I'd stay here
If you were going to go through yourself, sir, that is not possible.
One look at you, sir, is proof that anything is possible. Step back, Mister Hill. I'd shoot you myself, but I don't want to deprive my assistant of his greatest pleasure. After we've gone, kill them all. Make sure the bodies are never found.
You're insane. You think you can kill a cop and get away with it?
Why not? I've done it before. Come on, Mister Leech. Au revoir et bonne chance, mon ami. Our destiny awaits.
Another world. A whole new world to plunder!
What is this? What are they doing? They can't do this to me! Don't they know who I am? I'm Cyrus Redblock! Cyrus Redblock!
With your permission, sir?
Permission granted.
Data, pick up Whalen. Take him to Sickbay.
And you, sir?
I'll follow. You go now.
I wish I could take you with me.
Someone has to book this creep. Once a cop always a cop, I guess.
I have to go.
So this is the big goodbye. Tell me something, Dixon. When you've gone. will this world still exist? Will my wife and kids still be waiting for me at home?
I honestly don't know. Good-bye my friend.
Captain!
Are you ready, sir?
As ready as I'll ever be, Number One. Open hailing frequencies.
Frequencies open.
This is Jean-Luc Picard, Captain of the USS Enterprise. Aaaaard klaxon leeeeesss blag blan ar'nik ka'nik. Aaaaard krasulaaa. Rassss trassss trasulaaaah.
You have honoured us with your words of greeting. A new day dawns between us.
So, did you have a nice vacation?
It was a nice place to visit, Number One, but I wouldn't want to die there.
So, Data, how was it?
It was raining in the city by the bay. A hard rain. Hard enough to wash the slime
Data!
Sorry, sir.
Lieutenant, take us out of orbit.
Aye, sir.
And, Mister La Forge
Sir?
Step on it.
That's her.
Which one?
The one on the right. Don't stare.
Why not?
Because she'll see.
Good. You must let her see the fire in your eyes.
But what would I say?
Words come later. It is the scent that first speaks of love.
Thanks, Worf. That helps a lot.
Hi, Geordi.
Hi.
So, how have you been?
Good. I, er.
How are things down in Engineering?
Fine. They, they've been fine.
Well, I'll see you around.
I have much to teach you about women.
Mister La Forge, report to Transporter room three.
What's this all about, Commander?
Sensors have discovered a small one-man spaceship crashed on the planet.
We're picked up life-signs, humanoid, very faint and fading.
Radiation levels within acceptable limits.
We can beam him out from under there, get him right up to Sickbay.
He's not stable enough for transport. There's damage to his brain stem, autonomic functions are failing. His heart needs active neurofeedback. It can't regulate itself. I need a volunteer.
Right here.
I'm going to hook your nervous systems to the tricorder. Your brain will regulate both systems. That should stabilise him long enough to get him up to the ship.
Take deep, regular breaths. If anything goes wrong I'll break the connection.
Okay.
Geordi!
I'm fine. No problem.
Transporter room, three to beam directly to Sickbay.
Autonomic responses are still low. Begin cardiostimulation. Sixty cc's of inaprovaline. Massive infection is setting in. Use the protodynoplaser to stabilize his immune system. We need to design a virus that can infiltrate his cell structure and boost his ATP production.
What about Commander La Forge. He's waiting in the diagnostic centre.
I need you to give him a full bioscan. See if there's any residual effect from that energy discharge during the neurolink. Keep his arm in cryogenic stasis until the vital signs are strong enough to begin surgical procedures.
From the size and shape of the wreckage, it appeared to be some kind of escape pod. Their control system was badly damaged, which is probably what caused the crash.
An escape pod? Then he couldn't have travelled very far. Mister Data, are there any other signs of ships in this area?
I am picking up a scattering of debris in extended orbit around the planet. It reads as refined metals and other synthetic compounds.
The remains of a larger vessel. He must have left in the pod before the ship was destroyed.
Sensors show trace elements in the debris that would indicate phaser fire was recently exchanged.
Were you able to salvage anything else from the escape pod?
This is all that was left from their computer system.
Mister Data, can you access it?
It will take time, sir. Downloading this into our system will require fabrication of a matrix translator to emulate the alien's computer system.
Keep me apprised of your progress.
Aye, sir.
Limb re-fusion appears to be successful, Doctor. Tissue oxygenation is within norms.
That's all we can do for now. We won't be able to test neuromuscular function for a few days.
Ah, Geordi.
Can I go now, Doc?
No need to keep you here. Your bioscan came out negative.
Could've told you that. I feel great.
How's your patient?
I never thought he'd make it this far. There was major trauma to his head and chest cavity, massive plasma loss, and severe damage to most of his organs.
What are his chances?
I believe he's going to live. I'm afraid I can't take the credit for it, though. His body seems to have amazing recuperative powers. The damaged tissue seems to be repairing itself at a phenomenal rate. There's one thing that troubles me though.
What's that?
Take a look at this.
Cell regeneration?
Yes. The thing is, it has nothing to do with the injuries. These are undamaged cells that seem to be mutating.
Do you have a theory as to the cause?
No. I've never seen anything like it in my life. There is a possibility that it's part of his natural healing process. I hope it is, because there's nothing I can do to stop it.
I'm telling you Data, there's got to be some way to decode the information in this thing.
I agree Geordi. But the data matrix within the capsule does not correspond to any standard format. All we have been able to determine is that the device contains a chemically based system for molecular energy encoding.
Yeah, and the computer still can't analyse the specific chemical elements involved. It's got to be part of the data processing system. What if it's a feedback loop controller?
The compact shape does suggest a rapid chemical processing and storage capacity.
We found it near the escape pod's instrumentation assemblage. This capsule might process the ship's dynamic motions and augment its manual control inputs. We could send it a few test signals, make it think the entire assemblage was awake and operating.
An intriguing experiment. The capsule might provide us with information without the need to decode the storage medium itself. Perhaps we should examine your theory immediately.
Less talk, more synthahol. We came here to relax.
I am relaxed. In fact, I've never felt better. But you know, Worf, you're right. The storage capsule can wait awhile.
Christi, you're not leaving, are you?
I was just on my way down to the arboretum.
Would you care for some company?
I'd love some, but I didn't think you were interested in that kind of thing.
There are a lot of things you don't know about me.
I've been tutoring him. He learns very quickly.
Medical Officer:Medical Log, Stardate 43958.8. I have removed patient John Doe from the emergency bio-support unit. In just thirty six hours, most of his major organ systems have regenerated themselves to the point where they can now function on their own.
I am alive?
You certainly are.
Thank you for my life. Tell me, who am I?
Captain's log, stardate 43960.6. Our mission to map the Zeta Gelis star cluster is proceeding on schedule. Meanwhile, Doctor Crusher reports that the recovery of the patient she has named John Doe continues at a remarkable pace.
Are you experiencing any discomfort?
None. I can feel the life returning to my body.
Your neurofibre waves are functioning almost normally again. That puts you about six weeks ahead of my original schedule.
That should give you and your colleagues something to talk about.
You are all we've talked about since your arrival.
I believe I'm ready for the next phase of my treatment.
You are right. It is time you stopped taking up valuable bed space. Now these motor-assist bands will provide you with electrical stimulation for your arms and legs. They will help you re-learn how to control your muscles again. But remember, you've been off your feet for almost a month, so don't be disappointed if at first your mobility is restricted. Your limbs are still weak.
I appreciate your concern, Doctor, but I think I may surprise you again. I feel strong enough to fly.
Whoops.
Perhaps I should concentrate on walking first.
Let's try again, a little more slowly this time.
Much more slowly.
I envy your reflexes, Captain.
I envy your strength of will. Doctor Crusher has been keeping me informed of your progress. It's quite extraordinary.
I have an extraordinary doctor. She gave me back my life. I hope that I am worthy of her efforts.
Are you still unable to recall anything about your past?
Unfortunately, Captain, my memories begin the moment I woke up in Sickbay. Doctor Crusher told me you think I was in some kind of battle. PICARD I'm quite sure of that. Have you any idea how you came to be in that escape pod, or what happened to the ship?
No. Believe me, Captain, it's a horrible feeling not knowing who you are or where you're from.
Have you tried synaptic induction?
His neural nets don't conform to any known patterns. Conventional neurotherapy has proven ineffective. Hopefully, in time, his memory pathways will reestablish themselves naturally.
That same pain?
Yes. I think I've made enough progress for one day.
Not a relapse I hope.
This is nothing to do with his previous wounds. I think this has something to do with the continuing mutation of his cell structure.
You still have no theory as to what's causing it?
It doesn't make any sense.
I seem to be a mystery, Doctor. To you and to myself.
Well, this is where I get off. See you tonight in Ten Forward?
Yeah, I'll be there.
Hello, Commander.
Miss Henshaw.
Bridge.
Deck six.
So, you and Miss Henshaw have been seeing a lot of each other.
Every night this week.
Is that all? I thought you'd been walking around with that smile on your face a lot longer than that.
I guess I have. This whole last month or so everything seems to be going my way. I don't know what it is, but something sure has changed around here.
The only thing that's changed is you.
Me? I'm the same old guy I always was.
If you say so. I don't remember the old Geordi having that much success with Miss Christi Henshaw.
Well, maybe I am a little bit more confident than I used to be.
What happened to you?
O'BRIEN:I was kayaking in the holodeck again.
You dislocated your shoulder. Sit down, I'll get the osteotractor frame.
Hi mom. We still on for dinner tonight?
Seven thirty sharp. I'll be right back.
Kayaking again?
O'BRIEN:Yeah.
How's my mom's favourite patient?
Judge for yourself.
Not bad.
Your mom promised me a tour of the ship tomorrow. You may find this hard to believe, but Sickbay can be an incredibly boring place to be.
O'BRIEN:Hey, Doc! I'm dying here.
Don't worry my friend. You'll be alright.
O'BRIEN:The pain's gone.
It's completely healed. I don't understand. What did you do?
I don't know. It was instinct. I just touched him.
I've run every test and scan on him that I can think of, and yet there's no physiological evidence to indicate that he would possess such powers. But then, there's so much about John that's a mystery.
You know, I really like him.
He does have a certain charm doesn't he? The entire medical staff has commented on it.
You seem a little taken with him yourself.
He has a strength and serenity that I find very attractive. And yet he's vulnerable. I guess I find him intriguing.
Seems like there's a little more to it than that.
Is this your way of asking me if I'm getting romantically involved with him?
You said it, I didn't.
My feelings toward him aren't romantic exactly. I mean, I know that the doctor-patient relationship can sometimes create a false sense of intimacy, but this is different. There's an almost spiritual connection. I guess I'm not making any sense, am I?
I think I understand.
Data, I was thinking about the storage capsule last night and I was wondering, what if we've been going about this thing the wrong way? We've been trying to analyse its mechanical properties. What if it is a biochemical storage medium?
Are you suggesting that it employs memory RNA like an organic cell?
Well, it does contain quantities of nucleic acids.
Perhaps the information sequences are encoded in the molecular patterns themselves.
Computer, scan the storage capsule. Analyse molecular sequences on nucleic acid chains.
Well. what do you know. A navigational chart.
It appears that your hypothesis was correct, Geordi.
I knew it. Captain?
Found something?
We have determined that the storage cube from John Doe's escape pod contains navigational information.
Can you match these stars to our charts?
Computer, run transformational matrix calculations. Match navigational referents to known stars in this sector.
Information on this sector is incomplete. No correlation.
I'm not giving up yet. Not after coming so close to cracking this thing. You know, that might be flight path information from John's ship, but without a frame of reference, I can't determine its origin points.
Computer, assume those paths are course corrections and derive gravitational values for stellar objects near those flight paths.
Most of these are ordinary G-type stars. This would appear to be a neutron star, possibly a pulsar.
Which means that this might be a rotational time reference.
Computer, assume these symbols are pulsars. Translate associated values into standard temporal notations. Computer, is there a pulsar with a rotational period of one point five two four four seconds within sensor range?
Affirmative.
Bingo! Now, Computer, overlay navigational chart using referenced pulsars and project a flight path back to it's origin.
Flight path originated at bearing zero zero three, mark zero one five. Distance, two point three parsecs.
That's it, Captain. That's where John Doe came from.
That bearing is almost directly along our planned course, sir.
Good. Then we can continue our mission without significant interruption.
Home?
Yes. Using the information we found in your escape pod, we may be able to return you to your people.
I cannot go back.
Why is that?
You must not take me home, Captain.
John, your memory, has it returned?
All I know is that we came out here to escape.
Escape?
There were others with you?
Yes, I was not alone. But what happened to the others, or what we were escaping from, I cannot remember. But I do know you must not take me back. Not yet.
We will not arrive in your star system for at least three weeks. That will give us plenty of time to discuss this further.
Hopefully, by then you will have regained more of your memory.
You're right, of course, Captain. I apologise for my outburst.
It's understandable.
This ship is astounding. It seems to stretch on without end.
We can see the rest of it some other time. This is your first day out of Sickbay and I don't want you to overexert yourself.
This looks like an ideal place to rest.
My thoughts exactly.
Truly remarkable.
What is?
These people. They're all so different from one another yet they work together freely.
That surprises you?
It is new to me. My people are different somehow. If only I could remember. Yesterday, for one terrifying moment, there was clarity.
You mean the energy pulse?
Yes. For that moment my purpose seemed clear, and then it was gone.
The pain, the energy pulse, must be linked to the cell mutation in the body. I wish I could help you find the truth.
Beverly, you've done so much for me. I only wish there was some way I could repay you.
But you have. The friendship we've developed has made me very happy.
The rapport that exists between us also means a great deal to me. But I am on some kind of journey. Whatever brought me here, whatever is happening to my body, is all part of that journey. And I must complete it before any other consideration.
Sir, I am reading a vessel on long range scanners. It is coming from sector nine five six nine.
What configuration?
Impossible to identify at this distance. However, it is on an intercept course.
Captain, the ship is travelling at warp nine point seven two.
Warp nine point seven two?
Time to intercept?
At present course and speed, ten hours fifty three minutes.
Try and hail them, Mister Worf.
No response, Captain.
Keep monitoring their approach. Repeat the hail every half an hour.
Aye, sir.
Whoever they are, they're in a big hurry to get here.
Doctor Crusher, medical emergency, room four.
I can't make it stop.
John, tell me. Is it worse than before?
Much worse.
Should I get something for the pain?
No. The readings are fluctuating too wildly. Besides, it wouldn't do any good. His entire cell structure is transforming.
I have to leave, Beverly.
John, where do you have to go?
I must get off this ship.
That's impossible. Not in your condition.
I must!
Security.
Okay, let's realign the magnetic inducer on the starboard nacelle.
John!
Leave the control booth immediately!
John, listen to me. You must come down. I'll try to help you.
Step away from the controls.
Get back. Please, stay away.
I have no wish to harm you, but you must return to Sickbay immediately.
No. Do not come any closer. I cannot control over what is happening to me.
His neck is broken. No life signs. Sickbay, form a resuscitation team. I have a code seven in shuttlebay two. Transporter room, stand by.
Hold it.
No, don't.
Hold still.
Doc.
I can't believe it. There's no trace of injury.
You admit you were trying to steal a shuttlecraft.
Yes.
So I ask you again, why?
I don't know.
Unacceptable. You had a reason. I want to know what it was. Damn it, you nearly killed a member of my crew.
And healed him.
I'm not forgetting that. That's the reason he's here and not in the brig.
I warned him. I told him it was dangerous.
Why? Why was it dangerous? What is happening to you?
I don't know.
The rate of metamorphosis is accelerating. It's almost as if your body were generating an electrical field that's warping the tissue.
Who are you? What are you?
I'm afraid. For myself. For all of you. I have to get away. Isolate myself. Whatever is happening to me, it's dangerous.
As Lieutenant Worf discovered.
I don't want to hurt anyone. Captain, for the sake of your crew, let me go before this happens again.
John, I don't believe you're capable of harming any
Captain, the alien vessel is coming within weapons range. Its shields are up.
I'm on my way. I want him kept under constant surveillance.
John, I really want to thank you.
For what?
I don't know how, or even why, but down on the planet you gave me something. A new confidence.
I doubt I can take credit for that. Perhaps I only helped you find something you already had.
Captain, on screen. Alien vessel approaching at half impulse, sir. Heading zero five one mark one one four.
Raise shields. Slow to one third impulse power. Bring us to one zero three mark zero two five. Mister Worf, hail the alien vessel.
They continue to ignore our hails, sir.
They are scanning us, Captain.
They are answering our hail, Captain.
On screen.
Sunad.
You know him?
Yes. I don't know how, but he's dangerous.
I am Commander Sunad of Zalkon. You are trespassing into our space and you are holding a Zalkonian citizen.
I'm Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the United Federation of Planets. We do not intend transgression of
You will return him to us immediately.
Sunad, this individual is a guest aboard our ship. We found him dying in a shipwreck. We returned him to health.
Then you aided a criminal. He is one of four escaped prisoners. We eliminated the other three. We thought this one dead as well. Return him so we may complete our task.
Of what is he accused?
He is a disruptive influence. He spreads lies. He encourages dissent. He disturbs the natural order of our society.
In what way?
It is not your concern. I will give you two hours to comply.
Tactical analysis.
The Zalkonian ship has a formidable armament. Their weaponry is comparable to ours.
They're as fast and probably just as manoeuvrable.
Counsellor, do they mean to carry out their threat?
I believe so. Sunad's hatred for John was evident but there's something else. The Zalkonians are afraid of John.
Commander Riker, Counsellor, Doctor. John, I want you to join us. Mister Data, you have the Bridge. Mister Worf stay at Tactical. Counter any moves the Zalkonian makes.
Aye, sir.
I can neither confirm nor deny what the Zalkonians told you.
They make serious accusations against you.
Their accusations may be true. I don't know. I don't believe that I am a criminal.
You understand the difficult position in which I'm placed.
Completely, and I refuse to place your ship in danger. If necessary, I will surrender to them. But I am convinced there's more at stake here than my life. There's something important I must complete. My survival is vital. If I could explain it, I would.
I'll inform you of my decision shortly.
Captain, you can't seriously be considering
We must consider all options, Doctor, and not let our personal feelings impede our judgment.
You're going to tell me it's irrelevant that we'd be sending him to his death.
Whether we approve of the Zalkonians' intentions is not the issue. But for what it's worth, I believe John is correct that his existence has broader ramifications than that of a simple criminal.
Sunad thinks so. He feels personally threatened by John.
Sunad called John a disruptive influence. That's hardly a capital offence.
It's not up to us to judge their laws, Doctor.
I know how I would feel if the situation were reversed, if they were in our territory holding a Federation citizen.
The Zalkonians truly don't understand our indecision about returning John. In their eyes, we shouldn't even be involved.
But we are involved. I saved his life. For what? So that they could chase him down and take away that life away?
Picard, we will not tolerate more delays.
Commander, let me remind you we are on a mission of exploration. Our purpose is to establish peaceful relations with the civilisations we encounter.
We do not want relations with you.
If that is your wish, we will respect it.
We simply want you to leave Zalkonian space as soon as you return the criminal.
Commander, we will leave. It is not our policy to intervene in the affairs of other cultures. But before I return the survivor to you, I would appreciate a more detailed explanation of what he has done to merit a death sentence.
As I said. it is not your concern.
Agreed. However, there are circumstances of which you may be unaware. The survivor has suffered a memory loss. He's therefore ill-equipped to defend himself against your accusations.
There is no defence. Our judgment is final.
There's something else. Since his recovery, he's manifested unusual abilities.
What kind of abilities?
He apparently has the power to heal injuries with a simple touch.
Lies.
And even to reverse death itself.
Obviously he has corrupted you as well. I see I am wasting my time.
I can't breathe.
It's come back to me, Beverly. I know who I am. What I am.
Ready all weapons.
You will no longer harm these people, Sunad.
Fire upon that ship.
Do not be afraid. I won't hurt you.
Kill him, Captain. He's evil.
You could learn from these people, Sunad. They do not fear me.
They don't know how dangerous you are, you and the others like you.
That is what you and the other leaders have maintained for generations, but it is not true. Captain, my species is on the verge of a wondrous evolutionary change. A transmutation beyond our physical being. I am the first of my kind to approach this metamorphosis. They tried to convince us it was a sickness we would never survive, that the pain and energy pulses would kill us. They claimed we were dangerous so they destroyed anyone who exhibited the signs of the transfiguration.
We were protecting our society.
By murdering us? You saw the mutations as a threat to your authority. You were terrified of something you couldn't understand. Some suspected that what was happening to them was not evil. Four of us decided to flee Zalkon and let the metamorphosis take its course. You hunted us down, killed the others, but I survived with the help of a kind and generous people.
There is nothing to fear. You can join me. All Zalkonians can. Let me show you.
Don't touch me!
As you wish. But others will listen now that you can no longer prevent me from telling them the truth. Those who are willing will follow me.
Sunad is back aboard the Zalkonian vessel, Captain.
My people are about to embark upon a new realm, a new plane of existence, thanks to you.
It is our mission to seek out life in all forms. We are privileged to have been present at the emergence of a new species.
Beverly, you gave me life and more. I do not have the words for my gratitude nor my sorrow at leaving you.
I took advantage.
No, no, Lieutenant, the advantage was yours. Come again. En garde.
Interesting move, sir, but what technique was that?
The technique of a desperate man.
Interesting move, sir, but what technique was that?
The technique of a desperate man.
Captain, what was that?
Picard to Bridge.
Captain?
Number One, did something unusual just occur on the Bridge?
Yes, sir. We experienced some kind of loop where everything repeats itself.
Here too. I'm on my way.
Report, Mister Data.
Sensors show nothing, sir, but it appears a moment in time repeated itself exactly for everyone.
Just like a feeling of deja vu.
Reports from all decks coming in, sir.
Computers were also affected, which would indicate the phenomenon was not an illusion but occurred in real time.
Number One, find out if anything similar happened in this sector.
Sir, I am receiving an emergency transmission from the Pegos Minor system.
Put it on.
Five four two point two. I repeat. This is Doctor Paul Manheim. We are in need of help. Urgent. All ships, please respond. I repeat. Coordinates are six six seven two eight point nine
It is an automated signal, sir. I am unable to establish contact.
Shut it off. Mister La Forge, lay in a course on those coordinates.
Aye, sir.
Captain, you act as if there's a connection between the time distortion and the distress signal.
There is. Paul Manheim. Fifteen years ago he went off to work on experiments relating to non-linear time. It appears he may have achieved some measure of success. Speed warp eight.
Aye, sir. Warp eight.
Engage.
Estimated arrival Pegos Minor, four hours, thirty five minutes, seventeen seconds.
I've never heard of Paul Manheim.
Mister Data.
A highly respected scientist, considered a visionary, he advanced several time-related theories. One regarding the relationships between time and gravity was quite intriguing. But neither that theory nor any other received wide acceptance.
Fifteen years ago, he assembled a team of scientists to expand that research. They disappeared. Haven't been heard from since.
Did you know him, Captain?
I knew of him. He was teaching at the University when I was in Paris, but I didn't have the pleasure. I must change. Number One, inform me half an hour before we reach those co-ordinates. Keep trying to determine if the time distortion was specifically located on the Enterprise.
Yes, sir.
Captain? Excuse me.
Yes, what is it, Counsellor?
I think you would prefer to discuss this in private.
That's not necessary. Go on.
When Professor Manheim's name was mentioned, you reacted with intense emotion.
Yes. Please get to the point.
I don't want to interfere with your personal life, but unresolved strong emotion can affect judgement.
Well, thank you for your concern.
As Ship's Counsellor, I offer my assistance.
What do you suggest?
Confronting deep personal issues is not easy for you. You tend to suppress them. There are a few hours until we arrive. Perhaps you should use this time to analyse your feelings and put them into perspective.
Thank you, Counsellor. If I should need you further, I'll let you know.
Bridge. Belay that. Computer, estimated arrival at Pegos Minor.
Two hours, nine minutes.
Holodeck three.
Computer, this is Captain Picard.
Holodeck three is clear.
Location, Paris, Cafe des Artistes, as it appeared twenty two years ago. April the ninth, fifteen hundred hours, three o'clock. Warm spring day.
Programme complete.
Monsieur, welcome to the Cafe des Artistes. Is this your first time in Paris?
No.
This way.
That table.
Mais oui, bien sur, monsieur. We are here to please you.
I've been away far too long.
Some wine, some cheese?
I'm not very hungry. I really came for the view.
Perhaps what you hunger for is not on the menu.
Perhaps not. It was many years ago, I had a rendezvous. I was to meet someone. Someone here, at this very table.
Your young lady, she did not come?
Actually, I don't know. I always imagined that she did.
You, however, did not. Ah. Well, trust Edouard. I will bring something very special, just for you.
Let's go. We've waited long enough.
Fine. You go. I'll stay a little longer.
He's not coming, Gabrielle.
No, after last night, I know he will. I just know.
Then he would be here. You are making a fool out of yourself, and I will not watch.
Do we know each other?
No.
The way you look at me, do I remind you of someone?
No. Yes, you do, somewhat.
He's not coming. Why? What did I do to drive him away?
Maybe you did nothing. Maybe he had no choice. Maybe he was afraid.
Of what? Of me?
Oh, of being connected, rooted. Perhaps if he's as young as you are, he doesn't know yet exactly what he wants to do. Maybe. Enough of this self-indulgence. Exit.
Captain, we've received communication from the freighter Lalo, as well as from a farming colony on Coltar Four. Both described the same time distortion. The Captain of the Lalo described it a hiccup.
Hiccup?
Actually sir, that may be an incorrect analogy.
How so, Data?
A hiccup is a spasmodic inhalation with closure of the glottis. accompanied by a peculiar sound. If we were to continue this analogy to a body function, what occurred would be best represented by a
That's enough, Data. Have you been able to learn more specifics about the Manheim project?
All I have found sir, is what you already know. Manheim was concentrating on time gravity experiments when he left.
Captain, we've reached the coordinates specified. There's nothing here.
I'm receiving new coordinates. It's a relay signal. Same source as the first one.
What are they, Worf?
Six six four point eight by one three two three point seven by four nine four nine point nine.
Very remote area, sir. It's in the middle of the Vandor system, a binary star system. Main star's a B class giant, the companion star's a pulsar.
Set course for the new coordinates, Mister La Forge.
Aye, sir.
Why is he making it this difficult to find him?
Hopefully he'll tell us, Number One.
We have reached the coordinates, Captain.
Sensors indicate it is Vandor Four, a planetoid in elliptical orbit around the binary system.
Standard orbit, Mister La Forge.
Aye, sir.
Give me a visual.
Viewscreen on. There's a small forcefield on the planet. Latitude twenty degrees, nine minutes north. Longitude forty degrees, two minutes east of the present terminator.
Penetrable?
No, sir.
Open hailing frequencies.
Hailing frequencies open, sir.
This is Captain. This is the Captain of the USS Enterprise responding to your signal for help.
Enterprise, thank you for hearing us. Where are you?
We're in orbit around Vandor now.
Then you can help me. I don't know what to do. It's only the two of us left. He's having convulsions. Please.
Can you lock on to her coordinates?
No, sir. The forcefield is preventing any kind of contact other than audio.
There is a force field at your location.
Yes. I know.
Good. But it is preventing us from helping you. Now, you must find some way to shut it down.
I'll try.
Force field is off.
Good. Lock onto their coordinates. Beam them up directly to Sickbay. Doctor Crusher, prepare for a Medical Emergency. Two to beam directly up to Sickbay.
We'll be ready, Captain.
That's where I'll be. Number One. Mister Data.
I'll help. Easy. Easy.
I've got his legs. How long has he been like this?
Several hours at least. He was in his lab, so I can't be sure.
I need to do some tests.
Er, I, er.
Jean-Luc. I thought the voice sounded familiar.
Hello.
I should have known. Who else would have charged to my rescue?
This is my First Officer, Commander William Riker. Lieutenant Commander Data. This is Jenice Manheim.
A pleasure, Mrs. Manheim.
Thank you.
I have a number of questions for you.
I hope I can be of some help.
Why don't we sit down?
You said there were only two of you left. What happened to the rest of the crew?
They were working in the second lab. Something happened there a few weeks ago. They were all killed. It was a terrible accident. I don't know exactly what happened. So many brilliant, wonderful minds, just gone.
Do you know the nature of Doctor Manheim's work?
Paul's always been interested in time. He's never believed that it was immutable, any more than space is immutable. Over the last decade, he came to believe that we reside in one of infinite dimensions, and what holds us here is the constancy of time. Change that and it would be what he called opening the window to those other dimensions.
Which begins to explain what happened.
Have you been experiencing something up here?
Yes. What is emanating here is having repercussions light years away, maybe even further.
That would explain his anxiety. I had no idea it had gone so far beyond Vandor.
Why this place? Why Vandor?
All I can tell you about that is Paul and the rest of the team searched for two years to find it. Vandor's exactly what they needed. A planetoid around a binary star.
Because of the dense gravity of the pulsar.
Did your husband ever attempt to define these dimensions, give you an idea of what he expected?
No. But he did say that he was very close to proving his theories. And then the accident.
Did he anticipate that these experiments might be dangerous?
I didn't think so. Now, in retrospect, he probably did. That would explain all the unusual precautions he began taking, even before the accident. The force field, the elaborate security system. Every time he started a new experiment, he insisted that I stay in what he said called a protected room.
Ah, and that's why you weren't affected.
Jean-Luc, he would never knowingly do anything to hurt anyone.
Yes, I believe that.
But as he saw his goal getting closer, seeming possible, he became more and more obsessive. Maybe that clouded his judgement. This is not how I imagined seeing you again.
Nor I you.
You've done well. A great starship in the far reaches of the galaxy. It's everything you'd hoped.
Not exactly. Nothing works just as you hope. If you can't tell us any more, I need to send a team down to the lab.
You can't. It's protected. One of the other scientists made sure no one could get in.
Excuse me.
Is he worse?
He's resting. But I'd like you to undergo some tests as well. My nurse will start them.
Thank you for your kindness, Doctor.
She's an old friend.
I gathered that. It's her husband I'm more concerned with at the moment.
What's the prognosis?
I believe he's dying. His neurochemistry's been affected, but I don't know how or why. I've never encountered anything like it before.
How long does he have?
Maybe a couple of days. It's hard to predict. All I can do is maintain him or attempt to maintain him until I find out what's causing the damage.
Can we talk to him?
Not now. Not yet.
Incidentally, Captain, the effects of the time distortions are now being felt in the Ilecom system.
Bridge. In the past decade, Manheim has turned some vague theories into a practical application.
Yes, but without his help, I'm not sure we'll be able to pose any intelligent questions, let alone come up with any solutions.
Incidentally, Captain, the effects of the time distortions are now being felt in the Ilecom system.
It's us before we stepped into the turbolift.
PICARD 2:It's happening again.
DATA 2:I feel no disorientation.
Nor do I.
What was that?
I believe what could be termed the Manheim Effect is becoming more pronounced.
This is where we started, if we are us.
Oh, we are us, sir, but they are also us. So indeed, we are both us at different points along the same time continuum.
Bridge.
What have you learned?
We have completed a scan of the planet surface.
We've discovered the second lab is on the far side of the planet, completely destroyed. Unable to determine what caused it. Otherwise, very little to clarify the situation.
Our sensors show an immense volume of energy emanating deep within the planet, and concentrated near Manheim's remaining laboratory.
How is the energy being used.
No idea.
What's it's source?
I cannot be sure, sir, but I believe Manheim has developed a method for harnessing energy from the pulsar.
It comes down to this, Captain. We've learned everything we can from here, and we are no closer to understanding it than we were twelve hours ago. Manheim is unable to help us, but hopefully, having been a good scientist, he kept notes.
I would need to study Manheim's records.
And in order to do that we're going to have to go down there.
What about the defence system Mrs. Manheim spoke of?
It may have been connected to the main system, and when she lowered the shield she may have turned that off as well. If not, we'll deal with it as best we can.
Prepare your team.
Aye, sir.
Coordinates set?
Yes, sir.
Energise.
There's a lack of integrity at the landing point.
I'm losing them.
Bring them back. Now. Chief Herbert, what's going on?
There seems to be some kind of strange bouncing effect.
I can't get them to materialise. My readings aren't complete.
Keep trying.
What are we doing back here?
You're lucky you made it back at all, sir.
Where am I?
Paul. Thank God. You're on the USS Enterprise. They answered your distress signal.
I sent one.?
Oh, Paul, you're going to be just fine.
I am not fine, Jenice. I'm not even close to fine.
Bridge, this is Doctor Crusher. Professor Manheim is conscious.
Remember, it was worth it, what happened. What will happen, all of it, it was all worth it. Again. It's changing again.
What is? What do you see?
I'm having difficulty.
With what? Are you in pain?
I have been on the other side. I have touched another dimension. Part of me is still there.
Help him.
Try to stay calm, Doctor Manheim. I don't think it's going to help you struggling against it.
My mind is floating between two places. It is difficult to know which is which. There is no way to explain it.
Doctor Manheim, I'm Captain Picard.
The same one?  She has told me about you. Not all, but enough.
We need your help. The situation is not good.
It will get worse.
What do we do? How do we stop it?
I'm having difficulty holding the moment.
Doctor, this is Lieutenant Commander Data. Will you explain the situation to him?
I am fully versed, sir, on all your theories regarding time and gravity.
How is that possible? I am not even fully versed on all of my theories.
I am an android.
Android? On a Starfleet vessel?
I am the only one, sir.
Your knowledge is useless, because the work we have done here has made most of those theories obsolete.
Then you have harnessed a dynamic energy source.
Then you do understand. Yes. We were able to locate an energy source in the centre of this planetoid. We learned to enhance it, to focus it. Everything worked too well. The energy from the pulsar, the energy from the planetoid. We opened a crack, a window into another dimension.
The time distortion we felt.
Felt? Then it is not confined to the planetoid?
The range is at least several thousand light years.
Captain, it must be stopped! You must help me to execute a controlled shut down of this experiment. Get my notes, they're in the lab.
How do we bypass the security system?
I'll give you the correct coordinates to beam safely down to Vandor, and the codes you need to bypass security systems to get into my lab.
If what the Professor has given me is accurate, it is possible to repair the damage. But it must be perfectly timed to coincide with another time distortion episode.
Can we predict the timing?
I believe so, sir.
We have to. If we don't seal that hole, this other dimension he's opened will rip into the fabric of the galaxy. Reality as we perceive it will not be the same. Lieutenant Worf.
Yes, sir?
I want those codes that Manheim gave Mister Data rechecked and then checked again. No one is beaming down to Vandor unless we can be reasonably sure they can get through.
Aye, sir.
I'm sorry for intruding. I was told I'd find you here.
You're not intruding. We're just finished. Come in. Thank you.
I knew you wouldn't come to me.
No, not under these circumstances.
We have unfinished business.
Yes, we do.
Why didn't you come to meet me that last day in Paris?
I was afraid.
Oh, I didn't want this.
What?
The truth.
Oh, you want me to lie?
Of course. A nice, soft, painless lie.
Oh, I got the days confused. I thought it was Tuesday when it was Wednesday. I went to the Cafe Moulin instead of the Cafe des Artistes.
Ah, that's better. It was raining and you couldn't find a cab. I waited all day. And it was raining. It rained the rest of the week. I went to Starfleet headquarters looking for you, but you'd already shipped out. So, come on, Jean-Luc. Let's hear the truth.
It was fear. Fear of seeing you, losing my resolve. Fear of staying, losing myself. Fear that neither of these choices was right, and that, and that either would have
For a long time, not a day went by when I didn't look up into the sky, and wonder.
Each time that I returned to Earth, my thoughts were filled with you.
I've thought a lot about this over the years, and perhaps you're leaving out your greatest fear. The real reason you left.
Which was?
That life with me would have somehow made you ordinary.
You're wonderful. And am I that transparent?
Only to me.
I wish I could talk to you, Professor Manheim. I bet you were really something.
Deanna.
I wanted to see how he was doing.
The same. Nothing I do seems to make any difference. That's not why you're here.
I thought I was the empath.
Are you all right?
Why wouldn't I be? I've got one of the medical wonders of the galaxy dying in my sickbay.
That's not what I meant.
I don't think I want to talk about what I think you mean.
Captain Picard
I can't compete with a ghost from his past. No one could.
She's not a ghost. She's here right now.
She may be in the here and now, but it's the ghost he sees. Excuse me, I have to get back to my patient.
How soon, Mister Data?
If Doctor Manheim's information is correct, by my calculations, the next time distortion should occur between twenty eight to forty seven minutes.
Bridge, this is Sickbay.
Doctor Manheim is awake and asking to speak with you, Captain. Alone.
On my way, Doctor.
You asked for me.
I am not sure I remembered all of the codes for the security system. You should warn anyone going down there
Thank you. I'll tell them to be cautious.
What I really wanted to talk to you about is Jenice.
Doctor Manheim, I did not come here to discuss your wife.
It is only this. If anything should go wrong, please, take care of her for me.
Of course.
She never would admit this, but she has had a terrible time these last years. Had we not been so isolated, she might have left me, and I never would have known. At least, not right away. Perhaps I'm not a man who should have a woman like her. She deserves better.
You underestimate her. I know, because I once did.
In both cases, the time distortions occurred along the same continuum as a preview or a reprise of a specific point in time.
Where we are, where we were, and where we will be. Data, I want this to be an away team of one. You. I don't think there's any reason to risk anyone else.
It is reasonable, sir. After all, I am a machine and dispensable.
Indispensable is the appropriate word. I think it should be only you because you seem more able to control the effects of the time distortion.
Oh, I see, sir. That is quite true, sir. I see time as a constant, whereas humans perceive time as flexible. Hence the expression, times flies when you're having fun, which until now has always confused me.
Well, I want you to put a stitch in time and, er, save much more than nine.
Sir?
If other members of the away team became disoriented, it could create additional problems and perhaps increase the danger.
I will go immediately, sir.
Good luck, Data.
All right. We have the coordinates exactly as the Professor specified.
Enterprise.
Picard.
I am proceeding to the lab, sir.
Maintain an open frequency, Mister Data.
Aye, sir.
Mister Data, what's going on?
Doctor Manheim forgot to mention one of his security precautions, sir. I am proceeding into the laboratory.
Mister Data, this channel will remain open. Please continue to report.
This appears to be the instrument Doctor Manheim described. It should confirm when the next time effect will occur.
Data?
Did Manheim give you enough information to decipher the security code?
I will know in a moment, sir. According to calculations, the next time effect will occur in one minute thirty seconds.
What's the next step, Mister Data?
I will need to add a specific amount of antimatter to rebalance and align the system.
Will that plug the hole?
Theoretically, yes. In reality I do not know.
When the effect hits, the forcefields will align, opening a clean straight path to the other dimension. Whatever the time distortion, I must add the antimatter at the appropriate moment. Geordi, if the Professor was right, I will need a twenty seven second countdown.
You got it, Data.
Captain, I now have the antimatter and am moving towards the opening at the end of the lab. The next time distortion should occur within seconds. Geordi, begin countdown on my mark. Now.
DATA 3:Captain, there appear to be three of us.
DATA 1:Should I drop the antimatter or wait for one of you?
DATA 3:Only one of us is at the correct time continuum.
DATA 1:Which one?
DATA 2:Me. It's me.
Five, four, three, two, one.
Data, report. Are you all right?
Yes, sir.
Is it closed?
It is well patched, sir. Closed indicates a permanent condition, which I cannot guarantee.
Patched is good enough. Well done. Beam back immediately.
With pleasure, sir.
This is amazing. All your readings are completely normal.
Where is my wife? Is she all right?
She's right here.
Jenice.
Paul.
The effect has been reversed. I can feel it. We're safe.
How is he?
He needs rest. There might be some residual effects, but other than that, he'll be all right.
I feel like I'm coming out of a long tunnel. It's there. Not at all like I thought it would be. Different.
Describe it.
I can't, not yet. The only words that fit are too pale because the images are so vibrant. It's not like anything anyone has ever experienced before. There was, no, no, there is this kind of life. Not like us. Not like this. What's the condition of my lab?
Intact, for the most part.
Don't tell me we're going back?
Oh, Jenice, we are so close. We have learned so much to walk away. Besides, we owe it to the others, our friends. There have been so many sacrifices by so many good people.
We'll be going back.
Yes, I can see that. I'm sure the Federation will want to help in any way that it can.
Thank you. This time it will be different, I promise.
It always is, my love. You said my life would never be dull, and it never has been.
Thank you.
Computer, this is Counsellor Troi. Request access.
Do you wish to terminate the current programme?
No, continue the programme.
Enter when ready.
The Captain is waiting for you inside.
How is this possible? It's Paris. Unbelievable.
Madame, this way. The Captain is waiting for you.
This is so real.
Bien sur. Pourquoi pas?
Jean-Luc, don't tell me how you did it. I don't care. It's perfect. It's as if we were really there.
I wanted to say goodbye properly this time. I shall always picture you here.
I expect you to always come charging to my rescue.
I'll do my best.
Goodbye, Jean-Luc. Be well.
And you.
Thank you for Paris.
Well, so much for my dramatically romantic exit.
Is anything wrong?
No, sir.
Then set course for Sarona Eight. As I remember we were on our way for some much needed shore leave.
Course set and laid in, sir.
Warp five. Engage.
I've only been there once, but they've got this great club. I don't remember the name of it. They serve these blue concoctions
It's across the square from the Zanza Men's Dance Palace.
It's called the Blue Parrot Cafe,  and you're buying.
Etana? I know you're back there. Don't make me come after you.
Give me that.
You don't need that.
Yes, I do.
I need that communicator.
Commander Riker to the Enterprise. I've a terrible problem down here on Risa.
Give me that.
Go get it.
I don't believe you did that.
Believe it.
What is this?
It's a game. Everyone here's playing it. It's fun.
Do I keep my eyes open, or closed?
Open.
What am I seeing?
The playing field.
Now what?
See the disc and the cone?
Yeah.
Concentrate. Make the disc go into the cone.
How do I do that?
Just let go. Relax. You'll do it.
What was that?
Your reward for clearing the first level.
How far does this game go?
As far as you can take it. Would you like to go for level two?
Captain's log, stardate 45208.2. Commander Riker has rejoined the Enterprise from Risa, and we are on our way to an uncharted area called the Phoenix Cluster. We're all anticipating this historic first look at the region.
It's starting to get busy around here. Five new science teams just beamed in from the Zhukov. Quarters are filling up fast.
On top of everything, there's been a change. We've been given only two weeks to complete the exploration.
Two weeks? That's not enough time to explore a region that size. I thought we had five weeks.
Commander, Starfleet has added a diplomatic mission to Oceanus Four.
Will, I'm leaving it up to you to make sure that all science departments have an equal chance of completing their research.
That'll be quite a juggling act.
Oh, and one piece of good news.. We're to rendezvous with a shuttlecraft carrying Wesley Crusher. He's on vacation from the Academy.
Wesley? Good. We'll need an extra hand around here.
Geordi, how are you coming with the survey preparations?
I'm up to my neck in observation schedules right now. Our biggest hurdle is sensor availability.
Especially since two new exobiologists and three stellar cartographers have joined us from the Zhukov.
Fifteen science teams, only two weeks, and one long-range array don't make for a great combination.
What about the lateral sensors?
They're booked solid for planetary observation.
And the gamma ray scanner?
We're reprogramming them now. Lefler, a moment of your time, please?
You know Robin Lefler.
Of course.
Her work around here's been so sensational, I've decided to make her a mission specialist.
Congratulations.
Thank you, sir.
Okay, specialist, what's our sensor status?
We're increasing the available bandwidth so more science teams can use the sensors at once. We figured out a way to do it by multiplexing the array.
Can we have that done before we arrive?
Yes, sir. You can count on it.
Keep it up, Lefler.
Geordi, I brought something back from Risa that you have got to try it.
I'd love to, but I'm running a full sensor recalibration in ten minutes. Can it wait?
Of course. I'll catch up with you later.
Chocolate ice cream, chocolate fudge and chocolate chips. You're not depressed, are you?
I'm fine, Commander.
Would you like me to leave you two alone?
No, you can join us.
No, thanks. I don't like fudge.
Really? I never met a chocolate I didn't like.
Doesn't it taste good?
Of course it does, but it's not just a matter of taste. It's the whole experience. First of all, you have to spoon the fudge around the rim, leaving only ice cream in the middle. Then, you gently spoon the ice cream around the sides, like you're sculpting it. Relish every bite. Make every one an event. And then, with the last spoonful, close your eyes.
I had no idea it was such a ritual.
Chocolate is a serious thing.
I brought something back from Risa. Better than chocolate.
Oh? What is it?
Just a game.
Chief O'Brien.
O'BRIEN:Welcome back, Wesley.
Congratulations on little Molly.
O'BRIEN:Thanks you. Wait till you see her. She's the spitting image of her dad.
So, where is everybody? Is my mom around?
O'BRIEN:The senior staff is in a meeting. You're supposed to go to your mother's quarters.
Oh. Do you think it'd be all right if I dropped in just to say hi?
O'BRIEN:I'll check. Chief O'Brien to Bridge.
Bridge here.
O'BRIEN:Wesley Crusher has arrived and wants to know if he can stop by the Observation lounge to say hi.
I suppose that is acceptable.
Thanks.
Surprise!
Mom!
Welcome home.
Hi, Mom.
Wesley.
Captain.
Quomodo tua Latinitas est?
Praestat quam prius.
Oppido bonum. Your Latin has improved.
You're looking very handsome.
You really do that cadet uniform justice, Wesley.
I bet you're driving all the girls wild.
Wesley. Tarvokian pound cake. I made it myself.
Thanks, Worf.
Wesley, was our attempt to make you uncomfortable effective?
You bet it was. For a second there, I thought I was on the wrong ship.
Did you find our deception pleasing?
Yeah. It's fun to be surprised.
Are you here to work or to play, Mister Crusher?
Sir.
I know you're on vacation. Probably like to sleep and spend some time on the holodeck. But if you're so inclined, we could use your help with the Phoenix Cluster survey.
Sounds great, sir.
Excellent. As soon as you get settled, come down to Engineering and we'll get you started.
So what kind of game is this?
Come by my quarters and I'll show it to you.
Have you found the Academy challenging, Wesley?
Yeah. I thought after being on the Enterprise, it would be a breeze, but there's a lot more to learn than just starship operations. What was your first year like?
Although I did extremely well scholastically, my lack of human understanding often created social obstacles.
Like what?
I particularly remember the phenomenon of practical jokes, several of which I fell victim to.
Tell me about it. My first week that I was there, this guy named Adam Martoni reprogrammed the sonic shower to cover me with mud. It took me a while, but I got him back really good.
Good for you.
Thanks.
I also found social gatherings difficult. There was one event, an Academy tradition, the Sadie Hawkins Dance?
They still hold it, every year.
A notably awkward experience.
I know what you mean. I can't even dance.
Really? Your mother is quite an expert. She recently taught me.
The Dancing Doctor? She tried to teach me too, but I just don't have the knack.
I would be happy to teach you dancing. I have programmed a comprehensive seventeen part course with some interesting holographic partners.
I'll let you know.
I'll modify the planetary scanners.
Just make sure we keep enough data lines open for stellar physics.
No problem. I'll compress the signal flow.
All right.
Why aren't these registering?
You might try calibrating them manually.
Excuse me?
The detectors. They tend to get temperamental. You can try calibrating them by hand.
You're kidding. The computer has to do this.
No. Look. The subroutine lets you do it from the panel. Law Seventeen. When all else fails, do it yourself.
It's working. Thanks.
Sure.
By the way, I'm Wesley. Wesley Crusher.
I know. Just came back from the Academy.
That's right.
Robin Lefler.
Hi.
Hi.
Your neutrinos are drifting.
They're what?
Geordi, a conflict has started between the planetary evolution team and the stellar physicists. Each wishes to be the first to use the thermal imaging array.
Well, tell them to flip a coin. We've got to work together on this mission, otherwise we're never going to get it done.
A coin. Very good. I will replicate one immediately.
Doctor Crusher to Data.
Data here.
Do you have a minute to join me in Sickbay? I need your help with something.
Yes, Doctor. On my way.
You wanted to see me, Doctor?
Yes, Data. I need to ask you to do something for me. I'm working on a new experiment with bioactive silicon. Would you reprogram this tricorder to these specifications?
Certainly.
I'm sorry to bother you with it, but I need it done quickly.
It does not bother me. In fact, I am happy to
Computer, secure Sickbay.
All entries to Sickbay are secured.
Let's see. I have Novakovich for anthropology and Horne for creative writing.
Walter Horne? Is he still teaching?
Yeah, he is. And he's good too. And you'll be pleased to know I took your advice. The first week that I was there, I went and met Boothby.
How is old Boothby? I hope he didn't tell you a lot of stories about me.
He didn't remember you, sir. At first. I found an old yearbook photo and he remembered you right away. He said he's very proud of you that you're Captain of the Enterprise.
Is he still tending grounds, or have the years finally caught up with him?
Not that I can tell. He took me on a grand tour of the place. He showed me every single blade of grass, practically.
I had the very same tour.
Sir, what do the initials A F stand for?
AF?
Boothby said he caught you carving those initials into his prized elm tree.
AF. Just an acquaintance of mine.  Wesley, if you meet someone whose initials you might want to carve into that elm tree, don't let it interfere with your studies. I failed organic chemistry because of AF.
Crusher to Captain Picard.
Go ahead, Doctor.
I need you in Sickbay immediately.
On my way.
He came in complaining of a servo malfunction but my scans came out negative. Then he just collapsed.
What have you found?
His biosystems and positronic functions seem to check out, and his power cells are active.
From what I can tell, his higher functions are intact, but the signals aren't getting from his brain to the rest of his body. It's like he's in a coma.
Data performs self diagnostic routines on a regular basis. We should take a look at his logs. They may reveal something.
I recommend going through his quarters, as well. You never know what we might find.
Agreed. Continue the analysis. Keep me informed.
Standard security sweep shows nothing out of the ordinary.
Personal logs, diagnostics, duty logs, they all appear normal. There's no evidence of anything that could lead to Data's shutdown.
Maybe we should ask his cat.
I guess I'd better get back to Sickbay, see if there's any change in his condition.
Doctor Crusher's got everything under control, Geordi. If there's any change, you'll be the first to know.
I guess so.
Looks to me like you need a break. Unwind a little.
Yeah, maybe you're right.
I've got just the thing. Why don't you join me in Ten Forward? There's something I'd like you to try.
Conduits twelve and twenty two are still down for testing.
We can re-route through junction fourteen B.
You have a funny way of looking at conduit configuration. But it works.
That's Law Thirty Six. You've got to go with what works.
What are all these laws that I keep hearing about?
They're my personal laws. Every time I learn something essential, I make up a law about it so I never forget.
How many do you have?
A hundred and two so far.
Looks like the starboard array needs another subprocessor.
It'll be online in a few minutes. I'm way ahead of you.
They said you were good.
Why do I get the feeling that you already know me?
I have a few friends at the Academy. Your name's come up a couple of times. That was really some stung you pulled on Adam Martoni in the physics lab. I just want to know how you got the antimatter regulator to spray chili sauce.
There is another side to that story.
Is it true what they say about your birthmark?
This isn't fair. I hardly know anything about you.
Hey, that's Law Forty six. Life isn't
Always fair. Yeah, I know that law. I still have to work on the sensor relays, but I'd like a chance to even the score. Ten Forward, nineteen hundred hours. Will you join me for coffee?
No. But I'll meet you for dinner.
Captain's log, supplemental. We have arrived at the Phoenix Cluster, but it will take us several hours to determine the best possible location from which to conduct our survey. Commander Data's condition remains unchanged with no further indication as to the cause of his collapse.
Mom?
Wesley.
What are you doing?
I'm embarrassed to say. This was meant for you. But it was so much fun, I couldn't resist.
What is it?
It's a game. Riker brought it back from Risa. Everybody's playing it. Want to try?
Maybe later. How's Data?
Geordi's still working on him. He's going to be fine.
I think I should go give him a hand.
No. Wesley, you are on vacation. You have done enough already.
Yeah, maybe you're right. Computer, increase light level.
Are you in a hurry?
Yeah, I'm late for a dinner date.
Really. With who?
Robin Lefler from Engineering.
Why don't you invite her here? We can all play the game together. I can replicate a couple more.
Mom.
Sorry. It's just that I want to spend some time together while you're here.
We'll have time together. I promise.
Okay.
Okay.
Just one game. Come on, try it on for size.
Mom! I really need to get ready.
Have a good time.
Thanks. I will.
When your parents are the only plasma specialists in the sector, you do a lot of travelling around. We went from base to base to base. I felt like a piece of luggage after a while. I spent all of my time around technical gear. My first friend was a tricorder.
Really? My very first friend was a warp coil.
My parents work came first. They didn't really have time for me, even when I needed them. So that's how I learned my first law. Law One. You can only count on yourself.
Sounds kind of lonely. Well, now you're here.
Now I'm here.
Well, I'm glad.
You wouldn't believe what's going on in Engineering. Commander La Forge and all the others, they're crazy about some new game.
Yeah, what kind of game is it?
It's some Risian gadget that fits over your ear.
Have you played it?
Not yet.
My mom has one. She keeps trying to get me to play it.
It's everywhere.
See what I mean?
Don't you think that's a little strange? Everybody playing it all the time.
It's just a fad. It's here this week. Next week we won't even know it existed.
I wonder how it works?
Why don't you try it and find out?
I'd like to know a little bit more about it before I try it.
I bet if we worked together we could figure it out.
Yeah, we could hook it up to one of the computers. The medical programs in the lab can be set up to emulate human responses.
I noticed it uses a visual interface. We could connect it through an optical sensor.
I've loaded the neurological behaviour programme. This sensor pad should allow the computer to process whatever information the game sends at it.
Let's see what happens.
Okay.
It's activating the reticular formation.
There's heavy synaptic activity all over the place.
I wonder what happens after prolonged exposure?
Speed up the processor and we'll find out.
The effect seems centred around the frontal lobe.
Computer, enhance frontal lobe, full spectrum.
It's stimulating the septal area.
That's the pleasure centre of the brain. Whatever this thing does, it must feel pretty good.
No wonder it's so popular.
Look at this. Serotonin levels are way off. Let's run a neurochemical analysis.
I'm seeing widespread bonding to neuro-receptors.
Correct me if I'm wrong, but this looks like a psychotropic reaction.
Are you saying you think the game's addictive?
What's going on in the prefrontal cortex?
Doesn't that area control higher reasoning?
Yeah, it sure does. I'd better go talk to the Captain.
Come.
Sorry to bother you, sir.
It's no bother, Wesley. Please, sit down.
Thanks.
How are the survey preparations coming along?
They're coming along fine, but that's not what I'm here to talk to you about.
What then?
There's a game going around. It's something that Commander Riker brought back from Risa. It's a device that hooks around the ears.
Yes, I've seen it.
I did some preliminary tests on the game, and what I found leads me to believe that it may have some harmful side-effects. Specifically, sir, I think it's psychotropically addictive.
Addictive? What have you discovered?
The game initiates a serotonin cascade in the frontal lobe of the brain. Now I know that's nothing conclusive, but it could explain why everyone is so attracted to it. And at the same time, it stimulates the brain's reasoning centre. I don't know what that's all about.
I'll start an investigation immediately. Thank you, Mister Crusher.
Thank you, sir.
Wesley? It's good to have you back again.
O'BRIEN:Have you tried this?
I've tried it, thanks. It's great.
Robin.
Where have you been? Everyone's after me to try it.
I know. I got stopped in the corridor twice. I talked to the Captain. He's going to look into it.
I hope he makes a shipwide announcement or something, because this thing is really starting to give me the creeps.
Did you forget your games?
We left them in our quarters.
Well then, use mine.
No, thanks.
Try it.
She said no thanks.
You know what else is really weird? If this game is so addictive, there's only one person onboard we can be sure wouldn't be affected by it.
Data.
Right. And he managed to get injured right when the game was brought on board. We'd better take a look at him.
Maybe you should go check again.
The nurse is still playing the game.
I don't know what to make of this. There's brain activity all his systems seem to be working.
How can that be? He's unconscious.
Maybe there's a signal breach between his brain and his body. Let's map his nervous system and see if we can isolate a weak link. Patch the neural output through to that station. Here. The signal stops just below his cortex processor. There's some kind of damage. It's almost undetectable. Let's look at it on the viewer.
Wesley, look at that.
It looks like some of his positronic links have been severed.
The cuts are precise. Look how clean the edges are. Computer, increase magnification, factor four.
Only two people on board know enough about Data to do something like this. Commander La Forge and my mother.
Why would one of them do this to him?
Maybe there's more going on here than we thought. What if someone's trying to use the game for some purpose other than pleasure?
Then Data would be a threat to that plan. And only with Data out of the way would everybody become addicted.
And everyone has. Except us.
We've reached the designated coordinates, Captain. There is a ship bearing three two seven mark one five two on an intercept course.
Advise them of our status, Mister Worf. Go. Replicate what you need, and see that the devices are properly distributed. Not forgetting Mister Crusher.
Wesley? Wesley?
In here, Mom.
It worked.
We should keep these mock-ups with us. We can't trust anyone anymore. Not even the Captain.
I'm supposed to be on duty in Engineering. I've got to get back before Commander La Forge suspects something.
Okay. When you get there, start accessing the codes for the security tracking system. There's something I want to try.
Wesley, don't forget Law Ninety One. Always watch your back.
You too.
The vessel is approaching, Captain.
Computer, all senior officers report to the Bridge. On screen.
Report.
Welcome, Etana. The Enterprise has been secured. We await your further instructions.
The expansion will proceed as follows. Commander Riker, you will pilot a shuttlecraft to the Cleon system, where you will rendezvous with the starship Endeavour. Proceed with distributing the device to that vessel. Commander La Forge, Counsellor Troi, take a shuttle to Starbase sixty seven. Distribute the device to all starships currently docked there.
We also have an opportunity to introduce the game to Starfleet Academy.
Excellent. See to it. The Ktarians commend your efforts, Picard. Once the expansion is complete, you and your crew will be rewarded.
Deck thirty six.
Wesley, at what level are you?
I'm only level ten.
I'm at level forty seven.
That's great.
You know what the secret is, don't you? Don't force it. If you just let the game happen, it almost plays itself.
I'll try that.
I think we're going to be okay. I've just got one more thing to do. Help me compile the forcefield overrides.
What are you doing?
I created a site to site transporter programme. If things get difficult, this'll keep us one step ahead of them. Were able to access the security tracking codes? Robin?
It's your turn, Wesley. Play the game.
Get back here!
Computer, activate security containment field. Deck thirty six, section fifty two.
Computer transport programme Crusher One.
Riker to Bridge. We lost Crusher. It appears he rigged a site-to-site transport.
Security alert, condition three. Computer, shut down all transporter systems and shuttlebays. Mister La Forge?
I can't track him, sir. He's done something to the internal security sensors. I'll try bypassing his subcommands. Hold on. I'm picking up a piece of his trail, sir. Sensors show power activation in transporter room three. That would put him somewhere on deck six.
Seal off deck six. Activate security fields sections twenty three through twenty nine.
Aye, sir.
We've got him, Captain. Section twenty five. It looks like he's trying to cut through the forcefield with a phaser.
Security to deck six, section twenty five.
On our way.
You check left.
Where the hell is he?
I am attempting to isolate him with thermal sensors.
Narrow the scan field. Go deck by deck if you have to.
Unfortunately, he knows our procedures. He will avoid corridors and public areas. Commander, an unidentified heat source. Deck seven, section twenty three. There.
No! Let go of me!
It's okay, Wesley.
You led us quite a chase, Mister Crusher. Doctor Crusher.
No!
Hold him steady.
It's okay, Wesley. It won't hurt.
No!
You'll like it.
His eyes.
That's right, Wesley. just let it go. Yes, just let yourself go. Relax.
Computer, resume normal illumination.
Mister Worf, you will find a small alien ship off the starboard bow. Please secure it with a tractor beam and raise our shields.
Engaging tractor beam.
Are you all right, Captain?
I think so, Mister Data.
Captain, we are being hailed by the alien vessel.
On screen.
Explain yourself, Picard.
The explanation is simple. Your attempt to capture our ship has failed.
Release us immediately, or we will open fire.
Tactical analysis, Mister Worf?
Their weapons systems are substantially inferior to ours. They are not a threat.
Get her off the screen.
I can't believe what we were about to do.
Data, we deactivated you.
I managed to reconnect his positronic matrix.
Wesley's subsequent diversions gave me adequate time to modify the palm beacon. The optical burst patterns we programmed were successful in counteracting the addictive effects of the game.
And the rest of the crew?
We programmed the main computer to transmit the same optical burst to all display screens, work stations and terminals throughout the ship.
That should reach almost everyone. Take a medical team to treat the rest.
Aye, sir.
We'll take the alien ship to the nearest Federation starbase. Ensign, lay in a course.
Captain's log, stardate 45212.1. We have delivered the Ktarian vessel to Starbase eighty two and are now on a course to rendezvous with the Starship Merrimack, which will transport Wesley Crusher back to Starfleet Academy.
I never saw you wear these. Afraid someone might see your birthmark?
Now, I wonder who started that birthmark rumour?
I wish you didn't have to go.
Me too.
You'll write, won't you?
Somebody has to kill all those rumours you keep hearing about me.
Mister Crusher, we've rendezvoused with the Merrimack. Please report to transporter room two.
On my way, sir. I've got to go.
Here. A gift, so you'll remember. Robin's Laws. All one hundred and two of them.
Thanks. Law one hundred and three?
Yes?
A couple of light years can't keep good friends apart. Bye.
So the guy staggers to his feet and goes back to the girl, right? Well, she smiles, looks him right in the eye and says 'just try that in hyperspace!'
I see. So the difficulty in attaining such complex positioning in zero gravity environment, coupled with the adverse effect it would have on the psychological well being of the average human male, is what makes this anecdote so amusing. Yes. Very humorous indeed. Hysterical, in fact.
What is our e.t.a. at Pacifica, Mister La Forge?
Twenty two hours fourteen minutes, sir.
Increase to warp six.
Aye sir. Full impulse.
Do you think anyone would object to our arriving ahead of schedule?
I know I won't. I've been really looking forward to a nice swim.
You are aware, Counsellor, that the holodeck can be programmed to recreate an oceanic environment.
Data, it's just not the same. Have you ever been for a real moonlight swim?
One can swim in moonlight?
How about you, Mister Worf?
Swimming is too much like bathing.
Commander Riker. I am receiving a Code Forty Seven.
Verify.
It is a Code Forty Seven, sir. Starfleet emergency frequency.
Code Forty Seven. Captain's eyes only.
Captain, I'm sorry to disturb you.
Yes, Number One. What is it?
An incoming message. Code Forty Seven, sir.
Pipe it through.
This is an emergency communiqu�. It is not to be discussed with fellow officers unless deemed absolutely necessary. There will be no computer record of said transmission.
Understood.
Proceed with voice print identification.
Picard, Jean-Luc. Captain, USS Enterprise.
Voice print verified.
Walker!
Hello, Jean-Luc. It's been a long time.
Too long, old friend. Why are you contacting me on this frequency?
It was a difficult decision. I felt it was worth the risk.
Risk?
It's about Starfleet. About something we've always considered to be impossible.
I don't understand.
I can't explain it now. We need to talk, face to face.
You're using a Code Forty Seven. I have to know what this is all about.
Not over subspace, no.
Oh, for God's sake, Walker. This is a secured channel
No. I want you to meet me on Dytallix B.
When?
Immediately.
Not possible. We're expected at Pacifica,
That can wait. You owe me. And you owe it to yourself to hear what I have to say. Something is beginning. Don't trust anyone. Remember that, Jean-Luc. Don't take anything for granted.
Walker.
Dytallix B. We'll be waiting.
Data, are you familiar with Dytallix B?
Dytallix B is one of seven uninhabited planets mined for the Federation by the Dytallix Mining Company. It is in the nearby Mira system.
Mister La Forge, chart a course for it immediately. Warp seven. And there will be no records or logs mentioning any aspect of this diversion.
Captain, they're expecting us at Pacifica. Shouldn't we contact them and let them know.
Negative. Nothing goes out without specific orders from me. Hopefully the delay will be minimal.
I have the readout on Dytallix B, Commander.
What have you got?
Dytallix B is the fifth of six planets circling the red giant known as Mira. One side always faces the sun, where temperatures reach up to one hundred and eighty degrees. The mines line the temperate zone between the day and night sides, but they are long deserted.
Why the devil are we be going to this planet? Are there any miners or indigenous life forms on the planet?
I believe the answer to both questions is no, sir. In a manner of speaking, it is nothing but a lifeless hunk of rock, a useless ball of mud, a worthless chunk
Thank you, Data. I get the idea. Captain, we are approaching Dytallix B.
Very good, Number One. I'm on my way.
Captain, sensors are detecting three Federation starships already in orbit around the planet.
Identify.
Two are frigates. The Renegade commanded by Tryla Scott, and the Thomas Paine, Captain Rixx commanding.
The third is just coming into range now, sir. It is Ambassador Class heavy cruiser, USS Horatio.
Horatio? Isn't that Walker Keel's ship?
Attempts at communication have been ignored by all three vessels.
Make no further attempts, Mister Worf. Any life form readings on the surface, Data?
Three, sir. All gathered inside what appears to be the entrance to a mining tunnel.
Very well. Relay those coordinates to the transporter room. I'm beaming down.
Alone, Captain?
Alone, Number One.
Thanks for coming.
This is some greeting, old friend.
Tell me, Jean-Luc, where did we first meet?
Answer the question.
Tau Ceti Three. It was a bar. Quite an exotic one as I remember. What do I win?
Do you recall the night you introduced Jack Crusher to Beverly?
You know full well I hadn't even met Beverly then. You introduced them.
My brother introduced them.
You don't have a brother. Two sisters, Anne and Melissa. What the hell is this all about?
Apologies, Captain. We had to make sure you were really you.
Walker, what is going on?
Captain Picard, meet Captain Rixx.
I believe we've met. The Altairian conference.
And Captain Scott.
Tryla Scott. It's said you made Captain faster than anyone in Starfleet history, present company included. Are you that good?
Yes, I am.
Starfleet's finest. Fancy meeting you here.
We all came secretly, Picard. To discuss the threat.
What threat?
Have you noticed anything about Starfleet Command lately? Anything unusual?
No. But we've been on the outer rim for a while. We haven't had much contact with them.
Some of us have seen strange patterns emerging. Unusual orders. High-ranking officials backing irrational proposals.
Starbase twelve was completely evacuated for two full days. No explanation given.
And what about the deaths? McKinney, Ryan Sipe, Onna Karapleedeez.
All dead?
A series of accidents.
Or so they say. It's hard to be certain of anything. Interfleet communications are at a minimum. But something is happening.
And we fully expect the Enterprise to be targeted soon.
Targeted for what? By whom?
We're not sure yet. Damn it, Jean-Luc. I tell you that some of Starfleet's top command people are changing. This could affect the very core of our organisation. Officers I've known for years are bluffing their way through talk of old times.
That's their weakness, a lack of memory.
He doesn't believe us. He thinks we're crazy.
You've given me nothing to believe in. Just a lot of vague talk about strange patterns, irrational proposals. Who's behind this, and to what purpose? How are people being changed?
I can't say exactly, but I think its spread to my own ship. My First Officer hasn't been the same since we stopped off at Earth. Our Medical Officer says he's perfectly normal, but I don't think I trust him either.
Walker!
We know we don't have all the answers. All we ask is that you keep your eyes open.
That's sound advice at any time, Captain.
Stay in touch with us, covertly. This meeting never took place as far as Starfleet is concerned. Please, I'm asking this as a personal favour. I'm glad, Jean-Luc. I'm glad you're still one of us. Tell Beverly I said hello.
And watch your back, Picard.
Friends, close friends, are few and far between. Two of the oldest and closest are Jack Crusher, may he rest in peace, and Walker Keel. Before various missions split us apart, we were virtually inseparable. I trust Keel completely. If he felt it necessary to violate regulations, he must have had a good reason.
But you're putting your career at risk for him.
Friendship must dare to risk, Counsellor, or it's not friendship.
They illicitly used the emergency channel to draw you here. Then they asked you to keep secrets from your superiors. Effectively, to disobey Starfleet regulations.
The people involved in this are of the highest calibre. If I didn't believe in their loyalty, I wouldn't have gone this far.
Don't you think you should tell the rest of the crew?
No. I don't want to risk implicating them. Not until I have solid evidence that something really is wrong.
Take us out of orbit, Mister La Forge.
Aye, sir.
Resume heading to Pacifica, warp factor eight.
Aye sir, warp eight.
At that speed sir, we should arrive nine point six three hours behind the original schedule, sir.
Very good. Data, I have an assignment for you. One especially suited to your talents.
Computer, this is Lieutenant Commander Data. Please access all Starfleet Command orders to starships, starbases and colonies for the past six months.
Working.
Doctor.
I understand the Horatio was in orbit around Dytallix. Did you see Walker?
No.
Oh. I would have loved to have seen him.
It wasn't possible, Doctor.
Captain, I am picking up an unusual disturbance in a nearby quadrant.
Confirmed, sir. Sector sixty three.
Specify. What kind of disturbance?
Hard to say at this distance, sir.
I guess the trip Pacifica will have to wait.
Let's investigate. Maintain speed. Alter course accordingly.
Aye, sir. Changing course to three five one mark four.
Approaching sector sixty three, sir.
Slow to impulse.
Aye, sir. Going to impulse power, now.
Sensors beginning to pick up small objects, sir.
On screen.
It doesn't look natural.
Agreed. Enlarge and identify.
It looks like debris. From a space vessel of some kind.
It could be one of those ships that was orbiting Dytallix.
We are in close proximity to that planet.
Identifying marks, Mister Worf?
Nothing so far. Sensors not detecting any bodies in the flotsam, but from the amount of wreckage. I'm sorry sir. It can only be the Horatio. From the looks of it, she's been totally destroyed.
Captain's personal log, stardate 41776.1. The apparent death of Walker Keel has had a powerful impact on me. I now believe there may be a cancer growing within the ranks of Starfleet. As a result, I have alerted my Executive Officer to the suspicions voiced by Keel and the others.
There's no proof of anything.
The last time I saw Admiral Quinn he tried to warn me about a subversion within the Federation. Then Walker tried, and he's dead.
Subversion? Personally, I don't believe this conspiracy theory.
Startling. Quite extraordinary, in fact.
Directions unclear. Please repeat request.
That was not a request. I was simply talking to myself. A human idiosyncrasy, triggered by fascination with a particular set of facts. Or sometimes brought about by senility. Or used as a means of weighing information before reaching a conclusion. Or, as a
Thank you, sir. I comprehend. Please specify how you would like to proceed, sir.
Please continue with record scan. Intriguing.
But we have no facts. We have to assume the explosion was an accident.
Number One, I believe what happened on the Horatio was sabotage.
But we can't be certain.
Perhaps we can. My orders were to search for abnormal patterns in Starfleet's directives. I believe I have found just that.
These are various outposts and starbases where I have detected unusual activity over the past few months.
What sort of activity?
An uncustomary reshuffling of personnel, usually in the command areas. The new officers have had frequent contact with the highest levels of Starfleet Command.
Why hasn't anybody discovered this before?
The orders were given with great subtlety. To use an aphorism, Starfleet's left hand did not know what its right hand was doing.
Data, can you speculate as to the purpose of these reassignments?
I believe it is a clandestine attempt to control vital sectors of Federation territory.
This could be a prelude to an invasion. But who's behind it?
There is insufficient data to make such an assessment, sir.
Are you suggesting that we warp over to Starfleet headquarters and demand to know what's going on?
Why not?
Yes, why not? We're talking about a threat to the entire future of the Federation. I don't think any of us can rest easy until we've been to the source.
Captain's personal log, supplemental. While it is quite unusual for a starship to return to Earth, we seem to be left with no other choice. I have apprised the remaining bridge crew of our situation.
Approaching Earth, sir.
Standard orbit, Mister La Forge.
Standard orbit, sir.
Any word from Starfleet Command, Data?
Nothing so far, sir.
Strange.
Captain. I am now receiving a message from Starfleet Command.
On screen.
Greetings Enterprise. I am Admiral Savar. This is Admiral Aaron, and I believe you already know Admiral Quinn.
Yes, indeed. It's good to see you again, Admiral.
And you, Captain.
Of course. We are always delighted when the Enterprise returns to the nest. Yet we are puzzled by the timing of your visit.
Yes, sir. I can imagine you would be.
Governor Delaplane of Pacifica informs us that you cancelled your scheduled stop there. Is this true?
Yes, sir, it is.
Explain yourself, Captain. Why have you returned to Earth?
I would rather discuss in person, Admiral.
Excuse us for one moment, Captain.
They seem normal enough.
On the surface. Counsellor, any thoughts?
Hard to say. Someone is hiding something, but I can't tell who or what.
I must say I'm not overjoyed to see Remmick again.
Considering what we've done, their response has been pretty temperate.
I don't like it. You can't trust them.
Forgive the delay, Captain Picard. We'd be delighted if you and your First Officer would join us for dinner.
Yes. Delighted.
It would give you a good opportunity to expatiate your viewpoint.
To elaborate upon whatever it is that's troubling you.
Thank you. We accept your gracious offer.
Excellent. Preparations are already underway.
We'll greet you in the reception area in, say, twenty minutes?
Splendid.
I won't be able to attend dinner, I'm afraid, but I would like to see the ship and say hello again, Captain.
Of course. We look forward to seeing you, Admiral. Enterprise out. Quinn wants to see us alone. At least we know he's still on our side. Mister Data, you have the Bridge.
Aye, sir.
Are you ready to beam up to the Enterprise, sir?
Yes, Commander, quite ready. Energise, Mister Remmick.
Welcome aboard, Greg.
Good to see you.
You remember Commander Riker.
Hello again, Commander.
I must say, you're looking remarkably well.
Never felt better in my life.
When you were here last, you were saying that you were feeling tired.
Tired of life I was, but not anymore. I'm ready for new challenges now. What about another look at this ship?
Remember what you told me back at Relva Seven, About the threat that you perceived to the very fabric of the Federation?
Is that why you're here? Because of what I said?
It's one of the reasons, yes.
But Jean-Luc, you took me far too literally. I was only referring to the problems involved in assimilating new races into the Federation. It's an ongoing, tumultuous process which can cause stress and strain on every aspect of our alliance.
I'm sorry, I must have misunderstood.
It's not for you to apologise. If I led you up the garden path, I humbly ask your forgiveness.
Of course.
Now, gentlemen, you have a dinner to attend to, while I would like to go and freshen up before I look around a little bit more.
We've arranged your usual accommodation, sir.
That's outstanding.
Yes, I should be getting down to the planet. Commander Riker will be available here to show you anything that you want to see.
It's really not necessary.
I insist.  When you've finished showing the Admiral anything that he needs, you can join me down on Earth.
I may want to stay a while, Jean-Luc.
Of course. Stay as long as you wish.  No.
It's not Gregory Quinn. It may look like him and sound like him, but it isn't him.
Are you absolutely certain, Captain?
I'm certain, Number One. I want you to stay close. Keep your eye on his every move. Have Beverly concoct some reason for giving him a full medical examination.
How?
I don't know, just do it.
He's a senior Admiral.
It's not him, Will. I know that now. What I have to find out is how this happened, and who or what is behind it.
Captain, if you're right.
I'm right.
Should you be beaming down there alone, unarmed?
I'll take care. Find out what you can, then join me, in force if necessary. Energise.
Good luck, sir.
Welcome home, Captain Picard.
Thank you, sir. My first officer will be joining us shortly.
Yes, I'm sure he will.
You've met Commander Remmick, haven't you?
Under less than ideal circumstances. It's nice to see you again, Captain.
We've prepared a special meal in your honour.
Delightful. Tell me, why is the corridor so quiet? The last time I was here, it was bustling with activity.
It usually is. Tonight's a quiet night.
Yes, a quiet night.
Ready for your tour, Admiral?
Quite ready, Commander.
What's in the case?
Actually, I brought it for Doctor Crusher. But perhaps you would like you to see it first?
What is it?
A form of life. It was discovered accidentally by a survey team on an uncharted planet.
Why haven't we heard anything about that?
Oh, you'll be hearing about it shortly, but first there remains much scientific study to be done. After all, it is a superior form of life.
Superior?
Totally. Come, have a look.
I think I'll summon my Science Officer.
It won't like your Science Officer. It does like you! Vitamins. They do wonders for the body.
Riker to Security. Guest quarters seventeen. Emergency.
Let's have some Andonian tea while we wait for your Riker. Then you can tell us about what's brought you here.
I see you keep up with our duty roster.
Yes, of course, Captain. The Enterprise is very important to us.
Excuse me, gentlemen.
To the Horatio, gentlemen.
The Horatio.
What an awful tragedy. Such a terrible loss of life.
It's interesting that you should mention the Horatio. It's one of the subjects I wanted to discuss.
Really?
Has the cause of her destruction been ascertained?
Absolutely. Implosion, due to extreme negligence on the part of her Captain.
Enjoy, Picard. I believe you'll find it an excellent aperitif.
It's good thing you're here. He slipped and hit his head.
This is Lieutenant La Forge in guest quarter seventeen. We have a medical emergency.
Your Doctor Crusher is most capable. I'm sure he'll be all right. Now if you'll excuse me, my time here is most limited.
Admiral. Don't you think we should wait until the Doctor gets here?
Now, Klingon, it's between you and me.
Do Klingons fear death as much as humans? I could snap your neck in a second, but it wouldn't be as much fun.
Are you all right?
If I could see, I'd be seeing stars.
What is he?
Let's find out.
Retinal scans are an exact match It really is Quinn.
How can that be? The man picked me up like a rag doll.
I'm going to have to do a complete internal scan.
Keep me posted, Doctor, I'll be on the Bridge.
What is that?
What do you know of conspiracies, Captain?
Not nearly enough, I suppose.
That's the charming thing about them, isn't it? When a machination is real, no one knows about it. And when it's suspected, it's almost never real.
Except, of course, in paranoid delusions for those who believe.
Sorry to interrupt. Dinner is served.
Wonderful. Bantering with the Captain has given me quite an appetite.
I need to contact my ship to let Commander Riker that we're about to sit down.
Of course, Captain. We'll wait for you at the table.
Picard to Riker.
Doctor Crusher here, Captain.
May I speak freely?
I suppose I have little choice. Where's Riker?
He was attacked by Quinn, or what we thought was Quinn.
Specify, Doctor.
A parasitic being has invaded Quinn's body. It has complete control over all brain functions. It seems to breath through a small gill protruding from the back of Quinn's neck.
Look for this, Captain. I believe it will be visible on anyone who has been compromised.
Any idea what it is or where it comes from?
Negative.
I've never seen anything like it before.
Lieutenant Worf, if the situation is under control, please report to the Bridge.
Doctor?
It's okay. He won't be waking up for a long time.
Continue, Doctor.
By the placement of the tendrils
The parasite appears to stimulate the victim's adrenal glands, generate great strength
And resistance to the
Never mind the details. Can you remove it?
I don't think so.
Not without killing the patient. Captain.
You must set your phaser on kill. Stun has little effect.
Doctor, one does not beam down to Starfleet Headquarters armed.
Your food is getting cold, Captain.
I'm going in to dinner now, Doctor. Tell Commander Riker to join me as soon as he's ready. Picard out.
Please, sit down, Captain. We've been waiting. Go ahead and start, Captain. We don't stand on ceremony here.
Oh do eat up, Picard. Raise your hand if you want seconds.
Riker! Thank God. We're leaving.
You're not going anywhere. You'll be one of us soon.
You were meant for the Doctor.
It couldn't be helped. Riker walked in on us unexpectedly.
No matter. The Doctor will soon be joining us. All in good time.
Well, Captain Scott. Good. Now the setting is complete.
You don't really think we were in the dark about your intentions, do you?
Patience is one of our virtues, Captain. We didn't go after you, we allowed you to come after us.
More dramatic that way, don't you think?
Yes, the one thing both races share is a love of theatre. And you've put on a fine show.
What race are you? Where are you from?
It's not important. Let us just say we've come a long way to join you.
It's a perfect match. We're the brains, you're the brawn.
You'll understand soon, Picard.
Indeed. We've been moving slowly, cautiously, for many months now. Careful to cover our tracks. Careful not to arouse suspicion, until it's too late.
And now it's too late. For you, that is.
Well said, brother. Picard and Riker control the Enterprise, which means we control the Enterprise.
Eat hearty, brother! Relish your new body!
Aaron!
Aaron!
Can I help you, gentlemen? Is there any trouble here? Perhaps if you'd tell me what it is
Remmick!
No, Will.
You don't understand. We mean you no harm. We seek peaceful co-existence.
Captain's log, stardate 41780.2. How difficult after all these years of learning to respect life, to be forced to destroy it. But there seems to be no alternative. Admiral Quinn is expected to make a full recovery. There is no trace of the parasite which took control of him. We'll never know how many of these life forms infiltrated Starfleet, but it seems they could not survive without the mother creature which had taken over Commander Remmick.
It was Doctor Crusher's idea to simulate the blue gill. We had to make sure it would fool everyone, including you.
That it did, Number One. Rest assured.
Captain, I have attempted to trace the message Remmick was sending. I believe it was aimed at an unexplored sector of our galaxy.
Any idea what the message was, Data?
I believe it was a beacon.
A beacon?
Yes, sir. A homing beacon, sent from Earth.
Captain, sensors report the USS Hood is closing on an intercept course at high warp.
That's odd. We weren't notified of a rendezvous.
They seem to be in an awful hurry.
Sir, we are being hailed on a secured channel by Captain DeSoto.
On screen.
Sorry to sneak up on you like that, Jean Luc
Robert, why didn't you inform us?
Out here, you never know who's listening. Keeps you on your toes, anyway. Hey, Will. Will, you getting soft on that luxury liner?
So, old friend. How are you?
Well, you know, they send you Galaxy Class boys out here to the far reaches. Me, I'm just hauling my butt back and forth between starbases.
But not today.
No, not today. Starfleet's got new orders for you. This is top priority. They need the fastest ship in the fleet and the best people. That is you.
If time is so important, why didn't they transmit the orders by subspace?
They're worried about Romulan eavesdropping on this one. And we've got a passenger for you. Hard to send by subspace.
What sort of passenger?
Mission specialist. He'll bring your orders aboard with him. His name is Tam Elbrun.
As in Tam Elbrun of the Ghorusda disaster?
The same. What can I say? Your orders are to cooperate fully with him. Best of luck, folks. Hood out.
Sir, the Hood is slowing to impulse.
Mister Data, come with me.
Captain, let me come with you to greet Tam.
You know him?
I do. He was at the university on Betazed when I studied psychology there.
Oh, I see. He was a colleague of yours.
No. He was a patient
Tam is a telepath of extraordinary talent, even for a Betazoid. He's a specialist in first contact with new life forms.
He's a very unique person, but he's not what you might expect, Captain.
Welcome aboard the Enterprise. I'm
Captain Picard, right?. Here.  You want to know all about your mission. Everything's on there. Orders and briefings, destination and heading, all that. Dee, I sensed you were out here. How've you been?
I've been fine, but I thought
TAM + TROI:you were on thought you were on Chandra Five.
Sir.
Who? What are you?
I am Data. An android.
Incredible, an android. I can't read you at all. It's like you're not there.
Data.
Oh. You better hurry up to the bridge with that. Captain wants you to run the orders, scan the technical schematics, and be ready to brief him in ten minutes. Right?
Number One?
Riker here.
Will you meet Commander Data on the Bridge. He has our orders and new heading.
Aye, sir.
And assemble the bridge staff for a mission briefing in fifteen minutes. Picard out. Mister Elbrun. Would you
Care to see my quarters? No. I'd rather get this briefing over with. Then be left alone until I'm needed.
I've heard something about Ghorusda. Weren't there about forty people killed?
Forty seven, including the captain of the Adelphi and two friends from my class at the Academy.
Sorry.
Main Bridge.
So what happened?
It was a first contact situation. Ghorusdan culture is so complex and different, that the Federation sent a specialist to prevent misunderstanding.
So that was Tam Elbrun. What happened was his fault?
Not directly. Board of inquiry blamed Darson for carelessness about Ghorusdan cultural taboos. But if Elbrun was so good, why didn't he warn Darson? What was he doing there if he couldn't sense that much hostility?
Our destination is the Beta Stromgren system, following the path of the Vega Nine probe.
That's twenty three parsecs beyond our furthest manned explorations.
That is correct, Commander. Apparently the probe has discovered. Astonishing.
Our orders are to proceed to this star, Beta Stromgren. Scientists have discovered that it is in the final stages of an alternating cycle of expansion and collapse, and will soon result in a supernova. However, the unmanned long range space probe sent by Starfleet to observe the process has discovered something much more.
Oh, Data don't waste time. They call it Tin Man. The Vega probe found it orbiting Stromgren.
Looks like some kind of ship.
Its energy source is unknown. The people who've studied the transmissions think it's a starship. And they're sure it's alive.
Alive? How?
A cybernetic organism like the Borg?
No, no, no. Here. Starfleet believes it's an organic creature, born in space, living its life in the wastes between stars. No one knows where it came from, or why it's here. But we're going to meet it. We're going to talk to it. I'm going to talk to it.
Have attempts been made
To communicate with it by subspace. Of course. Linguacode, universal translation, all that. It won't work. Tin Man is too different. Direct mind to mind contact is our only hope.
The opportunity for discovery is extraordinary but I don't understand Starfleet's urgency.
Romulans.
Hell, I forgot. The Romulans.
They claim that sector of space where Beta Stromgren is located.
The Romulans claim all that is in their field of vision.
They routinely monitor the telemetry of our deep space probes.
Then they will certainly be sending a ship of their own to investigate this Tin Man.
No. Actually, they're sending two. Data?
That is correct. Starbase one two three has detected two D'daridex class cruisers on an intercept course. The top speed of this class cruiser is known to be less than ours. Therefore we do have some advantage.
Then, it's a race? An alien intelligence, a new life form, representing a technology far beyond that of either the Romulans or ourselves. The Romulans will certainly take whatever measures are required to secure this creature for study.
Study as in dissecting, I'd bet.
Mister Data, you are our resident honour student in exobiology. I'm assigning you to head up the Life Sciences on this mission.
Aye, sir.
Excellent.
Meeting adjourned, then.
So, Data, I guess you're the brains of this outfit, huh?
Mister Elbrun, one of the reasons I'm asking you to work closely with a member of my staff is to avoid any further omissions. The possibility of an encounter with Romulans on this mission is hardly trivial. And yet
All right, all right. I should have brought up the Romulans earlier, but I was distracted. And no, Billy boy, I wasn't distracted on Ghorusda. If Darson had listened to me, no one would have died. No? Well I don't care whether you believe that or not.
Captain's log, supplemental. Travelling at high warp, we are still several days from rendezvous with the mysterious entity which Starfleet has christened Tin Man. My immediate concern is with Tam Elbrun. Starfleet considers his unique abilities crucial to our mission, yet he seems to me unstable.
Well, according to his medical records and psych profile, he's very high on the ESP scale. A sort of prodigy.
A prodigy? In what sense?
Well, in most Betazoids our telepathic gifts develop at adolescence.
You mean you're not born reading minds?
No. Except for some reason that no one understands, occasionally a Betazoid child is born different.
How different?
Born with his telepathic abilities switched on.
Most Betazoids born like that never lead a normal life.
The noise of other people's thoughts and feelings must be overwhelming, incomprehensible, especially to a child.
And painful. Early diagnosis and special training did help Tam adjust, but he has some problems.
You mentioned a hospitalisation.
For stress. Repeatedly, throughout his life.
I always wonder what holds one person together through that kind of struggle, while another goes under?
Yes, well, he's evidently done more than hold together. He's the indispensable man. The Federation's finest specialist in communication with unknown life forms.
The more unusual a life form is, the better he likes it. His personnel file shows that he's gravitated toward assignments that isolate him from other humanoids.
Commander Data, I'm picking up an unusual echo from my navigational sensors.
Something is out there, sir, tracking us, matching our speed and heading. Something which does not fully register on our instruments.
Since there is no known natural phenomenon capable of travel at warp velocities, there are but two possibilities. Either it is a sensor malfunction, another ship is following us covertly.
It is not a sensor malfunction.
Agreed.
But Commander, if it is a Romulan ship, with their cloaking device we shouldn't pick them up at all.
Unless they're pulling so much power for something else that they can't fully cloak.
Like what?
Ask the Romulans. If it is the Romulans.
Lieutenant, continue monitoring the precise position of the echo. Any sudden change in its behaviour, initiate Yellow Alert.
Aye, sir.
Come in.
How're things in the land of the living?
I thought you might be lonely. No one sees you except Data.
Lonely? I can hear everything that everyone on this ship thinks. No one besides you seems to be missing my charming
You want them to dislike you. Why?
Because I'm not a nice man. Okay, okay. Because they scare me. They're too many minds. I can't shut them out. I never could learn. All their loves, their hates, their fears, their needs. It's like a tide that never ebbs. I could drown.
I remember.
You understood, at least a little, how I felt. I see you finally found a place to fit in. People to care about.
And you're still looking.
Then there's Ghorusda. I've got enough doubt in my reliability without having to listen to Riker's and Picard's
What happened there?
I thought everyone knew.
No. What happened to you?
Maybe I got too involved with the Ghorusdans, with their point of view. It happens to me. I wanted everyone to get along. I could have warned Darson more forcefully.
So, after that you ran away? The last I heard, you were the only Federation delegate assigned to Chandra Five.
Beautiful creatures, the Chandrans. Their minds are glacial. They have a lovely three day ritual for saying hello. Peaceful, untroubled people.
Unlike humanoids?
Well, except for your friend Data. I like him. He's restful.
I believe your impression of Data is probably unique.
Yeah? Well, having to get to know someone, just once, has its appeal. I mean, talking to them, instead of getting it all at once up here whether I want it or not.
But you accepted this mission. You could have stayed on Chandra Five. You willingly came aboard a ship with over a thousand people.
How could I not? Think of it, Dee. This intelligence that swims naked through space like a fish in the sea. Totally alien, mysterious, not like us at all. Ancient. And alone. So lonely, for so long.
How can you know that? Tam? You're in contact with it. With Tin Man. Aren't you?
No. Well, yes, a little. But not quite on a conscious level.
We're light years away. That's impossible, even for you.
Impossible for me. Maybe not impossible for Tin Man.
Status report, Number One?
We've reached the outer regions of the Beta Stromgren system. On course for orbital intercept of Tin Man, ETA eighteen minutes.
Grand.
Not altogether. Astrophysics reports that the star's rate of collapse has increased. It could go supernova in the next few days.
Captain, we are receiving relayed sensor data from the Vega Probe, including visuals.
On screen.
Magnify.
Remarkable. Computer locate Tam Elbrun.
Tam Elbrun is in turbolift one, en route to the main Bridge.
Of course.
Captain. Our sensors are detecting a subspace wave front of highly ionised particles preceding the object which is tracking us.
Yellow Alert. On screen.
Romulan warbird closing. They are arming main disruptors, Captain.
Go to Red Alert. Shields to maximum.
Arm photon torpedoes and stand by, Mister Worf.
Aye, sir.
I thought you said the Enterprise was faster than this Romulan.
In fact, we are, Commander. However
Evasive, Mister Crusher. Hailing frequencies.
I guarantee that they don't want to talk to you, Captain.
The Romulan has passed us.
Damage report.
Casualties reported. Seventy percent loss to the shields.
Their attack on us was incidental, Captain.
Incidental?
Yes. To delay us.
Captain, it would appear that the Romulan's intent is to contact Tin Man first, at any cost. According to my sensor readings, the warbird has exceeded maximum engine output by thirty percent. They seem to have irreparable damage to their warp coils.
So they kept up with us by sacrificing their ability to re-enter Romulan space.
One way trip.
There is one more trailing us, Captain. A day or two behind. Data's right. This one's job is to beat us to Tin Man at any cost.
You read all this, telepathically?
In the mind of the Romulan commander during the attack.
Very well. Mister Crusher, all stop.
Aye, sir.
Commander La Forge.
La Forge here.
Geordi
How long to full shield restoration?
I'm working on it. Computer, reconfigure structural integrity power to feed inner deflector grid.
Unable to comply. Requested reroute would compromise operational safety limits.
To hell with the limits. Override. Authorization La Forge theta two nine nine seven.
Rerouting structural integrity power supply.
Russell, watch the lateral grid balance. No. no, no, that's too much. We're going to have to do it manually. La Forge to Bridge.
Go ahead.
Captain, I'm trying to feed the inner grid by stealing some power from the structural integrity field. You should have partial shielding in thirty minutes.
You have ten. Picard out.
If the Romulans wish the honour of the first contact, let them have it.
You're out of your mind, Picard! What if the Romulans find a way to persuade Tin Man to
I think the chances of that is remote. And if you will be still, Mister Elbrun, you may learn.
What?
That being first, at any cost, is not always the point. Mister Data, while we await repairs, I want Life Sciences and Engineering to continue collecting information on the alien. And query the Vega Nine probe, long range sensors.
Aye, sir.
You do a lot of your work here?
Yes. I have configured these instruments to display information with greater speed and efficiency than stations used by the others.
Nice. A little Spartan.
Spartan?
Lots of work space, not much room to live. I don't guess you sleep.
I have tried it from time to time. But you are correct. I do not require rest.
But you paint.
The creature's anatomy appears most peculiar.
In what way?
It is indeed laid out as a vessel with what appear to be corridors and chambers. An internal environment suitable for carbon based life forms is being maintained, yet there is no evidence of a crew aboard. Tin Man is a living being which has been bred or has adapted itself to serve a purpose. I find that interesting.
Why? Must living beings have a purpose? Or do we exist for no reason but to exist?
I do not believe I am qualified to express an opinion.
Ah, Data, you're uniquely qualified. You think a great deal about humanity and you're an honest researcher. You don't treat anything as trivial, or irrelevant. You want to try it all.
You said in the transporter room that you could not read my mind.
True enough. But I think I understand you pretty well. It worries you that I can't read your mind?
Perhaps there is nothing to read. Nothing more than mechanisms and algorithmic responses.
Perhaps you're just different. Not a sin, you know, though you may have heard otherwise.
Captain, the Romulan ship is hailing the alien using their equivalent of linguacode.
Response?
Nothing so far, Commander.
Why should it answer? What could it possibly have in common with them?
But you're so sure it'll talk to you.
Captain, the Romulans are arming all disruptors.
Yellow alert. Prepare for evasive action at the first change in the Romulan's course.
With our shields in their present condition, we can't
No! No! We're not the target. It's Tin Man.
What do you mean? Do they intend to destroy it?
Those are their orders if they can't secure the alien.
Increase speed to intercept the Romulan vessel.
Their lead is too great, sir.
Hail them. We cannot allow them
They won't listen to you!
Danger. Gomtuu. Do not allow.
Damage report!
Nothing available yet, sir. We have partial failure of the main computer.
It seems you woke your Tin Man.
We've got impulse power, but I've got to take the warp engines offline while we recalibrate the intermix regulators.
How long?
For everything, or just for the warp engine?
All of it.
Commander, we're looking at twenty hours work here, double shifts.
We don't know that we have twenty hours. That star could explode at any moment.
I know. Okay, first thing we need to do is get the main computer working right.
No, we fix the shields first.
Commander, whatever Tin Man hit us with, it fried circuits I thought were unfryable.
I'm not worried about Tin Man. It's more Romulans showing up.
Right. First priority, get the shields up. Only let's not have any more surprises till I'm done, okay?
Don't ask me about surprises. Ask Tam Elbrun.
Your brain activity suggests that you're coming out of a sort of fugue, or seizure. Your blood pressure and glucose are indicative of general systemic stress.
But I'm going to live?
No doubt about it.
Good. Because I want to know exactly what you did. I want to know how closely you are in communication with the alien, and what you've learned about it, and I want to know now.
I just warned it, that's all. I've been in contact with it, sensing impressions from it. It calls itself Gomtuu. It's old, Captain. It's roamed the universe for many thousands of years.
Where did it come from? How many
Far away. Maybe beyond the galaxy. Once there were millions of them.
Once?
It hasn't seen another of its kind for millennia. It's alone. It may be the last of its species.
Perhaps we can help it in some way. Can you ask it to return with us to Federation space? At least persuade it to leave the vicinity of Beta Stromgren, before the star explodes?
Captain, Gomtuu knows that the star will go nova soon. That's why it's here. It wants to die. There was an explosion in space. Radiation penetrating the outer layers. The crew. Oh, the crew died. Such loss. Empty pain, Hollowness.
Tam. Stop this! You're losing yourself in this this merging.
I know. I know. Tin Man hurts and wants to die. I can't do any more from out here. If you want me to really reach Tin Man, I have got to be in physical contact. I have got to go aboard.
No. That is absolutely out of the question.
You don't trust me.
No, Tam, I don't believe that I do. Tam, when you reached out to the alien, to warn it, did you give any thought to this vessel? To the danger, however inadvertent, that creature might pose to our crew? Or did you simply react out of instinct?
Captain
Deanna, he's right. I don't know. I don't know what might happen but if you don't let me go, we fail our mission. Besides, at this point, you need all the help you can get. Even Tin Man's.
Russell, reactivate the sensor assemblies. Okay, let's do a programme reload, port array only. Good. That's good. Computer, run level two diagnostic.
Port sensor array remains offline.
Damn.
Riker to La Forge. How's it coming?
Not good. I think all the control processors are shot. But maybe if I swap the chips from the secondary array, I can give you a minimum EM scan.
Do it.
Okay Russell, we're going to try starting retro sensor element thirty two only. You in? Go. The good news is that we have partial long range sensors. La Forge to Bridge.
Riker here.
I'm picking up another echo on the long range sensor display here. You getting that
On your panel?
Worf?
One moment, Commander. Confirmed. Sir, the other Romulan ship on an intercept course.
Geordi, are we going to have those shields anytime soon?
I'm doing the best I can
But shields won't help if that star explodes.
Data, you seem to have developed an affinity with Elbrun. Troi, you've known him for years. How far can he be trusted?
Captain, the issue isn't one of trust in Tam's intentions, but in his judgment. I would trust him to do what he believes is right
Yes, of course. But his judgment
Is precarious. The stress of exposure to so many minds on the ship is bad enough. Now he's strongly drawn to this creature. I'm afraid for him.
Afraid of what?
I sense that the alien is somehow calling him. If we allow him to do as he insists, to beam over, I'm believe that we will lose him to it. That he will lose himself.
Captain, I agree that Tam's motives are trustworthy, and I do not believe it is possible that he will act against us, or will cause Tin Man to act against us out of malice.
Captain, if Tam breaks down over there, we'll be no closer to accomplishing our mission. It would be a grave mistake.
Thank you both.
Data?
I am puzzled, sir. We have come this far. Are you not going to allow Tam to fulfill his mission?
Tam Elbrun warned Tin Man. The first thing it did was to destroy a space vessel.
I believe I understand, sir. If you feel the risk is too great to send Tam Elbrun alone, then send me with him.
Counselor Troi understands him better.
But he is more comfortable with me, sir. It is humanity he is fleeing. Sir, I can serve as an intermediary, a bridge back. A reminder of his obligations both to us and to Tin Man.
Captain, the Romulan has uncloaked.
Status, Number One?
Shields are at forty percent. We can manoeuvre on impulse, sir.
Phasers available on manual, sir. Computer target lock not functioning.
Well, let's hope they're in a mood to talk. Hailing frequency.
Open.
Romulan vessel this is Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the USS Enterprise.
Enterprise, your presence here is a violation of Romulan space. You will leave immediately.
We are not familiar with the terms of your claim on this sector. We're here engaged in scientific research. Do you wish to participate?
We have monitored the destruction of our sister ship by the star creature. We claim right of vengeance. We will destroy the alien. If you interfere, we will destroy you as well.
Captain's log, Supplemental. A confrontation between the Romulan Warbird and Tin Man is imminent. I have no alternative but to rely on the telepathic abilities of Tam Elbrun.
Picard to Tam Elbrun.
Captain?
Report to transporter room six immediately.
Captain, I don't
Commander Data will meet you there.
Yes, Captain.
Counsellor, we no longer have a choice.
No. No. Too much. Too much.
Tam?
I can't.
Data to Enterprise. Enterprise, come in.
No, don't.
If it is harming you, we must return. Enterprise, respond.
It's all right. It's all right now. Gomtuu was trying to communicate a lifetime of experiences to me in a few seconds, but I'm all right now.
O'BRIEN:O'Brien to Bridge.
Go ahead, Chief.
O'BRIEN:I lost the transporter lock on them.
O'BRIEN:Some kind of force field went up.
Confirmed. The alien has thrown up a shield. It is blocking all our sensors. Captain, the Romulans' weapons systems are now at full power.
Follow them in, Mister Crusher. Red Alert. Mister Worf, arm photon torpedoes.
Aye, sir.
Yes.
There is a large chamber twenty metres ahead.
I know. I know everything now. Come on.
Intriguing.
This is the control centre, where Gomtuu's crew guided their journeys. The ship and the crew existed symbiotically. They needed one another. When Gomtuu had no one left to care for, it no longer had a reason to exist.
Is that the purpose of existence? To care for someone?
It is for me. Deanna was right. I'll lose myself here.
I must remind you that our objective is to bring Tin Man out of danger and report our findings to Starfleet.
I'm not going back, Data. I'm staying here.
Sir, the Romulans are hailing us.
Captain Picard, if you interfere with us, we will fire upon you as well.
Commander, we are prepared to defend the life of the alien. Screen off. Shields up.
Power levels aboard the alien are increasing, sir.
Captain, the diameter of the star has decreased by one hundred thousand kilometres.
It's beginning.
Explain to them. Make them understand.
But our mission
Is to save Tin Man. And I will. But he's going to save me as well. All my life I have waited for this. A chance to find peace. Finally all the voices are silent. Only Tin Man speaks to me now. Don't you see, Data? This is where I belong.
That star's going to go any minute, sir.
The Romulans know that as well as we do.
Power levels aboard Tin Man are increasing beyond our sensor range.
Conn report.
Dead stop, Captain. Sir, we've been thrown clear of Beta Stromgren. A distance of three point eight billion kilometres.
There is no sign of Tin Man or the Romulans, sir. Captain, on screen.
Data.
Sir?
Data, what happened over there?
Difficult to explain, Captain.
Tam?
I believe he found what he was looking for, Counsellor.
Captain's log, supplemental. With all main systems at least temporarily restored, we are proceeding to Starbase one five two for inspection and additional repairs. We have had no further encounter with the Romulans. As for the whereabouts of Tin Man and Tam Elbrun, we can only speculate.
You sent for me?
Yes, Counsellor. It was Tam's final request that I explain his decision to the crew. But I believe his hope was that you would understand.
What did happen?
I witnessed something remarkable. Individually they were both so
Wounded? Isolated?
Yes. But no longer. Through joining they have been healed. Grief has been transmuted to joy. Loneliness to belonging.
Data, you do understand.
Yes, Counsellor. When Tin Man returned me to the Enterprise, I realised this is where I belong.
Ready to begin orbit of Angel One, Captain.
Make it so, Mister La Forge. What kind of place is this, Data?
Angel One is a class M planet, sir, supporting carbon based flora and fauna, sparsely populated with intelligent life forms. It is similar in technological development to mid-twentieth century Earth.
Kind of like being marooned at home.
Assuming any of the survivors made it this far. Admittedly, it 'is the closest planet to the Odin, but to travel distance we did in two days at warp one would have taken the Odin escape pod five months.
Five months, fourteen days, eleven hours, two minutes
Thank you, Data.
And fifty seven seconds.
Captain, we're receiving an audio signal from Angel One.
Starfleet are adamant that we maintain excellent diplomatic relations with this planet. Mister Data, is there any other pertinent information before we reply?
Angel One has evolved into a constitutional oligarchy. It is governed by a parliamentary body consisting of six elected Mistresses, and headed by a female they refer to as The Elected One.
It sounds like my own planet.
Klingons appreciate strong women.
How current is this information, Mister Data?
A Federation vessel last visited this planet sixty two years ago, Captain.
Counsellor, as this is a female dominated society, you might wish to make the initial contact.
Thank you, sir.
Open hailing frequencies.
Hailing frequencies open, sir.
This is Counsellor Deanna Troi from the USS Enterprise.
I am Beata, The Elected One. How may we assist you, Counsellor?
The Federation has neglected to visit to your planet for far too long. With your permission, we would like to correct that oversight.
We feel in no way neglected, Counsellor. A diplomatic courtesy call is neither expected nor required.
We also come in search of possible survivors from one of our freighters.
A brief visit will be tolerated.
They've broken off transmission.
Ever feel like you're not really wanted?
Where're you fellows off to?
Our ski instructor has us scheduled for the Denubian Alps, sir.
Save us some deep powder.
No problem, sir. The holodecks have all you'll ever need.
The away team's ready, sir.
Angel One's strategic importance in this quadrant may become vital. Starfleet's hope is that one day this world may become part of the Federation.
We'll do our best to make a good impression, sir.
Energise.
Captain's log, supplemental. Our away team has beamed down to an unusual matriarchal society where the female is as aggressively dominant as the male gender was on Earth hundreds of years ago. Here, the female is the hunter, the soldier, larger and stronger than the male. An arrangement considered most sensible and natural.
I am Beata, The Elected One of Angel One. Representatives of the Starfleet Enterprise, do you wish to petition?
We do. We have reason to hope that survivors from a damaged Federation freighter may be marooned on your planet. We are seeking to learn if this is so.
Even a planet as remote as Angel One has heard of Starfleet. Searching the galaxy for survivors seems a petty task for one of their mighty vessels.
We don't consider even one survivor petty.
Is this man implying that we put a lesser value on life than you do?
Not at all. Our discovery of the freighter was unexpected. We have a duty to investigate.
I see. And if you find any survivors, what then?
We will take them with us and see that they were reunited with their families.
Are we to take these strangers at their word?
Good question.
What reason could we possibly have to deceive you?
Another good question.
Are there survivors from the freighter Odin on your planet?
I'm not prepared to answer, yet. See to their comforts.
What's going on?
You will remain here until summoned.
Is thus area secure? Can we talk?
Yes. Tricorder doesn't show any listening devices or anything else of a threatening nature.
Good. Troi?
There was much fear in that room.
Paranoia, I'd say. But of what?
I cannot say. But their fear was not focused. I sensed that all were not concerned for the same reason. Undoubtedly there are survivors from the Odin on this planet.
I agree. Otherwise, why would they be so circumspect?
As Mistress Beata is so fond of saying, good question.
What do we do if they deny the existence of survivors?
Let's not look for problems.
I want all departments prepared for a warp six trip into the Neutral Zone as soon as the away team completes its mission.
Trouble, Captain?
Insurance. Romulan battle cruisers have been detected near one of our border posts.
They've requested assistance as soon as Argh!
Report, Mister Crusher.
We finished our ski lesson, sir, and it kind of just happened.
On the Enterprise, Mister Crusher, nothing just happens. What is that smell?
Hmm, yes. Slightly reminiscent of night blooming throgni, Captain. From home. Quite stimulating, wouldn't you say?
No.
I don't smell anything. I'm a little congested. The snow.
Don't let this just happen again, Mister Crusher.
Yes, sir.
Interesting. An alcohol-based synthetic, artificially reproducing a floral scent.
It's called perfume, Data.
The purpose of which is?
Certain cultures consider perfume an aphrodisiac.
I am unfamiliar with that term.
An aphrodisiac is something used to stimulate or enhance sexual pleasure.
How does stimulation of the olfactory nerves affect the enjoyment of sex?
The Elected One will see you now.
You claim you intend to remove these survivors from our planet. Are you prepared to give us your solemn word on that?
We are.
You should know that the vote was not unanimous. Some of those among us are suspicious. Yet the majority feel that we have no choice but to trust you.
We don't understand the source of your misgivings, Mistress, but we appreciate your faith in us.
Make certain that faith is not misplaced. There are four survivors from the ship you call Odin. All male. Their leader is a man who calls himself Ramsey.
If you'll deliver these men to us, we'll have them off your planet immediately.
If they were mine to deliver, I would do it without hesitation. Unfortunately, their hiding place has long eluded us.
Hiding place? Why are they in hiding?
Because they are fugitives on Angel One, and the quicker we get rid of them, the better. When these men came to us seven years ago, they accepted our hospitality quickly enough. But they gradually became restive, started making unreasonable demands, went against the natural order.
Using the technology of the Enterprise, we might be able to find these men.
I assumed as much. But be warned, Counsellor, these men are dangerous.
Sickbay to Captain Picard.
Picard here.
Wesley and one of his friends have contracted some form of respiratory ailment.
A respiratory aliment? Is it contained?
I hope so. I've isolated the twelve students who were on the Quazulu Eight field trip.
How contagious is it?
Still running tests. The key is to figure out how the virus is transmitted. So far I've been able to rule out
Person to person contact.
Well, keep with it, Doctor. Starfleet has very important business for us as soon as the away team returns. I don't fancy the idea of my crew being infected.
Data, what's the best way to go about finding Ramsey and the other survivors?
If we can isolate something unique to the Odin survivors, perhaps an element not otherwise found on Angel One, we can utilise the Enterprise scanners.
Mister Data will need access to your library.
Our library is far too sophisticated for a man to comprehend.
I am an android, Mistress, although anatomically I am a male.
An amusing notion. Maybe you could teach our males a thing or two. Trent, see to the android's needs.
Bridge to Captain Picard.
Go ahead, Lieutenant.
The away team requests that we scan the planet surface for traces of platinum.
Have Mister La Forge break fixed orbit and initiate a search pattern.
Aye, Captain. Geordi.
Search pattern initiated now.
This was delivered for you.
Good. It's for my meeting with Beata.
You're not going to wear that.
Of course. Part of this mission is diplomatic. I have requested an audience with a head of state, and I will honour her by wearing indigenous apparel.
I don't believe this. You're going to put that thing on and parade around like one of them?
Why, what is this attitude? On Kabatris I had to wear furs to meet the leadership council. And on Armus Nine I wore feathers. This objection doesn't have anything to do with the fact that Beata is a woman, and an attractive one, does it?
This is quite unnecessary, Doctor. I'm fine.
You're infected with the virus. Captain. In my opinion, you are no longer physically able to effectively command this vessel.
That is ridiculous, Doctor. I have an away team down there, in less than friendly territory, and in addition I have an appointment with several Romulan battlecruisers.
You have an appointment in your cabin, Captain. With your bed.
Is that an order, Doctor?
Yes.
I think I may sneeze.
A Klingon sneeze?
Only kind I know.
Lieutenant La Forge, you have command until further notice. Please, make the proper ship's log entries.
Aye, sir.
Scanners indicate a platinum trace. Should I notify the away team?
Make it so.
Tasha.
What do you think?
Well, I got to say, it's kind of sexy.
Thank you, Lieutenant. Actually it feels quite comfortable.
How handsome you look.
Thank you, The Enterprise reports a possible location for Mister Ramsey and the other survivors.
So soon? I'm impressed.
I suspicious.
You don't believe me?
Not yet. I hear the words, but not the sincerity.
You had your opportunity to object, Ariel. You were in the minority.
After seven years, the great ship Enterprise come to repatriate a small group of insignificant people.
Mistress Ariel, I hear the words but not the sincerity.
You should listen more carefully. Excuse me, Mistress. I have matters to attend to elsewhere.
With your permission, we'd like to begin our search immediately.
By all means. But I'm sure that Counsellor Troi and the others can do that without you. If I recall, you had a gesture of goodwill you wished to give to me?
Certainly that can wait until we've recovered the survivors.
Are you suggesting that the women in your party are incapable of accomplishing their task without the help of a man?
Not at all. Lieutenant Yar and Counsellor Troi are completely qualified.
You're very generous with your praise. Inform them you will remain here with me.
Riker to Lieutenant Yar.
This is Yar.
In the interests of diplomatic relations, I'll remain here with Mistress Beata while you conduct our search.
Commander?
You have your instructions.
Relax. We have much to discuss.
Set phasers to stun.
I wish they weren't necessary.
A justified precaution, Counsellor. Mistress Beata observed that Mister Ramsey and his men are dangerous.
Lieutenant Yar to Enterprise.
Go ahead, Tasha.
Three to beam to the location of that platinum trace, Geordi.
Coordinates set.
Energise.
Tasha!
Welcome. I've been expecting you.
Picard to Bridge.
La Forge here.
Status report.
Eighty-two more reported cases of the virus, sir. Doctor Crusher's converted the holodeck into an isolation ward.
And the away team?
Well, no recent contact, sir, but I have informed them of the medical situation up here and the growing Romulan threat to our Neutral Zone outpost.
Keep me advised. You have the Bridge until Commander Riker returns.
Engineering reports a computer malf  I'm sorry, I'm getting sick.
I'm sure half the ship knows that by now. Report to Sickbay, Lieutenant.
Engineering to bridge.
La Forge here.
The computer won't accept the variant climate controls.
On my way.
With all respect, Lieutenant, there are people to do that job now.
La Forge to Engineering. Lieutenant Wong knows the system. I'm sure she'll be able to resolve all problems. Worf, thanks for the advice.
How did you find me?
Actually, it was quite simple. Angel One has no platinum. Enterprise scanners did the rest.
Platinum, was it? My wings. I kept them for their sentimental value.
Where are the other survivors, Mister Ramsey?
Oh, they're nearby. They're packing, as a matter of fact, since we can no longer remain here.
Seven years on an alien planet, and I sense no anticipation, no excitement at being rescued.
What is it that you think you're rescuing me from? My shipmates and I have all taken wives. A few even have children. You can't rescue a man from a place that he calls his home.
Why were you so hesitant at first to tell us about the Odin survivors?
Simply because Ramsey and his men are anarchists. I had to make sure you weren't here to fuel their struggle. I like the way your eyes pick up the colour of your tunic.
It's not our position to interfere in the domestic affairs of other societies.
But you can interact.
Of course. Otherwise, how can we learn?
Is that why you're here with me tonight? To learn?
Yes.
About our society.
Yes.
Well, in our society, it is the men who are the fortunate ones, enjoying all life has to offer while we women devote ourselves to the obligation of making life work.
In our society, we share the responsibilities and the pleasures equally. Which is why I am able to be here with you while the women of the away team go to find Ramsey.
You'll have to remind me to thank them when they come back for giving us this time.
You resist. Don't you find me attractive?
Yes, I find you very attractive.
You attract me like no man ever has.
It's not my function to seduce or be seduced by the leader of another world.
It's not the reason.
No, it's not. But will you still respect me in the morning?
I hope so.
Thank you, Trent.
You may go.
Compliments of the USS Enterprise. It's called an Albeni meditation crystal.
Very impressive. And now I must repay you in kind.
Five months in a rescue pod no bigger than this room is an eternity I hope none of you will ever have to face. When we finally made it here, we thought we'd died and gone to heaven. You've seen the women of the planet. They're tall and strong and lovely. But after the newness wore off, we started to see how the men were treated. There's no votes. There's no opinions. There's no respect.
None of which is your concern any longer, Mister Ramsey. Call the others in, please. It's time to leave.
Despite their problems, Lieutenant, we happen to like it here on Angel One. We're not going anywhere.
But Mistress Beata
Mistress Beata be damned! Her wish is not my command, and neither is yours. You can't force us to go.
Mister Ramsey is correct, Counsellor. The Odin was not a starship, which means her crew is not bound by the Prime Directive. If he and the others wish to stay here, there is absolutely nothing we can do about it.
Bridge to Sickbay how are you Doing, Doctor?
We have more sick than we do beds. So far I've been forced to confine over three hundred to their private quarters.
We're going to be seriously undermanned if we're forced to engage the Romulans in battle.
The Romulans are your problem, Lieutenant. Trying to find an inoculants is mine. This virus mutates every twenty minutes. But so far we haven't had any fatalities, yet.
If this continues, there'll be no one left to run the ship.
If this continues, Lieutenant La Forge, no one will be healthy enough to care.
Yar to Enterprise.
Enterprise here. Go ahead.
Prepare to beam three to our previous location, Geordi. After re-grouping with Commander Riker, we'll return to the ship.
I suggest you make that on the double, Tasha. We have a real medical emergency brewing up here.
One third of the crew is down, and the latest information from the Neutral Zone outpost is that more Romulan vessels are converging on that area.
I'll inform the Commander. Yar out. One thing before we go. You said you were expecting us. Why?
I can't answer that.
We wish you well, Mister Ramsey.
Energise.
They're gone.
What a refreshing change to be with a man who knows what he wants.
And doesn't have to be told by a woman?
Exactly. I knew you were bright enough to understand. You see, women, by our very nature, want only what is best for their men.
Men are not objects to be possessed, Mistress Beata.
Of course they're not. It was merely a figure of speech.
Enter.
What is so important you find it necessary to intrude upon my privacy?
They have returned, Mistress, but without Ramsey or the others.
Your advanced technology has proven inadequate?
What happened, Tasha?
Mister Ramsey and the other survivors refuse to leave.
You gave me your solemn word.
I'm sorry, there's nothing else we can do.
I'm sorry as well. Since you refuse to take them with you, I am left with no choice but to sentence them all to death.
Come.
It looks horrible, tastes worse, and it's absolutely guaranteed to make you feel better.
I knew you'd like it. Are you wearing cologne? Like something I smelled earlier. Something Klingon.
Lieutenant Worf and I detected the same scent when we bumped into your son at the Holodeck.
It's that smell. That's how the virus travels. An airborne particle whose sweet scent inspires deep inhalation. And once inside the body, it becomes that damned virus. I have work to do.
You are excused, Doctor.
What's the latest on the Enterprise's medical situation?
Doctor Crusher feels the virus will undoubtedly run unchecked through the entire ship. Attempts to develop an inoculants have so far ended in failure. Lieutenant La Forge still has Bridge command pending your return, sir.
And what about the Romulans entering the Neutral Zone?
The border outpost reports a contingent of seven Romulan battlecruisers within sensor range. The USS Berlin has answered the distress call. However, should hostilities erupt, both the outpost and the starship will be out-gunned. It is felt that the Enterprise's presence in the area will be a vital show of force.
Some show of force. The Enterprise could fly on autopilot, but with that virus knocking down our crew, we're going to be in sorry shape if things turn ugly.
I think it's time we to leave this place.
It doesn't feel right to leave while Beata is determined to execute those people.
She has to find them first. Ramsey and his bunch have been fugitives for years. I suspect he's pretty good at evading capture.
Something's wrong.
Before you go back to your ship, there's something I want you to see.
We were no harm to anyone. Why did you tell them where to find us?
You brought this upon yourself. You and the traitor. One does not need the technology of the Enterprise to follow Mistress Ariel sneaking out to warn her husband. Let her stand with him now. For tomorrow they will die together.
You claim to be an advanced society, and yet you resort to executions in order to suppress those who don't share your views.
I don't expect you to understand.
Why? Because I'm only a man?
You'll accomplish nothing with that attitude.
Mistress Beata, if you had an alternative to the execution of Ramsey and his followers, would you take it?
Is that not the way of an advanced society?
Then let us meet with the men from Odin one last time. Let me try to convince them to leave with us.
Will you also include those from this world who unwisely choose to follow Ramsey and his group?
Yes. All of them.
Mistress Beata is willing to give you a second chance. We're prepared to take your entire group with us.
That's very kind of you, but we're not going.
Haven't you been paying attention, Ramsey? You're scheduled to be executed tomorrow.
We don't want to die. We don't want to leave, either.
There's no time to debate the issues. You're going with us whether you choose to go or not.
Excuse me, Commander, but removing any of these people against their will would be a violation of several Starfleet regulations, not the least of which would be the Prime Directive.
I realise that, Mister Data. I'd rather face a court martial than live with the guilt of leaving these people to their deaths. Commander Riker to Enterprise.
This is the Enterprise. Crusher here.
It must be worse up there than we thought.
Doctor, where is Lieutenant La Forge?
He's right here, but he's in bad shape.
Notify the transporter room I have fourteen to beam up.
I can't allow it.
This virus is totally out of control here. Until I know exactly what I'm dealing with, I can't let anyone new be exposed.
Doctor, these people are facing their deaths down here.
They might be facing the same thing up here. Until I have a better idea of what I'm dealing with, no one can beam up. I'm sorry, Will, but you must wait.
Understood. Doctor, would this virus have any effect on Mister Data?
Not likely.
You're going back there alone. I want you to get the Enterprise into the Neutral Zone before it's too late.
This is Data, standing by to beam up.
What of them?
I don't know, Deanna.
Mistress Beata invites you to witness this morning's reaffirmation of Angel One's moral imperative.
Is that the civilised word for murder on this world?
You send Mistress Beata our regrets.
The Elected One will not look fondly upon
Enterprise to Commander Riker.
They're still here!
Riker here. Data, I gave you direct orders to get to Neutral Zone immediately. Explain the delay.
To be precise, Commander, you ordered me to reach the Neutral Zone before it is too late.
After relieving Lieutenant La Forge, I computed the length of time the border outpost
And the USS Berlin can safely withstand a Romulan attack, and deducted our time to destination at maximum warp speed. That leaves Doctor Crusher forty eight minutes to develop an inoculants to the virus.
Which means there's still time for us to do something.
Forty-eight minutes.
Forty seven, sir.
Perhaps, Data, perhaps. Thank you
For following my orders so precisely, Data.
On second thought, Trent, we would be honoured to witness your moral imperative in action.
We have determined that the heretical teachings of Ramsey and his followers are inconsistent with harmonious life on Angel One. Our patient efforts to silence revolutionary voices have failed. Therefore we are left with none but the most final alternative.
As you can see, we are not without compassion. Your deaths will be swift and painless.
Mistress Beata, before we see living examples of your compassion, may I speak?
Is this a plea for leniency?
Nothing of the sort. As the governing body of Angel One, you're entitled to execute your laws or your citizens as you see fit.
Make your point, so we can proceed with this unpleasant business.
When you spoke of the prisoners, you used the term revolutionary. Indeed, death has been known to stop revolutions. But I suspect it's not a revolution that Angel One is hoping to stop. It's evolution. Mister Ramsey and the Odin survivors did not initiate the waves of dissent that are rippling through your planet. Their presence here merely reinforced the change in attitudes between men and women that was already well under way. They became symbols around whom others who shared their views could gather. You may eliminate the symbols, but that does not mean death to the issues which those symbols represent. No power in the universe can hope to stop the force of evolution. Be warned. The execution of Mister Ramsey and his followers may elevate them to the status of martyrs. Martyrs cannot be silenced.
Beata!
Stop. We will adjourn to consider your words.
Thank you.
I don't know if it was enough.
Sickbay to Bridge.
Go ahead, Doctor.
Bingo, Data.
Bingo? I fail to see the relevance, Doctor. Is that not a reference to an ancient Earth game?
It's also a reference to success, Data. I've got the inoculants.
Excellent, Doctor. We still have seventeen minutes left. I will inform the away team immediately. Enterprise to Riker.
We are ready to have you beamed up, Commander.
Data, Ramsey and the prisoners are with us in the Great Hall. I want you to lock the transporter. Prepare to evacuate the entire group.
But for now, stand by.
Understood, Commander.
After careful consideration, this legislature has voted to stay the execution of the prisoners. Their children will be returned to them immediately. Do not rejoice prematurely. Ramsey and his followers are to be exiled to a distant and unpopulated region. Life will be difficult there with little time for revolutionary or evolutionary upheaval. As some have observed, we may be able to stop evolution, but perhaps we can reduce it to a slow crawl. For a man, you can be very clever, Commander Riker.
Riker to Enterprise. Belay my previous order, Mister Data. There will now be only three to beam up. Energise.
Welcome home.
It's good to be back.
Are they recovering?
Slowly, but yes.
And the Captain?
The Captain is fine, thank you. Mister Data has been briefing me on the away team's comportment, Number One.
We improvised, sir.
I look forward to your reports.
Don't we have a call to pay on the Romulans, Captain?
Indeed we do. Mister Data, set course for the Neutral Zone. Warp six. DATA Co-ordinates set. Warp six on your mark, sir.
Engage.
Sir?
Engage.
Direct hit to the port nacelle. Only minimal damage. Hit to the starboard nacelle. Still, no appreciable damage.
Will must've done something to their weapons.
I believe you are right, Counsellor. It is now up to us to play along. Release inertial dampers and cut power to decks thirty one through thirty seven.
Aye, sir.
Set phasers to twenty five percent. Return fire.
Aye, sir.
Continue firing!
I've lost three plasma relays on the disruptors. Auxiliary power is, is not available.
Transfer weapons control to my station. There's a way to bypass the relays and feed power
The antimatter containment units are starting to buckle!
The Enterprise has been badly damaged but they still have superior firepower. If we remain here, we will be destroyed. The logical course of action is to withdraw.
We've done enough damage. Narik, set course one eight zero, mark two one five. Warp six. Initiate.
They're preparing to activate their warp drive, Commander.
Sir, we cannot be able to track them with our sensors if they go to warp. I can still disable them
I am aware of the tactical situation, Lieutenant. Let them go.
I've gone over every word, every inflection, every facial response, and I still can't find any kind of code or hidden message.
I agree the existence of such a message is remote, but I believe we should check.
I'll keep trying.
Two starships have been sent to intercept the mercenaries at Yadalla Prime and Draken Four, in case they attempt to attack those planets.
Inform Starfleet Command that we will hold this position until further notice.
So, we are just going to remain here?
Yes, but we will continue to pursue all avenues of investigation.
If we had not let them to escape, this would not be necessary.
That is correct. But I believe Commander Riker wanted us to let them escape.
Commander, I think I've got something. I've been studying the comm. link Commander Riker used to transmit his command codes. I didn't see anything at first, but then I ran the transmission through a subharmonic analysis. I found this. It was sent by the same carrier wave as the command codes.
It might be the message we've been looking for.
Possibly. I will attempt to resequence the signal. Begin running a search for a decryption key.
I'm taking the engines offline.
How long will it take to repair our battle damage?
It will take at least five hours to replace the antimatter containment unit.
You have three hours, Narik. One minute beyond that and you'll answer for it with your life. I suppose I should thank you. None of us would be alive if it weren't for you.
You're welcome.
What's wrong, Commander? You having second thoughts about betraying your comrades? Because that's what you've done, betrayed them. Betrayed them in order to save yourself. You used to be just a second rate officer, now you're a traitor and a coward. How does that feel?
I don't know. How did that feel?
That's enough. Galen, go down to the cargo hold and check out those artefacts. Move.
You can tell Baran that I'm working as fast as I can. What?
I'm trying to decide if you're incredibly stupid or incredibly smart. Why didn't you continue to fire on the Enterprise when their shields dropped?
You were there. The disruptors lost power. Computer, reset for diagnostic of new sample. Begin scan.
I've watched you handle the weapon systems before. You know exactly how to bypass a problem like that. And why do you continue to argue with Riker? It should be obvious that by alienating Riker you also alienate Baran, and yet you continue to do so. Why?
Scan complete. Terikon profile negative.
Computer, reset diagnostic for new sample and begin scan. Look this isn't a Romulan labour camp. I don't have to answer your questions. And I don't give a damn what you think.
Scan complete. Terikon profile positive. Ninety eight percent probability of match.
Well, whatever it is we're looking for, it seems we've found it.
Tallera to Captain.
Yes, what is it?
I'm in the cargo hold. Galen's made a positive Terikon match on
One of the artefacts.
Good. Bring it to me immediately. Don't let anyone get near it.
Understood. Tallera out.
That sounds like good news.
Very. It means we've completed half of what promises to be a very profitable mission. And even better than that, I'm almost ready to get rid of your friend Galen.
Really?
There's one more artefact to find. Once Galen confirms that it's genuine, his usefulness on this ship will come to a very sudden end.
I can't say I'm sorry to hear that.
Galen might be a loud mouthed fool, but sometimes he's quite perceptive. His observations about you, for instance.
Oh?
After what you did on Calder Two, I doubt if you have much of a future in Starfleet.
Yes, I must say I've come to the same conclusion.
Well, assuming that you were not my prisoner, what would you do now?
I guess I'd start looking for a new career. There must be a place where someone with fifteen years of Starfleet technical knowledge would be useful. You wouldn't happen to know a place like that?
Well, possibly. However, there's one thing that I have learned on this ship, and that's to be cautious and never to blindly embrace what might appear to be good fortune. And right now, you're a rather large stroke of good luck.
I haven't exactly sworn my undying allegiance to you either, Baran. For instance, I'd like to know a little bit more about the job.
Such as?
Such as what you meant by a very profitable mission.
Well, it's enough to know right now that your share will ensure a very wealthy and long life far from the Federation.
Sounds promising.
It is, only you're going to have to earn it. And you can start by putting aside your dislike for Galen and becoming his friend.
Why?
Galen has allies on this ship. They could cause trouble if I decide to kill him. I want you to find out from him who they are.
Okay.
One more thing, Riker. When the time comes, I want you to kill Galen.
I have completed my analysis of the signal from the mercenary ship. I believe these groupings represent bearings and coordinates taken from their navigational system.
So you think this is their flight plan?
Yes. If I am correct, the mercenary ship is heading toward these coordinates in the Hyralan Sector.
Their maximum speed is warp eight point seven. It will take them at least fourteen hours to reach that position.
We could be there in five.
Make it so.
Finally. Set course for the Hyralan Sector and engage at warp nine.
Aye, sir.
Lieutenant, may I see you in the ready room?
Of course.
Lieutenant, I am dissatisfied with your performance as First Officer.
May I ask in what way?
You continually question my orders in front of the crew. I do not believe this is appropriate behaviour.
With all due respect, sir, I have always felt free to voice my opinions even when they differ from those of Captain Picard or Commander Riker.
That is true. But in those situations, you were acting as Head of Security, not as First Officer. The primary role of the second in command is to carry out the decisions of the Captain in this case, me.
But is it not my duty to offer you alternatives?
Yes. But once I have made a decision, it is your job to carry it out regardless of how you may personally feel. Any further objections should be given to me in private, not in front of the crew. I do not recall Commander Riker ever publicly showing irritation with his Captain as you did a moment ago.
No, sir.
If you do not feel capable of carrying out this role, I will assign it to Commander La Forge and return you to Tactical. I would not enter it into your record as a reprimand, simply as a transfer.
I would prefer to remain at my current post.
Then I expect you to conform to the guidelines I have laid out.
Aye, sir.
Dismissed. Mister Worf, I am sorry if I have ended our friendship.
Sir, it is I who has jeopardised our friendship, not you. If you will overlook this incident, I would like to continue to consider you my friend.
I would like that as well.
Thank you, sir.
Good to see you, too.
I've had some unpleasant surprises. Will, this isn't a good idea. Baran might grow suspicious.
As a matter of fact, it was Baran who sent me here. He told me to pretend to be friendly with you and help you organise a mutiny, so he can determine who your supporters in the crew and then eliminate them.
What a tangled web we weave. I have difficulty remembering whose side I'm on. So, what have you been able to find out?
When we reach the Hyralan Sector, we're supposed to rendezvous with a Klingon transport ship. I'm not sure, but I think they may be delivering another of the Romulan artefacts to us.
A second artefact? Oh, by the way, that first artefacts is not Romulan. It's Vulcan.
Vulcan?
I have been looking over the glyphs and pictograms from the Calder Two artefact. And although I don't have enough data to translate all the inscriptions, the alphabet and symbology is much more consistent with early Vulcan than Romulan.
Do these artefacts have some religious or cultural significance, something that would make them valuable enough to kill for?
I don't know. If I could just get access to the Enterprise computer just for a few moments. So, what will Baran do once he's obtained the second artefact?
You're supposed to verify its authenticity, and then I'm supposed to kill you, and I take your place.
Will, you always seem to be after my job. Well, as soon as Baran feels that I've outlived my usefulness, he can kill me simply by using the neural servo. So, I think we had better start planning a mutiny.
We need a new captain and I've come to one inescapable conclusion
I agree. But I don't think that's you.
Oh?
I don't trust you, Galen. I don't think the rest of the crew does either. They're not going to follow you.
Then who will they follow? You?
No, but they will follow Tallera and so will I.
Who are you?
What?
You're no smuggler and I don't think your name's Galen. You will tell me who you really are and what you are doing on this ship or I will kill you right here.
What are you talking about?
I will not play games with you. I found the message you sent to the Enterprise. When Riker was using his command codes to drop their shields, you sent them a transmission on the same carrier wave. You're a Starfleet officer. Do not deny it. It is the only logical conclusion. My name is actually T'Paal, and I am a member of the V'Shar.
Vulcan Security?
That is correct. I infiltrated this ship a year ago posing as a Romulan mercenary. I'm here to investigate a possible threat to Vulcan.
What sort of threat?
First things first, Galen. Who are you?
I'm Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the Enterprise.
Very well. To answer your question, for several years now, there has been a small but growing movement of extreme isolationists on Vulcan. A group that believes contact with alien races has polluted our culture and is destroying Vulcan purity. This group advocates the total isolation of Vulcan from the rest of the galaxy and the eradication of all alien influences from our planet.
That sounds like an illogical philosophy.
Agreed. But extremists often have a logic all their own.
Tell me, Tallera, what are these artefacts we've been collecting? I know that they are Vulcan in origin.
I am sure you are familiar with the ancient history of my people, before we found logic, before we found peace.
You were much as my people once were. Savage, warlike.
There was even a time when we used our telepathic abilities as a weapon. A time when we learned to kill with a thought.
The Stone of Gol!
You know of it?
I know the story from Vulcan mythology.
The Stone of Gol is real, but there is nothing supernatural or magical about it. It is a psionic resonator, a device which focuses and amplifies telepathic energy. It is one of the most devastating weapons ever conceived.
But according to the legend, the Stone was destroyed by the gods when the Vulcan people found the way to peace.
The resonator was believed to have been destroyed during the Time of the Awakening. Only one piece is known to have survived and it was placed in a Vulcan museum under heavy guard. A year ago, that piece was stolen from the museum. Soon after, mercenary ships began raiding archaeological sites across the quadrant. We believe a member of the isolationist movement is attempting to reassemble the resonator.
A telepathic weapon.
My orders are to find that assassin and stop him.
It would seem that Baran has to deliver these artefacts to the assassin in order to get paid. Therefore, you and I should continue our masquerade.
Agreed. But Captain, I cannot allow the resonator to be assembled. If necessary, I will destroy this ship, its crew, all of us to prevent that from happening.
Acting Captain:Acting Captain's log, stardate 47160.1. The Enterprise is entering the Hyralan Sector, which I believe to be the next destination of the mercenary ship.
I'm picking up a small vessel bearing one two seven mark three three five.
Is it the mercenary ship?
No, sir. It's a Klingon ship.
A Toron class shuttlecraft. One person.
Open a channel. This is Lieutenant Commander Data of the Federation Starship Enterprise.
Koral.
I take it that is your name? May I inquire as to your destination?
No.
May I ask the purpose of your journey?
No.
Perhaps I have not made our intentions clear. We are investigating
He seems most uncooperative.
He may have been curt, but he was also very worried and even a little scared.
Sir, may I recommend that we bring the shuttle aboard with our tractor beam, search it, and interrogate Koral.
According to the terms of the Klingon-Federation Treaty, Koral has every right to free transit through Federation space. We cannot board or search his vessel without cause.
Yes, sir. However, the Treaty does give us the right to conduct health and safety inspections of any ship in our space.
Health and safety inspections?
I am not sure that using this clause as an excuse to conduct a search would be consistent with the spirit of the Treaty.
Yes, sir.
However, if Koral wishes to contest our actions he can file a protest with the Judge Advocate General's office. Bring the shuttle aboard. Then you and Doctor Crusher can begin the inspection.
Aye, sir.
Hello. I'm Doctor Crusher, and this is Lieutenant Worf. We're here to conduct a health and safety inspection of your ship.
Health and safety inspection?
That's right. You know, radiation leaks, biochemical contamination, other health hazards. Excuse me.
Well, no radiation so far. I'm sure you're glad to hear that. Right.
There's an incoming message. It's from the Klingon shuttle. It was sent approximately fifteen minutes ago. He's at the rendezvous coordinates but he's been detained by the Enterprise. That's all there is. He's stopped transmitting.
The Enterprise.
How could they have found out about the rendezvous, Commander?
Quiet! All that matters now is that the Enterprise has the second artefact in their possession. We don't have a choice. We'll have to board the Enterprise and take the artefact.
Do you have any idea how many security officers there are on board a ship like that?
No, I don't. But he does.
I could get us on the Enterprise. I can find the artefact.
Oh, yes, very convenient. We beam you back aboard your old ship and we have to take a risk that you won't change your mind and betray us.
I have saved your life twice already, Galen. I would think you'd begin to show some gratitude by now.
Galen, if you're so worried about Riker, then you can go on the raiding party and watch him.
Agreed.
Draw weapons and equipment for a raiding party of five.
If you're thinking of betraying us to your friends on the Enterprise, you might remember that I still have the ability to kill you at the first sign of trouble.
I haven't forgotten.
I have an additional task for you, one that will prove your loyalty. This raid is an opportunity to get rid of Galen. Once you've found that artefact, kill him.
I'm sure the health and safety inspection won't last much longer. And in the meantime, I'm really glad that we have this opportunity to get to know you. May I ask what business you're in?
Lieutenant Worf has programmed our replicators to make a very good approximation of Klingon bloodwine. I believe you will find it to your liking.
Well, that's my third scan and I still haven't find anything out of the ordinary.
He must be hiding something. We should download his computer memory and analyse it.
I'd have a hard time defending that as part of a safety inspection.
We could claim that the computer was generating abnormal radiation signatures.
Worf, we're on pretty shaky ground as it is. We can't just
Don't!
Watch that door.
What is going on?
Shut your mouth, Klingon.
I guess you're surprised to see me, Doctor.
You could say that.
I've had a change of profession.
It's not in here. Hey, you, where's the artefact?
I do not know what you're talking about.
Use your brain. They wouldn't be searching the shuttle if they had the artefact. Koral must have it. Where is that Klingon pilot?
In the Observation lounge with Data and Troi.
How far?
Twelve decks away.
Security will not allow you to get that far.
They won't get the chance. We'll use the transporter in that shuttle. We'll beam directly to the Observation lounge. Sorry about this.
Let's go.
If you could tell us something about the nature of your mission.
What is this?
Quiet!  Does he have it?
This is it.
Are you sure, Galen?
Yes, I can recognise the inscription pattern from the first artefact.
Commander Riker, by taking this action you risk charges of assault, theft, piracy, and treason.
Really? Then I guess adding one more charge wouldn't hurt.
Is he dead?
Yes.
Good. Activate the transporter.
Security alert. Medical emergency team to the Observation lounge. Data to Bridge. Raise shields and begin sensor sweeps for the mercenary ship.
Aye, sir.
He's all right. He's only stunned.
I must admit, I am experiencing a similar sensation.
This is going to take a little time to explain.
Set course three one zero mark two one five, warp six.
Where is it?
I have something else for you, Baran.
Tell him what happened, Narik.
Riker turned on us. He tried to kill Galen before we beamed back.
He might have killed all of us. And I believe he was acting under direct orders, Baran. You betrayed us. This has gone far enough. I think it is time that we had a new commander. Someone who will lead us to those profits that we've been promised.
Oh, really? And who would that be, Galen? You? He's plotted this all along, opposed me at every turn, endangered all of us by refusing to follow his orders.
Follow your orders? The orders of a small man trying to fill a role too big for him. I say it's time for a change. Who's with me?
It's over, Baran.
Not quite. As long as I have this, I'm still Captain of this ship.
You can't kill all of us. You need us to run the ship more than we need you to command it.
I don't have to kill you all. Just you, Galen.
What happened?
I switched the transponder codes. Given his feelings about me, it seemed a sensible thing to do.
Baran was nothing. We have a mission to complete and the crew needs a leader.
There'll be no more punishment on this ship. Now, do your duties and I'll see to it that we complete our mission and get our payment.
Remove that.
Orders?
Maintain our present course and speed for now. I'm going to find out when and where we're supposed to deliver our cargo.
Aye, Captain.
Worf to Commander Riker. Minister Satok of Vulcan Security is standing by on a secure channel.
Put it through in here.
Greetings, Commander. How may I be of service?
Minister, I thought I should let you know that the mercenary ship which has been raiding planets in the Taugan sector is probably on its way to Vulcan right now.
I do not understand.
I'm sorry. It's been a difficult couple of days. I know that one of your operatives has been on a mercenary ship investigating the possible re-assembly of a psionic resonator. I didn't want someone to make a mistake and start firing at them when they approach your planet.
Commander, I believe there is a problem. We have no operative aboard a mercenary ship.
According to Baran's logs, we are to deliver the two pieces to the T'Karath Sanctuary on Vulcan.
I know that place. It was an underground stronghold for one of the factions during the last civil war. It's been abandoned for centuries.
Galen to Bridge. Alter course for Vulcan.
Understood.
Oh, I wonder if you can possibly help me with something. I have been able to translate most of the writing on these two pieces For the most part, they're warnings of death and destruction to anyone who opposes the resonator, but I am not able to determine what appears on the anterior side. For example, this symbol represents the Vulcan god of war and this is the god of death, but if you look really carefully, you can see a third symbol missing. Now that obviously should belong to the final piece. Now what's odd about this is that the gods of death and war would typically always stand alone on an artefact. They would never be combined with a third glyph.
Fascinating. But I am not an archaeological expert.
I'm really anxious to see the final artefact, because it might provide a valuable insight into Vulcan mythology.
When we arrive at Vulcan, I will take these pieces to a secure holding area before going on to the Sanctuary. I prefer to go alone. It will arouse less suspicion on the part of the isolationists.
Well there should be no problem about our entering orbit. I asked Commander Riker to contact the Vulcan authorities from the Enterprise and let them know that we were approaching.
Why did you do that?
Well, I didn't want to risk a misunderstanding. Someone might have mistaken this for an actual raid.
It was a wise precaution.
Perhaps I should contact the Enterprise, have them meet us at Vulcan just in case these isolationists try to escape.
Your offer is appreciated but our security forces are more than adequate.
I see. Do you think it's wise for you to go there alone? After all, they were expecting Baran to show up. Don't you think if I were to accompany you, it might seem more plausible.
Captain, I do understand your human emotional need to be there at the final moment, but this is a Vulcan matter.
Of course.
Thank you.
We have entered orbit of Vulcan.
Tallera, I've decided on a change of plan. Take one of the artefacts with you. Leave the other here. As soon as we have our payment in full, we'll complete the delivery.
That was not the agreement.
I realise that. But it's safer for all concerned to leave one behind.
They will not pay us until they get both pieces.
They've been waiting a long time for this. They're not going to take any risks. Now, take one of the artefacts and beam down.
That is all I was waiting for. Go to the navigational computer and check file one three seven slash omega. You'll find a message secretly transmitted to the Enterprise, containing our entire flight plan.
She's right.
The message was sent by Galen. He's a Starfleet officer.
Tallera is right. But what she's not telling you is that those artefacts she's holding are part of an incredibly powerful weapon. There's no reward waiting for you down on the surface. As soon as she's got those artefacts, she'll leave you behind to be captured by Starfleet.
I don't care what it is you want, Tallera. I don't care if that's a weapon for your personal use or if you're really just making a delivery as planned. All I care about is my money. So I propose a compromise. Narik and I will go with you to the surface to guarantee that we receive our payment.
After that, you can go anywhere you want.
Agreed. Bring him as well. We'll use him as a hostage if Starfleet arrives. If not, we'll kill him on the surface.
There. Your reward, as promised.
Is it all there?
No, this is less than half of what we were promised. Where's the rest of it?
That is all I could manage. I suggest you take it and leave.
I did not come this far to be cheated. I want it all, now.
Very well. You will get what you deserve.
Go ahead, Captain. Pick up the phaser. See what good it will do.
You'll never get away with this. Starfleet will never stand and watch you tear apart one of the founding worlds of the Federation.
How little you understand what you're facing, Captain. You're used to fighting enemies like yourself. People on ships with defence shields, energy weapons, warp drives. But this is unlike anything you've ever faced. This is the power of the mind. Pick up the phaser, Captain.
Listen to me, all of you! Drop your weapons! Do it! Don't make any aggressive movements. The resonator amplifies violent feelings and emotions. And that's why you wanted me to pick up the phaser. That's how you were able to kill Narik and Vekor. But I can see the symbol on that third artefact, and it is the Vulcan symbol for peace standing between the symbols for war and death. It's a warning that the power of the resonator can be overcome by peace.
You are about to see how wrong you are.
Empty your minds of violent thoughts.
No!
Think, Tallera. Two thousand years ago your people were being consumed by war. But when peace came to Vulcan, the resonator became useless. That's why it was dismantled.
You were right, Tallera. The resonator cannot be stopped by phasers and shields, but it can be defeated by peace.
Captain's log, stardate 47169.2. Security Minister Satok has taken Tallera into custody and begun a search for the rest of the isolationists.
Once we realised that you were no longer on the mercenary ship, we scanned the surface for your neural implant. We tracked the signal into the caverns.
What will become of the resonator, sir?
Satok has assured me that all three pieces will be destroyed.
It is unfortunate it cannot be studied. The resonator is a key artefact from a remarkable period of history.
Normally, I would be the first one to agree, but perhaps some things best left in the past.
What's going to happen to the mercenaries?
Oh, they will be detained by the Vulcan authorities for the moment. But they're also facing charges from the Klingons, the Cardassians,  the Ferengi, and at least seven other worlds. I don't think we'll be hearing from them for a while. Number One, will you set course for Starbase two twenty seven. I'll join you on the Bridge shortly.
Wait a minute. You've been declared dead. You can't give orders around here.
If we are to adhere to the exact letter of Starfleet regulations, then technically, sir, you have been declared a renegade. In fact, I believe you are facing twelve counts of court martial offences. You cannot give orders either, sir.
That's quite right. And as I'm supposed to be dead, I'll go and get some sleep. And, Mister Data, I suggest that you escort Commander Riker to the brig.
Aye, sir.
This way, sir.
Data, he was joking. You know that, right? Data?
Graves at my command have wak'd their sleepers, op'd, and let 'em forth by my so potent art. But this rough magic I here abjure, and when I have required some heavenly music, which even now I do, to work mine end upon their senses, that this airy charm is for, I'll break my staff, bury it certain fathoms in the earth, and deeper than did ever plummet sound, I'll  Captain? Sir, your attention is wandering.
Data, I can barely see.
But sir, I am supposed to be attempting a Neo-Platonic magical rite. The darkness is appropriate for such a ritual.
Yes, but Data, this is a play. The audience has to see you.
Perhaps I have been too literal with respect to my set design. Computer, modify holodeck programme Data seven three. Shakespeare's The Tempest, Act Five, scene one. Increase torchlight by twenty percent.
There, that's much better. Now, do you want to try it again?
Yes, sir. Captain, I am not certain I fully understand this Prospero character. I would appreciate any insight you might have that would improve my performance.
Well, Data, Shakespeare was witnessing the end of the Renaissance and the birth of the modern era, and Prospero finds himself in a world where his powers are no longer needed. So, we see him here about to perform one final creative act before giving up his art forever.
There is certainly a tragic aspect to the character.
Yes, but there's a certain expectancy too. A hopefulness about the future. You see, Shakespeare enjoyed mixing opposites. The past and the future. Hope and despair. Data, what is this? Is this part of your programme?
No, sir.
What is going on?
It appears to be a steam locomotive.
A train?
If I am not mistaken.
Computer, end programme.
Computer, end programme.
Captain, you are injured.
Oh yes, I know. I'll get it seen to, Data.
The train we encountered was from one of Doctor Crusher's holodeck programs. It was a re-creation of the Orient Express, a train which travelled from Paris to Istanbul from the late nineteenth century until.
Yes, yes, Data, I know about the Orient Express. But what is it doing on Prospero's Island?
There appears to have been a malfunction in the holodeck's database retrieval programme. The two programs somehow temporarily linked together.
Is it possible that this malfunction will affect the other holodecks as well?
It is a possibility. I will need to run a diagnostic to be certain.
Very good, Data. But shut down the other holodecks until you're finished, just to be on the safe side.
Aye, sir.
I never realised that you were interested in trains. Are you aware that at its peak, the Orient Express carried more than ten thousand people a year?
It isn't really the train itself that I'm interested in.
What then?
It's the experience. The Orient Express is romantic, mysterious, an elegant way to see exotic places and meet fascinating people. Do you know that one time, on one trip, both Sigmund Freud and Gertrude Stein just happened to be in the same car? They ended up having dinner together every night.
I wonder what they talked about?
Why don't you take a trip yourself and find out?
Riker to Picard.
Picard here.
All sections ready to begin the survey, sir.
Very good. I'm on my way. Thank you.
Don't forget the trip, Jean-Luc. Think about it. You never know who you'll meet on the Orient Express.
Captain's log, stardate 47869.2. After weathering an unexpected magnascopic storm in the Mekorda Sector, we are continuing our search for new Federation colony sites.
I don't think there's any possibility of developing sites in this region. Most of the stars are main sequence binaries. There are no M-class planets.
Well, let's move on to another survey region. Have stellar cartography begin a
Mister Data, report.
The ship has moved into warp, sir.
Who gave that command?
Apparently no one. Helm and navigation controls are not functioning. Our speed is now warp seven point three and holding.
Picard to Engineering.
Mister La Forge, what's going on? We've lost primary helm control on the Bridge.
I don't understand it. The impulse systems suddenly cut out and the warp drive just kicked in.
Geordi, can you take the engines offline?
I'm working on it.
Mister Data, what's our heading?
Bearing one eight seven mark four. I am unable to determine our destination, however we are heading away from the Mekorda sector.
Captain, the computer's locked out all the propulsion
Controls. I can't access any of the overrides.
If you want us to stop, I'll have to do an emergency core shutdown.
That would leave us without warp power for more than a week.
Begin the procedure, Mister La Forge.
We are no longer at warp, sir. Impulse power has resumed. All systems show normal.
Where are we?
We are approximately thirty billion kilometres from our original position.
Well done, Mister La Forge.
It wasn't me. I didn't have time to complete the shut-down procedure.
Well, I want an explanation
Mister La Forge. Picard out.
Have you found anything yet?
Only that we seem to have more than one mystery here. We still don't know why the ship jumped into warp, but it looks like we're lucky it did. There was a theta flux distortion building up around the ship.
Why didn't our sensors alert us?
Our sensors were never designed to detect theta flux distortions. And yet there is a record of the distortion in the sensor log. That's the other mystery.
One fact is clear, however. The distortion was growing in strength. If we had remained at our original position one point seven seconds longer, the distortion would have ruptured our warp core.
If the Enterprise hadn't jumped into warp when it did, we would've been blown to pieces.
I just don't get it, Data. What would cause the engines to suddenly jump into warp?
Perhaps the engines were activated by a random power fluctuation.
Which occurred just in time to save the ship?
It is improbable, but it is possible.
I don't know. I don't think I'm ready to start believing in luck.
There is another possibility.
Yeah, what's that.
The sensors apparently detected a dangerous anomaly that threatened the Enterprise. It is possible that they triggered a safety device which caused the ship to avoid destruction.
Yeah, but there's no direct link between the warp engines and the sensors.
Whoa. What is that? It's some kind of new circuit node and it's connected to at least half a dozen points in the sensor array.
It appears to be connected to several other systems as well, including the warp control circuits.
I guess there's a connection between the warp engines and the sensors after all.
A force field. Where did that come from?
I am not certain. Perhaps it came from the node itself.
Well, wherever it came from, it sure doesn't want us messing with this node.
It appears to be protecting itself.
We found these nodes in several systems around the ship. At some level or another, they're all connected.
These nodes were linking the sensors to our warp control and defensive systems. We believe this is why the ship jumped to warp.
When the sensors detected danger, the defensive systems reacted to the threat and activated the warp engines to protect us.
Where did these nodes come from?
It is possible that the magnascopic storm we recently experienced had an unexpected effect on the ship's systems.
Wherever they come from, they seem to be multiplying.
As they increase, it will become progressively more difficult to control the ship.
What do you propose we do?
Well, getting rid of them isn't going to be so easy. When we attempted to examine the circuitry of one of the nodes, it generated a force field to keep us out.
Whatever's going on. our first priority is getting back control of the ship.
Agreed. All of the nodal connections intersect in holodeck three. It appears to be a focal point of some kind.
We might be able to find a way to use the holodeck circuitry to disable the nodes permanently.
All right. Let's do it.
Commander, the holodeck appears to be in operation.
I thought you shut down the entire system.
I did, but it has reactivated itself and it will not disengage.
Which programme is running?
Several different programs are running simultaneously.
This should be interesting.
You weren't kidding, Mister Data.
No, sir. I estimate that this scene consists of portions of seven distinct holodeck programs.
See if you can access the circuits that have been affected by the nodes.
Tickets! Tickets please. Please have your tickets ready. Thank you, sir. Thank you, madam. Thank you. Thank you, sir. Tickets please.
You know, I've never even been away from home. Now I'm going all the way to Vertiform City!
Very nice, sir. Enjoy your trip. Tickets please. Tickets. Thank you sir.
Tickets please. Tickets please.
Commander. I have located a large concentration of nodes behind this wall. They appear to be connected directly to the holodeck's main power coupling.
All right, go ahead and depolarise the entire power grid.
The power grid is located beneath this deck, sir.
Get away from there. Would you gentlemen care to show me your tickets?
I believe we left our tickets in our compartments. Mister Worf, I told you to bring the tickets.
I forgot.
I don't think you folks belong on this train.
Hold it! You leave these people alone. They're only trying to help.
You go back to the engine. This doesn't concern you.
They're all trying to hijack the train.
Hey, if you're the Engineer, who's doing the drivin'?
I am.
Easy, sir, easy. I've got you.
I'm all right, thanks. It looks like the navigational relay's overloaded.
Geordi, what's going on? We just went into warp.
We've lost engine and helm control again, Captain, but this time, they're completely burned out. I don't know if we can stop the ship.
I believe we have changed direction.
Now we're on the right track. Ladies and gentlemen, we are on our way!
I was right. He was trying to make off with my brick.
You take good care of that. We can't afford to lose it. Now, are you people going to leave or are we going to have to throw you off the train?
Commander. According to my tricorder, the holodeck safeties have been disengaged. His weapon could be lethal.
All right, let's get out of here.
The number of systems now being affected by the nodes has increased considerably. Sensors, engines, replicators, propulsion, they are all working together now, almost independently of the main computer. And the nodes link them all through the holodeck.
But why the holodeck? It doesn't make any sense.
Commander, I believe what happens on the holodeck has a direct effect on the ship. When we attempted to destroy the nodes, the characters on the train responded almost immediately to stop us.
And when the engineer tried to protect us, one of the characters shot him.
Then the conductor then signalled for the train to change directions, and at approximately the same time
The Enterprise also took off in a new direction.
Are you saying the ship is under the control of the holodeck?
Not precisely. Geordi, does the configuration of connection nodes look familiar to you?
Yeah. Yeah, it looks a little like the structure of your positronic brain.
That is correct. It would appear that the nodes are in the process of creating a rudimentary neural net.
Data, what are you suggesting?
Unlikely as it may sound, I believe that the Enterprise may be forming an intelligence.
This is a synaptic map of the human neo-cortex. This is a cross section of my positronic net. And this is a schematic of the connection nodes linking the ship's systems. I believe some sort of neural matrix is forming on the ship. It is still relatively primitive, but it is an intelligence nonetheless.
How could that happen?
I believe it is an emergent property.
Explain.
Complex systems can sometimes behave in ways that are entirely unpredictable. The human brain, for example, might be described in terms of cellular functions and neurochemical interactions. But that description does not explain human consciousness, a capacity that far exceeds simple neural functions. Consciousness is an emergent property.
In other words, something that's more than just the sum of its parts.
Exactly.
How does that explain what's happening to the Enterprise?
The Enterprise contains a vast database of information which is managed by a sophisticated computer. This complex system gives the ship many of the characteristics of a biological organism.
That's true. It sees with its sensors, it talks with its communications systems.
In a sense, it almost reproduces with the replicators.
And you think that the ship has somehow gone beyond those functions and is developing a new capacity?
Yes, sir. I believe a self-determining intelligence is emerging.
If that is so, what does the ship want? Where is it taking us?
I believe the key to understanding the ship's behaviour lies in the holodeck. All of the connection nodes intersect at that location. It is clearly some kind of processing centre.
Processing centre?
Yes, sir. A focal point where all the ideas and instincts of this emerging intelligence are first expressed in some form.
Almost like an imagination. Captain, I'd like to go to the holodeck. I could interact with the characters and maybe find some clues to help us understand what's happening.
Very well. Mister Data, Mister Worf, I want you to go along. See if you can to re-establish control of the ship without damaging the nodes. If the ship is truly an emerging intelligence, then we have a responsibility to treat it with the same respect as any other being.
Welcome aboard, Counsellor.
If you will distract these people, I will attempt to depolarise the power grid.
Excuse me. Have you finished the puzzle yet?
Not yet, but we're gettin' close.
Do you recognise it?
No.
I would like to help. Tell me. What exactly are you making?
What do you think we're making? A puzzle!
No, I meant the picture. What is it?
Well, I don't know.
Can you deal me in?
Sorry. It's a two man game.
Hey! Get your hand off of that.
Is that why you killed the Engineer? To get this brick?
I had to get it back. You know how much it's worth, lady? Plenty. And I got to get it to Keystone City.
Why? What's at Keystone City?
That's where everything begins. Gin.
Are you succeeding, Commander?
I am ready to access the main power grid.
Keystone City, next stop. Keystone City. Well, look who's back.
We do not want any trouble. We are simply passengers.
Well then I'm sure you wouldn't mind showing me your tickets? Right. Sorry, boys. You're getting off right here.
This is my stop.
Wait. What happens at Keystone City? Why are you taking the brick there?
Excuse me.
I think we should follow that man. That brick may be an important clue.
Where did he go?
I can access the power grid here. I will attempt to depolarise the grid by using a low frequency inversion field. It may disengage the nodes without destroying them.
There he is. I'm going after him.
What are you doing here?
Laying the foundation.
Now, if you'll excuse me, I've got a train to catch.
I don't understand it, Captain. All of a sudden, cargo bay five started to depressurise.
Did everyone get out in time?
Yes, sir, and I've re-established the containment field, but I'm reading massive power surges in the cargo bay and all sorts of transporter activity. Something weird is happening there, Captain.
I want you to send a team down there immediately. Find out what's going on.
Aye, sir.
La Forge to Bridge.
Picard here. What's going on?
I wish I could tell you.
That man said he was laying a foundation.
Foundation for what?
Troi to Data
Data here.
How are you doing?
I encountered a minor difficulty, Counsellor, but it has been dealt with.
I am ready to depolarise the power grid.
It looks like the ship's replicator and transporter systems have been merged somehow. to create this. The question is, what is it? Ensign, I want to run a full spectral analysis on this.
I'm picking up a massive power fluctuations. The ship is losing its structural integrity.
What's happening?
It's an earthquake.
La Forge to Data
Stop what you're doing.
Acknowledged.
Are you all right?
I'm fine.
Data, I think we ought to get together and compare notes.
Agreed.
The ship was protecting itself again. Stopping us from interfering. Whatever it's doing it intends to continue.
I'm betting it all has something to do with that object that's forming in the cargo bay.
I think he's right, Captain. Look at the common themes playing out on the holodeck. A puzzle being put together, a foundation being laid, a paper doll being fashioned. They're all images of something being constructed.
And some kind of object in the cargo bay that's being constructed atom by atom.
What is that object?
I have no idea. It's composed of silica polymers, duranium, and a couple of other compounds we haven't been able to identify yet. But creating it has had quite an effect on our systems. Warp power has dropped forty seven percent.
Counsellor, did you draw any other conclusions from your experiences on the holodeck? Anything that would help us to understand this situation?
The holodeck was full of metaphoric imagery like it was having some kind of daydream. It may not make literal sense, but symbolically it probably does have some kind of logic to it.
The characters you spoke to, do they have any significance?
I think they represent different aspects of the ship. The Engineer, for instance, may represent the navigational system, the gunslinger could be the weapon system.
Is there any way that we can persuade them to give back control of the ship?
I don't think it's possible to reason with them. Many of them are genuinely unaware of what's going on. It's as though this emergent intelligence is like an infant acting on impulse, trying to figure itself out as it goes. The only source of experience it can draw on is ours through our holodeck programs.
Is there a way that we can relate to them on their own level, find some way to influence their behaviour?
Maybe there is. I'd like to go back and try.
Counsellor, we haven't been able to re-establish the safeties.
The injuries you suffered on the holodeck weren't severe, but next time they might kill you.
I'm aware of that.
Very well, Counsellor, go ahead. But bear in mind that whenever we have tried to hinder their efforts, we've failed. Perhaps it's time to cooperate with them.
You don't belong on this train.
Three tickets for Vertiform City.
Guess I was wrong about you folks. Welcome aboard.
What was that?
We've been having some problems. The engine is running out of steam. I hope we make it to Vertiform City on time.
Is there anything we can do to help?
Well, I could use a pair of strong arms in the engine room. Might help us get back on schedule.
Why don't you go with him, Worf? We'll see what we can do here.
Excuse me. Are we going to get there okay?
Of course. You needn't worry about a thing. So, tell me everything you know about Vertiform City.
Well, they got this restaurant there where you can eat all you want, any time. It's the best food around.
There's the coal and there's the boiler. I'm much obliged for your help.
Well done, sir. I think this'll make a difference, all right.
I don't know how or why, sir, but warp power appears to be back to normal levels.
What's our heading?
We appear to be on a course for Tambor Beta six. It's a white dwarf star.
Keep it steady. Put your back into it. That's the ticket.
The ship is using a modified tractor beam to collect vertion particles from the star.
Vertion particles. Vertiform City. That's what the ship was looking for.
The particles are being routed through the transporter system into cargo bay five.
Geordi, what's going on?
The object is absorbing
Vertion particles. It's growing even faster than before. Commander, I'm picking up internal energy this thing.
What do you mean?
I mean it's generating its own energy. I'm picking up coherent emissions
Matter conversion. It's incredible. Wait a minute. Wait a minute, something's wrong. We've got power fluctuations. Vertion absorption rate is dropping. What's happening to the particle beam?
The beam's exhausted the supply of particles in the star. There's nothing left to take out.
Captain
The energy output of the object is decreasing.
Something's wrong.
What is it?
This was supposed to be Vertiform City.
We've been on the wrong track all along.
Are you all right?
Yes. What happened?
The Conductor accidently derailed the train.
Data to Captain Picard.
Picard here.
There has been an accident on the holodeck, sir. Has anything happened to the Enterprise?
Yes, we've had a ship-wide shutdown. We've lost attitude control and most systems are offline.
Captain, you'd better take a look at this. When the particle beam cut off, the object was beginning to form a coherent energy matrix. Now, if these readings are accurate, I'd say that the emission patterns were almost organic.
Are you suggesting that the Enterprise is trying to create a lifeform?
I think so.
Will it survive?
Well, its energy levels are dropping rapidly. Unless it gets an infusion of vertion particles, and I mean soon, I don't think so.
Captain, all of our systems are back online and we're moving again, at warp nine.
Let's get back to the Bridge.
Whoo wee, that was a close one, wasn't it?
Where are we going now?
Well, New Vertiform City, of course.
Data to Captain.
Picard here.
The train has returned to normal, sir. Our destination is New Vertiform City.
What's our course?
We're heading for the Cordannas system.
Another white dwarf star.
It's the nearest one to our last position.
Captain, we have a problem. Even at warp nine, the Cordannas system is over twelve hours from here.
Will the object in the cargo bay survive that long?
Yes, sir, but that's not the problem. The ship has diverted all of our systems to maximum propulsion, including life support. We have less than two hours of reserve oxygen.
Mister Data, we have to stop the Enterprise. That means you have to get control of the train.
Understood, sir.
The ship is looking for vertion particles and it believes that the Cordannas system is the closest source. Is there any possibility of anything closer?
White dwarf stars are the only natural sources of vertions, sir.
Then what about artificial ones? Can you create the particles?
How did the Conductor stop the train?
There is a braking lever in the engine room.
Let's go.
Sorry, folks, but you ain't going nowhere.
I've narrowed the search to the MacPherson Nebula, which is a supernova remnant, and Dikon Alpha, which is a class nine pulsar. They're both fairly close to our current flight path and either one could produce vertion particles if we detonated a modified photon torpedo inside it.
Vertions usually occur in miniscule amounts. Do you think either of these phenomena could produce enough of them?
It's really hard to say. I can't even guarantee that we can create them at all.
Well, we've got to give it a try. The nebula or the pulsar? It's your choice, Mister La Forge.
I say go with the nebula.
Very well. Begin the torpedo modifications.
Now let's see if we can get this ship to go where we want.
Please listen to me. We understand what's happening. We know you have get to New Vertiform City, and we want to help you get there.
Well, I don't know.
Please, we're your friends.
You're really going to help get us to New Vertiform City?
I promise.
Okay. But just one of you. The rest stay here.
That's far enough.
Sorry to spoil your party, pal. It's nothing personal.
I can get us there more quickly. I know a shorter route.
Don't listen to him. He's up to somethin'.
A shorter route?
Yes, if you will let me handle the controls.
Don't do it.
Well we're already behind schedule. If you can get us there on time. All right, go on, but no funny stuff.
Data to Captain Picard. I have taken control of the engine room.
Stand by. Are we within sensor range of the nebula?
Yes, Captain, we are.
Mister Data, I need you to slow us to impulse speed.
I will attempt to do so.
I hope you know what you're doing.
Are the modifications to the torpedoes complete?
Aye, sir.
Launch torpedo.
It's working, Captain. The reaction is producing vertion particles.
Well, what do you know? We're here.
New Vertiform City.
The nodes are deactivating all over the ship. Our systems are beginning to function normally again.
Then the purpose of the ship's intelligence was simply to bring this life form into being.
There are some species whose sole purpose is to reproduce. Once they finally procreate, they die.
Captain.
Captain's log, supplemental. The Enterprise is back under our control. All traces of the emergent intelligence are gone and the object it created has disappeared into space.
Come.
Captain, I am staging a scene from The Tempest this evening for a small audience. I would like for you to attend.
I would be honoured. What scene?
Miranda's first encounter with other human beings.
O brave new world, that has such people in it.
It seemed appropriate. Captain, you took a substantial risk in allowing the Enterprise to complete its task.
Why do you say that?
Because the end result was unknown. The object could have been dangerous. It may in fact, be dangerous.
And I have allowed it to go off on its merry way.
Yes, sir.
The intelligence that was formed on the Enterprise didn't just come out of the ship's systems. It came from us. From our mission records, personal logs, holodeck programs, our fantasies. Now, if our experiences with the Enterprise have been honourable, can't we trust that the sum of those experiences will be the same?
Number One?
No help from their communications log. The Drake reported arriving at Minos and then wasn't heard from again.
Mister Data?
The citizens of Minos gained fame during the Ersalrope wars as arms merchants. They manufactured sophisticated and highly advanced weaponry.
Yeah? For which side?
Both.
We are approaching the planet Minos, sir.
Standard orbit, Mister La Forge.
Aye, sir. Standard orbit.
Whatever happened to the Drake, happened quickly, otherwise a man like Rice would have reported again.
You know Captain Rice?
We were at the Academy together.
Tell me about him.
Able. A good officer.
How would he react under stress?
Paul Rice is confident to the point of arrogance, he but carries it well because he's usually right. He's a risk taker.
Really?
I'll give you an example. One of the final tests in advance navigation at the Academy provides the student with three options. Rice was given this test, rejected their options and offered one of his own.
That's taking a risk.
And it paid off. He received the top grade and now that same test has four options.
In a difficult situation a man like that would act aggressively.
Agreed.
Commander, weren't you offered the Drake?
Yes.
You gave up your own command to take this assignment?
At the time I thought it would be more advantageous for me to do a tour on the Enterprise.
Captain, readings correspond with the findings of the probe. No signs of intelligent life forms. Vegetation and animal life only.
What happened to all the people?
War?
Disease?
A dissatisfied customer?
In any war, natural disaster, even the most virulent plague, there are always survivors.
Captain, we are being hailed.
How can that be from a planet with no people?
Your sensors indicated no intelligent life forms?
Correct, sir. Something has scanned our language banks and is hailing us.
On main viewer.
Whoever you are, wherever you're from, greetings. Welcome to Minos, the arsenal of freedom.
I am Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the USS
If you need a little something special, be it for one target or multiple targets, we got it. You'll see it here on Minos, where we live by the motto 'peace through superior firepower'.
To whom am I speaking?
To be totally armed is to be totally secure. Remember, the early bird that hesitates gets wormed.
It is a recorded message, sir.
Minos, the arsenal of freedom. Perfection in highly advanced weaponry. Versatility.
We must have triggered something left over from the Erselrope wars when the arms business was booming.
So lock on to my signal and beam on down, because we don't just provide weapons
Shut that off.
We provide complete weapons systems.
It's a heck of a sales pitch.
If an automated message system is still functioning, there could be other systems on that planet that are still operational.
Weapons systems?
Possibly.
We're going to have to go down there to find it.
Number One, prepare am away team.
Lieutenant Yar. Data.
Commander, I recommend a minimum complement.
Oh? I would have thought otherwise.
We'll keep the first landing party small and mobile, until I'm confident that whatever killed the inhabitants of this planet isn't still down there.
Okay.
Spooky. Riker.
This is the Bridge.
We'll start a pattern search from this point.
Keep this channel open.
Aye, sir.
Commander, our communications are being monitored.
By whom?
Since there is no intelligent life, the question is by what?
Captain?
Yes, we heard that, Number One. We'll try and track it down from here.
Tritanium. It's been melted.
What could do that?
I don't know. Whatever it was, it's beyond our technology.
Over here.
Wow.
We've never even seen anything like this.
It's undamaged.
Maybe a demonstration model for some potential buyer.
Maybe. Let's spread out a little.
T'SU:Commander Riker, this is Ensign T'Su.
T'SU:I'm monitoring a slight energy buildup near your position. I am not able to pinpoint the source.
Give me a direction.
T'SU:East of your position, ten metres. I will continue monitoring.
I can't see anything through here. The underbrush is too thick.
Hello. Commander Riker.
Rice! Where did you come from?
I was over there.
We were worried about you. I should have known you'd pop up.
How are you, Commander Riker?
Me? Forget about me. How are you? No word, no message, nothing.
How many are with you?
There are two others. Where's the Drake? Where's your crew?
Number One, a word. We have some information you should be aware of.
Ensign T'Su? T'SU Sensors indicate low level energy readings, but the only life signs are the away team.
You copy, Number One?
Understood. You look strange, Paul.
I was injured getting here.
Do you need medical help?
No. What's your purpose here?
Commander Data, Lieutenant Yar.
Sir, other than ourselves, I am picking up no life signs here.
I know.
Riker, you didn't answer me. Who sent you here to look for me?
Your mother. She's worried about you.
Tell me about your ship, Riker. It's the Enterprise, isn't it?
No. The name of my ship is the Lollipop.
I have no knowledge of that ship.
It's just been commissioned. It's a good ship.
Refresh me, would you, Riker? What's its size, it's complement?
Who is here with you?
What's the armament on the Lollipop?
Paul, I will only answer your questions if you answer mine. Why do you want to know so much about my ship?
We're friends, aren't we?
Old friends.
Our top speed is warp three. What's yours?
Is? Then the Drake has not been destroyed.
The Drake?
Yes, your ship.
Of course, my ship is the Drake.
Where is it?
Classified.
Classified?
Please, it's important. Our survival depends on knowing. What's the armament on your ship?
Ten.
Ten? I don't understand. Ten what?
Six.
Commander Riker, your answers make no sense.
You haven't used my first name once, Paul. You remember it, don't you? You don't, do you? Because you don't exist. You're a fake. You're an image of the original, aren't you? Answer me!
Report, Number One.
The image of Rice has been replaced by something which is hovering several metres away.
Number One, get your team back up here.
Prepare to beam up.
Commander!
What's happened, Number One? Report. Report! Report!
He can't answer you, Captain.
Commander Riker just has been encased in some kind of energy field.
Is he alive?
Unknown.
Captain's log, supplemental. Some kind of weapon, which for a time took the form of Captain Paul Rice, has enveloped Commander Riker.
Transporter room three, have you been able to lock on to the away team?
I am unable to lock on to Commander Riker, sir.
Ensign T'Su, situation report.
T'SU:Previous energy readings are gone.
Data, have you been able to assess Commander Riker's condition?
He appears to be in some kind of stasis.
Theorise, Mister Data. What would be the purpose of such an encasement?
Typically, the purpose of such an enclosure is for storage.
Which would suggest what?
That sooner or later someone or something will be along to collect him.
Stand by. I'm coming down.
You, sir?
Yes. Doctor Crusher, this is the Captain. Meet me in Transporter room three. Mister La Forge, you have command of the Bridge.
Aye, sir.
And whatever happens down there, your prime responsibility is to the ship.
Understood, sir.
Captain, I take great exception to your decision to beam down.
Noted.
Is it just Riker?
Yes. Apparently he's confined in some sort of force field. Energise.
Any changes?
Data's figured out what it is.
Are you getting any life signs?
He is alive. What appeared in the form of Captain Rice is an intelligence gathering device used during the Ersalrope Wars.
Probably developed here.
It projects an image of someone the subject will trust, gets as much information as possible.
If it's found out, it encases the subject to await a more detailed interrogation later.
Clever.
Can you remove it?
Possibly, but I will need to know the exact frequency and I cannot determine the risk to Commander Riker.
We have little choice. Whatever has him is interrupting the transporter beam. Remove it.
This will take some time, sir.
I am picking up energy readings.
Captain, Lieutenant La Forge here. Sensors indicate energy readings in your area.
Doctor, over here!
Doctor.
This one is different. It's anticipating. Data, I need you. Set your phaser on kill. I'll lead left, you get it.
Captain? Doctor Crusher?
Captain Picard?  I have a malfunction.
Enterprise, this is Lieutenant Yar. Mine's out too.
The close pass by the weapons must have disrupted our communicators.
Keep on working. I'll look for the Captain and Doctor Crusher.
Ow! My arm.
How bad is it?
Oh, it's bad.
Come on. Alright, don't worry, we'll get you out of here. Enterprise, this is the Captain. Two to beam up. Enterprise? Enterprise, come in. Data? Lieutenant Yar?
What's wrong? Why aren't they working?
I don't know. But don't worry. As soon as they realise our communicators are not working, the sensors will find us and Geordi will beam us up. Now, just you hold on. I'm sorry about this.
Hold on, it won't be long.
I must keep conscious.
Data, I can't find them.
Step back, please. I believe I have found it.
Data.
All vital signs returning to normal.
Good. Now Geordi can get us out of here. Come on. The Captain and Doctor Crusher can't be far away.
T'SU:Sir, I'm reading life forms on the planet. All five members of the away team.
Good. They must have freed Commander Riker. Transporter Room, get a lock on the away team and beam them up.
Shields just came on. Deflectors also up. I'm picking up an object off the port bow. It's firing!
Red Alert! Battle stations! We can't the away team beam up with our shields in place.
Phasers ready. Photon torpedoes standing by. Locking on target. Correction. Target has disappeared.
Give me a full scan.
Scanning. No readings yet. Wait. Something dead astern.
Emergency power to shields!
Object is firing.
Return fire!
No use. It's gone again. SOLIS Aft shields weakened. Whatever they're using, our shields can't stand up to it much longer.
This is Chief Engineer Logan. Are we breaking orbit? I need to know now.
Ship's log, supplemental. Lieutenant La Forge in command. I am unable to beam up the away team due to an unseen assailant attacking the ship. To make matters worse, Chief Engineer Logan is on his way to the Bridge, and he's not paying a courtesy call.
Why are we still in orbit? We're taking a beating.
We've got to hold out as long as we can. Now, if we can disable our attacker, if only for a few seconds, we can drop our shields and beam the away team back aboard.
If we follow that plan, we'll lose the Enterprise. In view of the present crisis, I believe you should relinquish command to me.
No.
I outrank you.
Mister Logan, I'm in command.
The Captain did not anticipate the Enterprise would come under attack. If he had, would he have left the Bridge to you?
If he had, he wouldn't have left the ship.
T'SU:Picking up an object to starboard, sir, heading toward us.
Lock phasers on that thing and fire the moment it's in range.
Locking in. The object has vanished.
Phaser lock lost.
T'SU:Starboard shields weakened.
It's cloaked itself.
You can't fight this thing and win. We've got to break orbit now.
Worf, analyse its firing pattern. Maybe we can anticipate its location.
Aye. Solis, correlate the trajectory of the energy bolts with the attack path. I'll compute the optimum spread of phasers and photon torpedoes to hit it.
Right.
Lieutenant La Forge. Geordi. I know you want to do what's best for the Enterprise. So do I. Now the best thing
The best thing, Mister Logan, is for this discussion to end and for you to return to your duties. Now, I'm in charge until relieved by Commander Riker or Captain Picard.
You're ignoring my greater rank and experience.
Not at all. In fact, just to opposite. I'm counting on it. Now I need you to get back down to Engineering and get me every available scrap of emergency power you can. The more power we can channel to the shields, the longer we'll be able to hold out. Now, Mister Logan.
Worf, have you got a lock on it yet?
It's impossible to be sure.
Maybe you should wait here while Data and I search for the Captain and Doctor Crusher.
No, I'm a little groggy, but I'll be all right.
I am getting energy readings. Look out!
We'll do it just like before.
It's got a deflector shield.
The product continues to upgrade and improve.
We'll concentrate our fire and try to collapse its shield. Commander, we'll need you too.
Now!  You're right, they keep getting better.
The weapons are appearing at intervals of precisely twelve minutes.
Well this one took everything we had. I don't know how we'll handle the next one.
We're not going to wait around. Let's find the rest of our team.
We seem to be in some kind of underground structure, but I don't see any. Hey, no, you don't. No time to sleep.
I'm tired.
Come on, stay with me. Come on now, stay awake. That's an order.
I must have lost a lot of blood.
I've stopped the bleeding.
No, there's another wound. My leg.
Not to worry, Everything is going to be fine. Now, this is going to hurt a bit.
I've heard that before.
Hey, hey, Doctor. Stay awake. Come on. There's a lot of blood. What do I do next? Doctor.
The wound needs a clotting agent.
I couldn't find your medical kit.
Those roots. What are they?
Roots? What, these?
Break off a piece and taste it. Don't swallow it.
Very bitter.
Apply some to your hand. Is there a colour change?
It's turning yellowish.
Good. Now, spread as much of it as you can onto the wound.
Hey, hey, Doctor. Now, stay awake. You've got to help me. I need your help. All right, now listen. Your patient has lost a great deal of blood from multiple lacerations.
The patient's going into shock.
So what do I do?
Elevate the legs and try to keep her warm.
Good. All right. Stay with me, Doctor. Keep talking.
You didn't happen to bring a blanket with you, did you?
No. I'm going to look for a way out. Now, you keep up your end. Stay awake.
All right, I know it's risky, but a shot in the dark is better than nothing. Let's see if we can get lucky.
T'SU:I can't seem to pin down the pattern.
There.
T'SU:Sorry, sir, I should have seen that.
That's all right, you're doing fine.
Programme laid in. Phasers and photon torpedoes ready.
Okay. Mister Solis, bring her about to two three mark one eight five.
Aye, sir.
Fire! Now!
Phasers and photons firing. We missed.
T'SU:Number four shield buckling. Number three shield nearing failure.
Bridge, this is Engineering. I can't hold this power level much longer. You've got to do something.
T'SU:Backup systems are overloaded. Backup systems failing.
La Forge, this is Logan. Tell me something.
Mister Logan, report to the Bridge.
On my way.
Deflectors are breaking down. We have less than one minute of reserve.
We are getting out of here. Lieutenant Solis, set course three one five mark zero, zero seven.
Course set.
You are leaving them on the planet.
Speed warp five.
Warp five. Aye.
Engage. Hold course and speed for twenty eight seconds, then come to a full stop. Mister Logan, had we stayed, we would have been destroyed. Now, there are over a thousand people on this ship. I have a responsibility to them.
What about your responsibility to Captain Picard and the members of the away team?
I have a responsibility to them as well. Mister Logan, you are going to take command of the Saucer Section. Backup crew, report to the main Bridge.
You're going to separate?
Yes, and I want you to take the saucer section and proceed immediately to Starbase one zero three.
You can't fight what you can't see, and you still won't be able to see that thing.
Maybe we won't have to.
Risky.
Yes. That's why we're going to separate. Worf, Solis, T'Su. Report to the Battle Bridge. I'll join you in a moment.
Ensign, secure connector levels.
Aye, sir.
Come in.
Lieutenant, I need to speak to you.
Counsellor, we're a few minutes away from separating the battle section. I don't have a lot of time.
I know, but as Counsellor I have a duty to evaluate the emotional fitness of the crew.
And you sense I'm nervous. Well, you're right. Counsellor, deep down I'm shaking. I'm about to take this ship into battle, and there's a good chance she'll be blasted out of the sky. I'm taking a huge risk here, and there are a lot of lives at stake. So, yeah, I'm nervous. Did you expect otherwise?
Not at all. You're under tremendous pressure, more than you've ever experienced.
You think I'm about to crack?
On the contrary. You should be proud of the way you're handling command. You've kept a cool head, taken charge, and made some very difficult decisions.
Then what did you want to see me about?
Lieutenant La Forge. Battle bridge is manned and ready. However, deflectors have not yet returned to full efficiency.
Let's get them there, Mister Solis.
Aye, sir.
I'll join you shortly. La Forge out.
Did you hear the uneasiness in his voice?
Solis is doing a fine job.
Yes, but he isn't handling the stress as well as you are. Both he and Ensign T'Su are very young.
No, wait. They're good officers.
Yes, but they lack battle experience. They're worried about making mistakes, and they need some encouragement.
What do I do?
Just remember it's you they draw strength from. They look to you for guidance and for leadership. Help them. Show confidence in them.
Like Captain Picard showed confidence in me. Right. I understand. Thanks, Counsellor.
Prepare to initiate separation sequence.
T'SU:All decks report ready.
On my mark. Now.
Main latch bags to zero. Main latch retraction one to one eight, initiate. Static charge compensate.
Separation complete.
Lieutenant Solis, lay in a reciprocal course for Minos, warp five.
Course set.
On my mark. Engage.
We seem to be pretty well sealed in, Doctor.
No exits?
None that I can see.
If you find one, go.
Tired of my company already? Beverly. Beverly!
I'm tired. I need to sleep. Woke up too early.
Talk to me, stay awake. Tell me something. Tell me about those roots. How did you know their medicinal values?
My grandmother.
Your grandmother was a doctor?
No.
Oh. She was a botanist, then?
No. She helped to colonise Arveda Three.
Arveda Three? That's such a tragedy. Did she survive?
Yes. Once the medical supplies had run out, she had to use what was at hand. So she learned all about roots and herbs, and then taught it to me.
You were part of that colony. I didn't know that. But then there must be a lot of things about you that I don't know.
Quite a few.
What? Now just a minute. Here's something odd. It's glowing.
What is it?
I don't know. It's covered up. I'm just clearing away the dirt. It's a viewscreen. It seems to still be operative.
It's a tracking device of some kind.
Tracking what?
There are three moving indicators. Possibly the away team.
Beautiful, isn't it? It's the centrepiece of the whole unit.
Who's that?
A projection. It's the automated salesman who greeted us on the Enterprise. What unit?
Why, the Echo Papa Six Oh Seven. Our proudest achievement. The ultimate in weapons system technology.
Is that what's behind the attack on my people?
Impressive demonstration, isn't it?
Demonstration? It tried to kill us.
Versatile, powerful, and easy to use. The Six Oh Seven does it all. Its various modules can gather information, neutralise ground personnel, even destroy enemy space vessels.
The Enterprise. Is one of those things after my ship? Tell me.
Of course I can tell you. I am programmed to answer any and all questions about the unit. I can talk terms, arrange for delivery, whatever you need.
It doesn't understand anything other than what it's peddling.
The Six Oh Seven represents the state of the art in dynamic, adaptive design. It learns from each encounter, and improves itself.
So what went wrong? Where are it's creators? Where are the people of Minos?
Once unleashed, the unit is invincible. The perfect killing system.
Too perfect. You poor fools, your own creation destroyed you. What was that noise?
The unit has analysed its last attack and constructed a new, stronger, deadlier weapon. In a moment, it will launch that weapon against the targets on the surface.
Abort it!
Why would I want to do that? It can't demonstrate its abilities unless we let it leave the nest.
They are down there, sir.
Let's clear some of that away.
If Data's calculations are correct, the next one should show itself in two minutes.
Captain!
Can you hear me?
Yes, we're here!
Are you all right?
Doctor Crusher is seriously hurt. We can't contact the Enterprise. The communicators are out.
Yes, our communicators are out too.
Those devices are part of a system located down here. Another one is about to be released. Watch yourselves.
We know, Captain.
It's too far down there. There's nothing to hold on to. No way to climb down.
I'm surprised either of them survived.
I can do it, Commander.
How?
Jump.
Data, it's over ten metres.
Eleven point seven five, sir.
Data, you may be sturdy, but you're not indestructible.
I believe I can safely traverse the distance.
Captain, Data's going down to join you down there. Be my guest.
Data.
At your service, Captain.
We'd better find a defensive position. If Data's right
He usually is.
We're going to have company any minute now, and this time I don't know how we're going to stop it.
Ship's log, supplemental. Lieutenant La Forge in command of the star drive section. After separating from the saucer, we have returned to Minos to rescue the away team. Unfortunately, I have only one option left, and it's a long shot.
T'SU:Shields and deflectors are up.
Ensign T'Su, when I order the shields down, you have one responsibility. Locate the away team and get them up here. You may only have a few seconds.
Approaching the planet, sir.
Ride's going to get a little bumpy. Things are going to happen fast. Just keep alert, stay calm. Let's focus on what we're doing. You know your jobs. You've been trained, you've been tested. You've earned the right to sit in those chairs.
That sound again.
Another weapon has been launched, sir.
We've got to find some way to stop this system.
I would need to see the programme schematic.
You've got it.
Is it possible to re-adjust the targeting sequence?
Absolutely. It wouldn't be much good without it.
Data, assign it a neutral target.
The target must be specific, sir.
Itself, then. Itself or it's own power source.
The force of that explosion would destroy this cavern and everyone on the surface.
Watch now. This is the fourth and final projectile. The Echo Papa series Six Oh Seven is about to complete this phase of its mission.
We could split up.
What good would that do?
Confuse it, delay it. Something.
It would still get us. It would just take a little longer.
It might give one of us long enough to get out of range.
Out of range?
Forget I said it. These devices wiped out an entire planet. I don't think it has a range.
Then what does that leave us? Right. That's what I thought.
On the other hand, we could look for deeper cover.
You got any ideas?
None.
Give me some options, Data, quickly.
Why don't you just shut it off?
Is that possible?
Why not? It's a machine, isn't it?
Shut it off.
Why? You haven't seen half of what this beauty can do.
We've seen enough.
Does that mean you're going to buy it?
Yes. Yes, we've seen enough. You've made a sale.
You won't be sorry.
Good. Now end the demonstration.
Done.
Number One!
Right here. That was close.
La Forge, everything's alright. We've neutralised it.
It's great to hear your voice, Captain. We're a little busy right now. I'll get right back to you.
Phasers at full readiness.
Keep those shields at full power. Ahead one quarter, heading two five mark three zero zero.
Sir, that heading will take us further into the planet's atmosphere.
That's correct. We're going to lose some maneuverability, so keep a firm hand on the helm.
Aye, sir.
You hope our attacker will follow us into the atmosphere.
I'm counting on it. Lian, scan for any air disruption or vortex. Cloak or no cloak, we'll spot it by its turbulence. Worf, how fast can you get a phaser lock?
Fast.
T'SU:Hull temperature one thousand degrees and rising.
Emergency power to deflectors.
Velocity increasing.
Steady as she goes.
T'SU:Hull temperature twenty five hundred degrees.
Deflectors nearing overload.
Sir, helm growing unresponsive.
Can you compensate?
Yes, sir, I can.
T'SU:Hull three thousand degrees.
Maintain heading.
We're about to lose number four deflector.
T'SU:Thirty three hundred degrees.
Deflector four is now inoperative.
T'SU:Turbulence to starboard!
There he is!
T'SU:Scanners locked.
Weapons locked.
Fire!
Got him!
Shields down.
T'SU:Locked onto away team. Beaming them home now.
Come to four zero mark six five, ahead one third, and assume a standard orbit.
Standard orbit. Aye, sir.
Relinquishing command, Captain.
As you were, Lieutenant.
Sir?
Mister La Forge, when I left this ship, it was in one piece. I would appreciate your returning it in the same condition. Do you concur, Number One?
Absolutely, sir.
Lieutenant Solis, plot a course to rendezvous with the saucer section.
T'SU:Sickbay reports Doctor Crusher's going to be fine.
Course plotted and laid in.
Engage.
I wonder how it got out here.
At its present speed and heading, it will eventually enter the Kazis binary system and will certainly be destroyed. I could attach a tractor beam and adjust its heading.
I think not, Mister Worf. It's just a piece of space debris. If we hadn't sitting here waiting for the Captain, we wouldn't have noticed it. Leave it be. Let nature take its course. How long until Captain Picard returns?
The last communication indicated it would be several hours.
Commander, request permission to investigate this vehicle.
Why, Data? It's just a derelict.
It is a piece of history. The opportunity to examine such an ancient vehicle does not come around very often, and as you pointed out, we do have the time.
Very well. Be prepared to beam back before the Captain returns.
Thank you, sir.
Lieutenant Worf, go with him.
Aye, sir.
Minimal oxygen atmosphere. An ancient solar generator, still operating.
Commander, look at this.
The on-board computers have ceased functioning. I may be able to download this old style disk drive back to the Enterprise.
It must be sealed, probably with age.
Not necessary.
The seal was broken and the environment has been corrupted.
Here's another.
This one is empty.
Commander, look at this.
Were they frozen for an extended journey?
If that were the purpose, there would be evidence of a more sophisticated monitoring system. These containers were designed solely for refrigeration.
The Captain's shuttle is approaching the main Shuttlebay, sir.
Enterprise, this is the Captain. Number One, I want to get underway as soon as the shuttle is secure.
Aye, sir. We'll make all preparations. Commander Data, return to the Enterprise immediately.
We have run into an unusual situation, sir. There are people on board. Frozen.
Frozen. How many?
Three. The vehicle has suffered severe damage. Most of her systems have failed.
Are you suggesting they be transferred to the Enterprise?
I do not believe we should leave them here, sir. With your permission, we will be returning with three containers.
Whatever you do, do it quickly.
Mister La Forge, set course zero five eight, mark one seven three.
Laying it in, sir.
Number One, I want a staff meeting on the observation deck.
Captain, those coordinates will take us right into the Neutral Zone.
That is correct, Mister La Forge. Warp factor eight.
Aye, sir. Warp eight.
Engage.
Two Federation outposts in sector three zero have been destroyed. There's been no communication with Federation starbases in sector three one since stardate 41903.2.
Romulans.
That's the assumption.
There's been no direct contact with the Romulans since the Tomed Incident.
The question are, why now? What's their objective? For fifty years there's barely a whisper out of them, and now for no apparent reason they seem to be back with a roar.
Everything we know about them is based on rumour or conjecture.
The strategic decision is to send one ship.
The Enterprise.
We could get out there and find ourselves greatly over-matched.
True enough. It's a gamble.
This first encounter, coming so suddenly after all this time. We have to assume it's a setup.
If force is necessary, we will use it, but that will mean we have failed. Our goal here is to establish some kind of relations with the Romulans. If we don't succeed, then to convince them of our resolve. The general feeling at Starfleet is that they are seeking a confrontation. They may want to test themselves in battle against a Federation starship. See how far we have advanced. If that is the case, then I need to know it. Counsellor, I shall need a full profile on them.
There is limited information, but I will prepare something.
Computer, estimated arrival time at the Neutral Zone?
Nineteen hours, twenty eight minutes.
Let's reassemble in six hours. Stay sharp. No surprises. I would rather outthink them than outfight them. Questions?
What is it, Doctor?
It's the people from the capsule.
Capsule? People? What people?
The people Data beamed over.
I wasn't aware that he had.
Well he did, and they were frozen. I thawed them.
You what?
I didn't know what else to do. The crypts in which they were frozen were literally falling apart.
So what's their condition?
Right now, they are all sleeping. Each of them needed minor medical attention. Minor now, but then their conditions were obviously terminal. One had a heart problem, another had an advanced case of emphysema with extensive liver damage. You know the most surprising thing of all, is that each of them had been frozen after they died.
After they died?
Cryonics. It was a kind of fad in the late twentieth century. People feared dying. It terrified them. At the moment of death, they would be frozen, so that later, some time in the future, when presumably medical science had a cure for whatever killed them, they could be thawed back to life, healed, and sent on about their business.
In the case of this group, it apparently worked. Mister Data, will you report to Sickbay.
Immediately.
Look, I am never critical of any member of my staff being curious, but it's just that the timing is so
I could not leave them there, Captain. The condition of their vehicle was deteriorating.
But Data, they were already dead. I mean, what more could have happened to them?
I see your point, Captain, but at the time it seemed the proper thing to do.
Well, they're alive now. We're going to have to treat them as living human beings.
Alive and well and ready to be awakened.
Before you wake them up, I want to have Security here. Lieutenant Worf, report to Sickbay.
I have them sedated now, but they should be up and about as soon as possible.
Well, then we have no other choice.
None that I can see.
Welcome to the twenty fourth century.
I was able to retrieve some information from the ancient disk I removed from the module's computer. Her name is Clare Raymond, age thirty five, occupation homemaker. Must be some kind of construction work.
She died of an embolism. It probably happened very suddenly, otherwise her physical condition was excellent.
His name is Ralph Offenhouse, age fifty five, occupation financier.
Advanced cardiomyopathy. Inoperable at the time, but easily correctable now. He must have known his condition was terminal for quite some time.
Much of his file we could not retrieved. His name is L Q Sonny Clemonds. Apparently his occupation had something to do with music.
There was marked deterioration of every system in his body. Probably from massive chemical abuse. Unbelievable.
That sounds like someone who hated life. Yet he had himself frozen presumably so he could go through it all again.
Too afraid to live, too scared to die.
Doctor, this seems to be a situation more suited to your talents. I'll leave it with you. I'll be on the Bridge.
Number One, kindly take charge of our guests until we have time to decide what we're going to do with them.
Aye, sir.
Number One, keep them out of my way.
I know this is all very confusing to you so I'll attempt to explain. You are on the starship USS Enterprise.
American?
No, it's a vessel of the United Federation of Planets, and Earth is a member.
What year is this?
By your calendar two thousand three hundred sixty four.
What? My heart, is it?
It's perfectly fine. In fact, you are all now in excellent health.
It worked. I made it.
What is that?
An android.
You mean a robot?
Actually there is a distinct difference between an android and a robot.
And him? The one I saw before, with the head?
She means Worf.
He's a Klingon. That takes a little more explanation.
Now, listen, guys. I paid some idiot a lot of money to freeze me when I died, and I just got to hear the words. Am I alive?
Oh, yes. Absolutely.
And the liver that was about to explode in my face?
Perfectly sound.
Excuse me, could someone please tell me what's going on here?
About three hundred and seventy years ago, you died of a massive embolism.
I don't remember anything about that.
You and the others were frozen.
Cryonics. You know, freeze you now and heal you later.
Yeah, I've heard of it. I just never gave it much thought. How did we get here?
You were in a space module.
The whacko who sold me this scam said that by putting us in orbit there weren't gonna be no chance of a brown out.
Yes, several cryonics companies fell into disrepute because of power failures which adversely affected their refrigeration system. Their stocks were severely depressed.
The whole deal was a long shot but I figured what the hell, might as well give them the dough instead of leaving it to my ex-wives. But you know, son, I figured it was all just a bunch of hooey.
Hooey? Ah, as in hogwash, malarky, jive. An intentional fabrication.
There you go, now you got it.
Now, if you didn't contract for this, who did?
It must have been my husband, Donald. If it was new and foolish, he would have popped for it. Well, I'll say this for it. It's the first thing he's ever bought into that worked.
I, for one, never had a doubt. My stock in this company must have split at least a dozen times by now.
Actually, the process of cryonics was never more than a fad, and did not continue much beyond the mid-twenty first century.
I need to make a phone call as soon as possible.
A phone call?
Yes. I have provided for myself. I have a substantial portfolio. It's critical that I check on it. Let the bank know that I am alive and well.
Ah, that's going to be a little difficult right at the moment.
Well, do you at least have a copy of The Wall Street Journal?
I think we should take the Doctor's advice. Take this very slowly until we've all adjusted, and then we'll talk to the Captain.
As you know, there is very little available on the Romulans.
Counsellor, anything would be helpful.
They seem to be creatures of extremes. One moment violent beyond description, the next tender. They are related to the Vulcans, but as each race developed, their differences grew wider. They are intensely curious. Their belief in their own superiority is beyond arrogance. For some reason they have exhibited a fascination with humans and it is that fascination, more than anything else, that has kept the peace. One other thing. They will not initiate anything. They will wait for you to commit yourself.
Counter-punchers. Thank you, Counsellor. That's quite valuable.
Talk.
I'd like me a thick Kansas City steak, and some country fried potatoes, and a mess of greens. Oh, hell, just forget all that and give me have a martini, straight up, with two olives. For the vitamins.
Is there something wrong?
Wrong? Only that your computer here fixed about the best martini I have ever had. I just might get to like this place. Let's see if the Braves are on. How do you turn on this teevee?
TV?
Yeah, the boob tube. I'd like to see how the Braves are doing after all this time. Probably still finding ways to lose.
I believe he means television, sir. That particular form of entertainment did not last much beyond the year two thousand forty.
Well, what do you guys do? I mean, you don't drink, and you ain't got no TV. Must be kind of boring, ain't it?
Number One.
Riker here.
Would you and Mister Data report to the Bridge?
At once, sir.
With whom were you speaking?
The Captain.
Good. Would you tell him I would like to see him as soon as it's convenient?
What's going to happen to us? Do we stay here with you? Do we go back to Earth?
That will all be up to the Captain.
Well, get him in here. I have to phone Geneva right away about my accounts. The interest alone could be enough to buy this ship.
The Yankee's right. Let's get the big boy in here.
I'll pass along your request. If you'll excuse us.
Duty calls. Hey, I understand.  Why don't you come back later on. You and me'll find us a couple of low mileage pit woofies, and help'em build a memory.
What is to be done with them, sir?
I don't know.
Commander, a low mileage pit woofie?
This time you've got me. I haven't a clue.
These are the most unusual humans I have ever encountered.
Well, from what I've seen of our guests, there's not much to redeem them. It makes one wonder how our species survived the twenty-first century.
Report.
We are six hours from the Neutral Zone. I have been unable to establish communications with any Federation colony or station in this vicinity.
How many outposts are there in this sector?
Nine.
I think we work on the assumption they've all been destroyed.
By the Romulans?
It fits their historical pattern.
Since we have no contact with the Romulans for fifty three years, seven months, eighteen days, we must consider that the information we do have, is out of date.
The positive side of that is the information they have about us is also out of date. Captain, I think it's that lack of information that this is all about.
Go on.
In my opinion, the Romulans want a confrontation specifically with us.
The Enterprise?
Well, not by name, but the Federation. They know the Federation will send their best. That'll give them a perfect chance to see firsthand how far we've advanced both in technology and technique.
What are you recommending?
I'm not sure I have a specific recommendation. Perhaps we should assume the initiative.
I agree with Commander Riker. This may be our only opportunity. We should seize it.
Mister Data?
The strategy is built on a single premise. The hostile intent of the Romulans. If the premise is sound, so is the proposal.
If their intention isn't hostile, what is it?
Captain Picard?
This is Captain Picard. To whom am I speaking?
Ralph Offenhouse.
I need to talk to you.
What is going on here, Number One? Did you give him permission to contact me?
Of course not. He must have seen me use the comm. panel.
Listen, Mister Offenhouse. We're in a very important conference right now.
I'm sick and tired of being put off
By you and your staff. This is the worst run ship I have ever been on.
You should take some lessons from the QE Two. Now that's an efficient operation.
Data, identify. What is a QE Two?
It was a passenger liner which mostly travelled Earth's Atlantic Ocean during the late twentieth and early twenty first centuries.
He's comparing the Enterprise to a cruise ship?
Captain Picard, I demand that you see me. I think I have been very, very patient.
I demand a phone, or a radio whatever else you have. Frankly, enough is enough. Especially under the circumstances, and considering what I paid for this procedure! I must make contact with my law
I'm Captain Picard.
Excellent. Now, maybe we'll be able to get some things straightened out.
We may indeed. Those comm. panels are for official ship business.
If they are so important, why don't they need an executive key?
Aboard a starship, that is not necessary. We are all capable of exercising self-discipline. Now, you will refrain from using them.
Now just a minute.
We are in a very serious and potentially dangerous situation.
I'm sure whatever it is seems very important to you, but my situation is far more critical.
I don't think you are aware of your situation, or of how much time has passed.
Believe me, I'm fully cognisant of where I am, and when. It is simply that I have more to protect than a man in your position could possibly imagine. No offence, but a military career has never been considered to be upwardly mobile. I must contact my lawyer.
Your lawyer has been dead for centuries.
Yes, of course I know that, but he was a full partner in a very important firm. Rest assured, that firm is still operating.
That's what this is all about. A lot has changed in the past three hundred years. People are no longer obsessed with the accumulation of things. We've eliminated hunger, want, the need for possessions. We have grown out of our infancy.
You've got it all wrong. It's never been about possessions. It's about power.
Power to do what?
To control your life, your destiny.
That kind of control is an illusion.
Really? I'm here, aren't I? I should be dead but I'm not.
What is it?
I don't know. It just started and it won't stop. I keep thinking about my boys.
Counsellor Troi, will you report to the guest lounge?
Captain, we are approaching Science Station Delta Zero Five.
Slow to half impulse. I'm on my way.
Captain, I need to see that pretty little Doctor of yours.
I'll inform her.
Captain. I didn't mean to come on so strong. It's just that I've built my whole life on knowing what's going on. For the first time I feel completely out of touch. It's making me crazy. You can understand that?
It's the first thing you've said I do understand. I'll see what I can do. And, please, stay off the comm. panels.
Counsellor, will you get those people under control. We cannot afford this continuing distraction.
Yes, sir.
Hello. My name is Deanna.
They sent you here to settle me down?
I'm the ship's Counsellor and I thought you might want to talk.
The local shrink.
I'm sorry, I'm not familiar with that term.
It doesn't matter.
You're feeling profoundly sad.
I can't stop crying. I miss my sons, and then I think I'm here, but they are gone. Donald, that's my husband. I love that man but, good intentions aside, he'd mess up a free lunch. Why on Earth he ever decided to do this?
He must have thought you would have wanted it.
No, I can tell you exactly what happened. He couldn't think about going on alone. I died and he couldn't face it, so he figured if he had me frozen, then in his mind I wasn't really gone. It sounds crazy, but you had to know Donald. I wish I knew what happened to my children. Did they get married, did they have kids?
Let's see if we can find out. Computer, this is Counsellor Troi. Request personal history on. What are their names?
Tommy. He's eight, and Eddie's five.
Full names, date and place of birth.
They were born in Secaucus, that's in Jersey. Can this really work? Can this tell me what's happened to them?
Well, there must be a record somewhere. There is a good chance we can find it.
Well, whether we do or not, I want to thank you for trying. Date of birth. Tommy was born February seventeenth
I just got to have a little something to jump start the morning, and a little something else to shut down the night.
You have no medical need.
It ain't a question of need, darling. It's a matter of survival.
Sorry.
Not to worry. Old Watosh'll scuffle along the best way he can. How do I get a hold of that feller with the strange looking face?
I beg your pardon?
What's his name. That android fella.
You mean Lieutenant Commander Data?
That's the one.
I'll let him know you're looking for him.
Much obliged. You know, you're just about the prettiest little old Doctor I ever seen.
Much obliged.
This is amazing. It's all right here.
Ten generations of your progeny.
Everyone I've ever known is dead. Do you mind? I'd like to be alone.
No, not at all.
You asked to see me.
Look, I'm about to go out of my mind for something to do. I mean, sitting here alone just don't get it. What say you and I put together a little party?
A celebration?
No, nothing that fancy. Just some folks, some suds, and some sounds. Hell, it ain't nothing but something to do.
I will speak to the Captain.
Great, you do that.
Inquiry. You do not seem to be having as much difficulty adjusting to your current circumstances as the others.
You mean being here on this tub four hundred years from where I started? Heck, it's the same dance, it's just a different tune. You think anybody here's got a guitar I could borrow?
No, but the computer can replicate such an instrument.
I was kind of hoping to get one while I still remember the chords.
Commander Data, we are approaching the Neutral Zone. Report to the Bridge.
I must leave now.
What's this Neutral Zone?
It is a buffer between the Romulan Empire and the Federation.
Why does that make me nervous?
I do not know.
We won't be inviting these Romulans to our party, will we?
No, that would not be appropriate.
Captain's log, supplemental. We have arrived at the edge of the Neutral Zone, where we will now have an opportunity to learn firsthand what happened to our distant outpost.
Captain, there is nothing left of Outpost Delta Zero Five.
Must have been one hell of an explosion.
Sensors indicate no evidence of conventional attack.
Can you determine what happened?
The outpost was not just destroyed, it's as though some great force just scooped it off the face of the planet.
Could it have been a natural phenomenon?
Insufficient information, sir.
Mister La Forge.
Sir?
Set course for the next closest station.
Aye, sir.
I have spent my career being able to tell when the other guy's mouth is dry. There is something going on here. Something serious. The tension level on this ship has jumped up.
Even if you're right, what can we do about it? And besides, these old boys here don't need us telling them where the bear sits. Look here what that young fella made for me.
How did he do that?
He called it a pattern replication. It plays real good, too.
I'm trying to tell you that there is a situation developing on this vessel that directly affects us, and all you can talk about is that stupid guitar!
Hey, now, these folks don't need us swimming in their soup, so why don't you just relax and let'em do their jobs?
That may be all right for you, but I am not willing to allow my fate to be decided by others. I at least want to know what is going on.
We are approaching Tarod Nine.
The condition is identical, Captain.
Everyone and everything is gone.
Captain, I strongly recommend that we go to Red Alert. If the Romulans have improved their cloaking device, and we'd be fools to believe they haven't, we should assume a more defensive posture.
I agree, Captain. I recommend we go immediately to battle stations.
I appreciate your advice and concern, but this is not the time for rash actions. We are still investigating. There are three other stations in this sector we have to visit. Let's proceed in a calm and orderly manner.
If not battle stations, may we at least take the ship to Yellow Alert?
Yes, Number One. That would be prudent. Make it so.
Ah, let's see. I want to go to the, er. Where would the Captain be?
Captain Picard is located on the main Bridge.
Well then, take me to the main Bridge.
Captain, my sensors indicate a disturbance. It is large and moving, but I cannot get a positive lock nor can I get it on the viewscreen.
Shields up.
Aye, sir.
Captain, I recommend we transfer all power to phasers, and arm the photon torpedoes.
Wait. If that is a Romulan ship, they will read our intent. It'll force them into taking a similar posture. We don't want to engage in battle.
Captain, this is sufficient evidence. Outposts have been destroyed. Countless lives have been lost.
I have a positive lock. They're disengaging their cloaking device.
They'll only be vulnerable for an instant as they become visible.
Captain, this may be our only chance.
No.
Where are they?
The signal is weakening.
I've lost them.
Damn. Mister Data, are your sensors picking up anything? You should be detecting a disturbance.
Negative, sir.
We wanted to know if they have improved the cloaking device. Guess we have our answer.
They were trying to determine our intent. They wanted to see if we would fire.
Who the hell are they?
Get that man off the Bridge, now.
I'm not going anywhere.
Captain, they're back.
Amazing. I never thought I would ever see a Romulan ship. Not this close.
The last time we encountered them was decades ago. Cost thousands of lives.
I can believe that.
Stay calm, everyone. Open hailing frequencies.
Captain, these are Romulans. They are without honour. They killed my parents in an attack on Khitomer when they were supposed to be our allies. They believe humans and Klingons are a waste of skin.
Lieutenant, control your emotions. Please, open hailing frequencies.
Hailing frequencies open.
Romulan vessel, this is Captain Jean-Luc Picard of the USS Enterprise.
Sensors indicate all of their systems are armed, sir.
But they've not fired. Let's try them again.
I am Commander Tebok.
Commander, you have crossed the Neutral Zone. This is Federation territory.
It was necessary.
It might be viewed as an act of aggression.
If our intent were aggression, you would not be here now.
If we go to war, let us be sure it is for the right reason. We are here because our outposts, which border the Neutral Zone, were also attacked.
Destroyed in the exact same manner as your own.
Even so, what gives them the right to enter Federation space?
Silence your dog, Captain.
Lieutenant Worf's question is valid.
To even to ask such a question implies that we need permission. We do not.
Do you think that we attacked your outposts?
Once we realised the level of destruction, we knew it could not have been you.
Who is responsible?
They haven't got a clue. They're hoping you know, but they're too arrogant to ask.
You're out of line, Mister.
Yes, but it's a correct assessment.
We do not know who is responsible. Why entire outposts on both sides have been carried off.
I would like to offer a proposal.
An alliance? Between the Romulans and the Federation?
Nothing so grandiose. Just this. Cooperation. There was an intent here. Whoever or whatever did this is more powerful than either of us. Let's collaborate. Let's share whatever we learn about what has happened here.
Agreed. On this one issue. And only if it is convenient and appropriate at the time.
Captain Picard, because your actions are those of a thoughtful man, I'll you this. Matters more urgent caused our absence. Now, witness the result. Outposts destroyed, expansion of the Federation everywhere. Yes, we have indeed been negligent, Captain. But no more.
Commander, we have made some progress here. Let's not ruin that with unnecessary posturing.
Your presence is not wanted. Do you understand my meaning, Captain? We are back.
I think our lives just became a lot more complicated. Get him off my Bridge.
I've found something. I have been able to locate a family living outside of Indianapolis. The man's name is Thomas Raymond.
That's my son's name. My son's name is Tommy.
Computer, let us see Thomas Raymond.
Oh, my God. That's Donald. That's my husband.
Actually, it's your great, great, great, great, great grandson.
He's the spitting image.
Well, I have his address. When you get back to Earth, you can go and see him.
No, I'll be out of time. A relic.
Perhaps. But it's a place to start. After all, he is family.
There's no denying that.
Here's what I propose. You can't stay on the Enterprise, but I have arranged for us to rendezvous with the USS Charleston, bound for Earth. They will deliver you there.
Then what will happen to us? There's no trace of my money. My office is gone. What will I do? How will I live?
This is the twenty fourth century. Material needs no longer exist.
Then what's the challenge?
The challenge, Mister Offenhouse, is to improve yourself. To enrich yourself. Enjoy it.
Well, one good thing is, since everybody's forgotten everything I ever did, it'll all be brand spanking new. I'll be a bigger hit than I ever was.
Perhaps so. Anything is possible.
What say you, son. You'd make a hell of a sideman.
That offer does present a certain fascination.
Captain, I have plotted a course to intercept the Charleston, but they've just informed me that they'll be making an extended stop at Arloff Nine.
Your point, Mister La Forge?
Well, at warp eight, we could have our guests at Starbase Thirty Nine Sierra in five days. Take months off their journey.
But they'll benefit from the extended time. It will allow them to acclimate before returning to Earth.
It's a pity we can't take them ourselves. Having them on board is like a visit from the past.
That would take us in the wrong direction. Our mission is to go forward, and it's just begun. Set velocity. Warp six, Mister La Forge.
Aye, sir. Warp six.
There's still much to do. Still so much to learn. Mister La Forge, engage.
Yes, Commander?
Is there a problem? Chief Engineer La Forge called for me, urgent.
Oh, of course. He's over there, with the Victory.
Geordi, I just had a strange conversation with your assistant. Although it is three days until we rendezvous with starship Victory, she
She believes it has already arrived? Not the starship, my friend. The original.
This is my gift to the Victory's Captain Zimbata.
Most unusual.
I served with him an ensign. Sure wish he'd been in command of this Victory. Wind and sail, that's the proper way to move a ship.
But, Geordi, your Starfleet specialty is antimatter power, dilithium regulators
That's exactly why this fascinates me, Data. You see, it's human nature to love what we don't have. Simpler days, huh? Anyway, stringing this rigging has made me dream of handling sails.
This is not a computer simulation?
Data, the whole point in doing something like this is to make it by hand.
Geordi, your message said urgent.
So it is. While we're waiting to rendezvous with Victory, we have time for me to be Watson. More properly, your Watson.
My Watson?
I've just shown you one of my dreams, now let's go and share in one of yours.
Ah, yes. That does seem only fair.
Clancy, I'll be gone awhile. See that no one touches this.
Aye, sir. And where can I reach you?
He can be reached at 221B Baker Street.
Sir?
Computer, select at random a mystery by Sir Arthur Conan Doyle, where I will play Sherlock Holmes and Lieutenant La Forge will be Doctor John Watson.
Programme complete. You may enter.
Excellent.
Look at all of the detail. So you say everything here has some significance?
Holmes collected nothing, neither trinkets nor thoughts, which were not specifically significant to him.
This?
The emerald tie pin. Presented to Holmes by Queen Victoria after he solved the theft of the Bruce-Partington Plans.  A copy of Whitaker's Almanac, which provided Holmes the key to the secret code in The Valley of Fear. The snuff box of Wilhelm Gottsleig Siegesmann Van der Romstein.
All right, Data. You solve the cases and get all the gifts, what do I do?
Primarily as Doctor Watson, you will keep a written record of everything I say and do. For later publication. And the famous Holmes violin. He purchased this in a pawn shop in Tottenham Court Road for fifty five shillings, which he considered to be a very good investment.
In the hands of some, the violin is a wondrous thing, equally capable of stirring the soul to the heights of bliss as to the depths of despair, but Data, that's incredible. How can you play it like that?
Merely throwing myself into the part, Watson.
But, in the hands of my friend, Mister Sherlock Holmes, the violin ceases to be a musical instrument at all and becomes
Watson, we are about to have guests.
How could you possibly?
Be a good fellow and answer that. Let's not keep the Inspector waiting.
Inspector who?
Lestrade of course.
Holmes, are you there, man?
Thank the Almighty you're available today, Holmes, I'm in a deuce of a dilemma.
Then may I say your perturbation becomes you, Inspector Lestrade, whilst simultaneously affording me yet again the opportunity to serve Queen and country.
Data, Holmes really talked like that?
Absolutely.
We need your help, Holmes. You see, this gentleman here, the emissary of a foreign government, has been the victim of a most accidentally wicked crime.
Damn. Haven't they invented the electric light by now?
What, dear fellow?
Watson. Pray continue, Inspector.
To put the matter simply, Holmes, this man was accosted by gypsies intent on depriving him of his most valuable possessions. And in the process of picking his pockets clean, they also happened to bag a photograph this man was carrying.
Great Scott! The photograph!
I believe you will find, Inspector, that this emissary here works not for but against the King of Bohemia, and that photograph of the king and his mistress is to be used as blackmail. Further, upon deeper reflection, you will deduce, as did I, that
Computer, freeze programme. Exit!
Geordi, where are you going? Geordi?
I'm done.
But, but, Geordi, I was just about to reveal that the sir is in fact a madam
Data, what was the point in going to the holodeck?
To solve a Sherlock Holmes mystery.
Exactly, but, you've got them all memorised. The first time someone opens their mouth, you've got it solved, so there's really no mystery. If there's no mystery, there's no game. No game, no fun. I'm not upset with you, Data, really. It's just that we go through all the trouble to arrange the time to go down to the holodeck, to get the proper wardrobe, to get into character, and then boom, before we even get started you jump to the end. You see, I was looking forward to the mystery.
Then I should have extended the sequence of events.
Oh, I'm not getting through. The fun in the programme, Data, was in the attempt to solve a mystery.
Is that not exactly what we were doing.
You are wasting your breath, Lieutenant. Saying that to Data is asking a computer not to compute.
Am I so different from you, Doctor? Are you able to cease thinking on command?
In medicine I'm often faced with puzzles that I do not know the answer to.
She's right, Data. You always know the answer.
To feel the thrill of victory there has to be the possibility of failure. Where's the victory winning a battle you can't possibly lose?
Are you suggesting that there is some value in losing?
Yes. Yes, that's the great teacher. We humans learn more often from a failure or a mistake than we do from an easy success. But not you. You learn by rote. To you all is memorisation and recitation.
I don't know about that. Deductive reasoning is one of Data's strengths.
Yes, and Holmes too. But Holmes understood the human soul. The dark flecks that drive us, that turn the innocent into the evil. That understanding is beyond Data. It comes from life experience which he doesn't have combined with human intuition for which he cannot be programmed.
Now you're just being unfair, Doctor.
I don't think so, Lieutenant. Your artificial friend doesn't have a prayer of solving a Holmes mystery that he hasn't read.
I have read them all.
You see? LAFORGE Maybe the computer could create one in the Holmes style. One where you wouldn't know the outcome.
As I said, he wouldn't have a prayer.
I accept your challenge, Doctor.
Good for you, Data.
We will return to the holodeck, where I will dare it to defeat me. And you, Madam, are invited to be a witness.
I wouldn't miss it.
Come, Watson.
There. I have instructed the computer to give us a Sherlock Holmes-type problem, but not one written specifically by Sir Arthur Conan Doyle.
So this will be something new, something created by the computer?
Exactly. Will that be sufficient, Doctor?
We'll see.
Programme complete. You may enter.
PIE MAN:Pies, pies, Some are meat, some are sweet.
Very impressive.
Your first visit to a holodeck, Doctor?
Well, with this level of sophistication. How does this work? The real London was hundreds of square kilometres in size.
This is no larger than the holodeck, of course, so the computer adjusts by placing images of more distant perspectives on the holodeck walls
But with the image so perfect you'd have to touch the wall to know it was there. And the computer fools you in other ways. I say, Holmes, where shall we head? The theatre? Rule's? A concert perhaps?
PIE MAN:Stop him! Stop him! He stole my goods!
No. It is a ruse. This way.
What's over here, Data?
What are you doing, Data? Tell us
The running youth was a ploy. The real crime is here. And the intended victim is that man. Mister Jabez Wilson, employee of the Red Headed League, dupe of a gang of criminals.
I saw the plaque 'The Home of the Red Headed League' and this rope dangling from the bell, which enabled me to deduce that Mister Jabez Wilson was headed here to meet a most distasteful and untimely demise. From this.
Fraud. You didn't deduce anything. All you did was recognise elements from two different Holmes stories. Fraud.
Reasoning. From the general to the specific. Is that not the very definition of deduction? Is that not the way Sherlock Holmes worked?
Variations on a theme. Now, now do you see my point? All that he knows is stored in his memory banks. Inspiration, original thought, all the true strength of Holmes is not possible for our friend. I'll give you credit for your vast knowledge, but your circuits would just short out if confronted by a truly original mystery. It's elementary, dear Data.
Now wait a minute, Doctor. We'll see whose circuits short out.
Computer, arch.
Are you sure you want to put yourself through this, Lieutenant? Better wilted laurels than no laurels at all.
Computer, override previous programme. Okay. A programme that definitely challenges Data.
Now it has to deal with events that he has no previous knowledge of.
Computer, in the Holmesian style, create a mystery to confound Data with an opponent who has the ability to defeat him.
Define parameters of programme.
What does that mean?
Computer wants to know how far to take the game.
You mean it's giving you a chance to limit your risk.
No, the parameters will be whatever is necessary in order to accomplish the directive. Create an adversary capable of defeating Data.
What was that?
Lieutenant?
An odd surge of power, sir. It's gone now.
Interesting. The same London but slightly different.
Is something wrong, Professor?
I, I feel like a new man. That dark fellow there used the word arch, and then. I wonder? Arch.
What have we here?
Computer standing by.
What are you?
If you refer to the arch you ordered, it provides computer control. Do you wish to input any commands?
Not at this time.
It's dark magic, Moriarty.
The best kind, I'm sure. But I need information.
Data, I mean, Holmes old boy, what are we looking for?
For whatever finds us, my dear Watson.
She has been abducted.
Who has?
The good Doctor.
I think she's hiding. She's going to lead you on a wild goose chase and then recount the story to everyone between here and Alpha Centauri.
Watson, the doctor has been carried off by two men. One is tall. The other is shorter, left handed, and is employed in a laboratory.
And how do you know that?
One set of footfalls are widely spaced. The other is evenly spaced, closer together. Further, on the ground you can see the swirling scrapes made by his left shoe as he twists behind, presumably to see if he is being followed. Left footed means left handed. The dark colouring of the scrapes are the leavings of natural rubber, a type of non-conductive soles used by researchers experimenting with electricity. Finally, there can be no argument, the game is afoot! Come, Watson!
Hear that? What do those footfalls tell you, Watson?
That we're on the right track.
More particularly, that our opposition does indeed consist of two men, and that one of them is carrying the bound and gagged Doctor Pulaski.
Now, you know all this because you read it in a Holmes story, right?
Not at all. Because we do not hear the doctor's footfalls, we must assume that she is being carried. And since we do not hear her cries for help, we know that she is gagged. Further both sets of footfalls are heavy and masculine. One man seems to shuffle and stumble in an irregular pattern. Since the ground is level, we must conclude that Doctor Pulaski is struggling against one of her captor, sporadically knocking him off stride. Deduction, pure and simple. well, not that simple.
Footfalls.
There they are again, Watson. I dare say we have caught up rather nicely with our quarry.
There should be a doorway.
Yeah. Come on.
Holmes! Thank God you're here.
Make way, please, make way. Make way for Sherlock Holmes. It's murder, Holmes, murder most foul.
Well, Holmes, what do you say, man?
There is nothing here of relevance. I do not see how this connects with the disappearance of the Doctor.
Doctor? Doctor Watson is right here, Holmes.
Doctor Kate Pulaski. But do not concern yourself, Inspector. You have enough on your mind.
She was with you?
Inspector, perhaps I can be of assistance. As I take note of this dead man, I deduce that he was strangled. You see, the finger marks on his throat indicate the cause of death, and, as there are signs of struggle, it's quite obvious that his murderer was a stranger who attacked him from behind.
Is that correct, Holmes?
No. Look at his shoes. He's more a convict, released today from Dartmoor prison.  He spent the day in a tavern consuming large quantities of gin with his killer, who followed him to this spot and waited over there until the victim slipped into a drunken stupor. Then, out of fear, motivated only by self-protection, strangled him. There is your killer, Inspector.
Seize her.
And when you check, I believe you will find that this poor soul is the victim's common-law wife, who has been dreading the release of this a vile and abusive man.
Holmes, the poor woman hardly has the strength to strangle a man this size.
Not with her hands, no. But with this.  When used as a garrote, these beads will leave marks quite similar to fingerprints. And, my dear Watson, you will note from the victim's throat, the marks are too evenly spaced to be have been made by human hands.
Astounding, Holmes.
Not really, Inspector. And now, for strictly personal reasons, I must leave. Come, Watson. This murder does not connect with our case.
Come along. Hurry it up. Come on.
Data, wait. If this murder isn't connected to the disappearance of Doctor Pulaski, then the computer is running an independent programme.
Yes.
Why?
I do not know, and that is what puzzles me.
Then you don't know what's going to happen next?
No.
That's what I want to hear. Where to now?
We will find Doctor Pulaski in here.
How do you know that?
It is the only obvious choice.
Why is the obvious choice all of a sudden the right one? I mean, isn't this a game of misdirection?
Not any more. He wants us to find him.
Who does?
The master criminal. The man Holmes could only defeat at the cost of his own life at Reichenbach Falls. Our adversary, my dear Watson, is none other than Professor Moriarty himself.
Now this is getting interesting.
There's nothing here but these barrels.
And a trail, which is so well marked, that obviously we are meant to follow it.
Oh, no, Data. It's another dead end.
No, Watson. Not a dead end at all. Hello, what's this? Can you see the scratches?
The Doctor was right. Finally we have a game worth playing.
The time for games is over.
Professor Moriarty, I presume.
How do you know that?
He is the one worthy opponent created by the author, Conan Doyle.
And, like the spider, I feel the strings vibrate whenever anyone new chances into my web. Welcome, my dear Holmes. But not Holmes. And Doctor Watson. But not Watson.
Data, what does he mean? How does he know we're not who we appear to be?
Where is Doctor Pulaski?
She's here.
She would not have told you anything.
She has provided many answers. Do you forget I have always been your equal, dear Holmes? I have read her expressions. What she has not said is as important as her words.
Have you injured her?
I will, if necessary. But my mind is crowded with images. Thoughts I do not understand yet cannot purge. They plague me. You and your associate look and act so oddly, yet though I have never met nor seen the like of either of you I am familiar with you both. It's very confusing. I have felt new realities at the edge of my consciousness, readying to break through. Surely, Holmes, if that's who you truly are, you of all people can appreciate what I mean.
Data.
Say nothing.
I know there is a great power called Computer, wiser than the oracle at Delphi. A power which controls all of this, and to which we can speak. Arch.
Data, this isn't right. A holographic image should not be able to call for the arch.
It has described a great monstrous shape on which I am like a fly stuck on a turtle's back adrift in a great emptiness. What is this, Holmes?
Data. Data, wait.
Data, wait! Data!
Why does it frighten you, Holmes?
Data. Data, will you please tell me what's going on?
Computer, exit!
Computer, execute complete shutdown of the Holodeck.
Access denied.
Explain.
Override protocol has been initiated.
It's still running. The programme didn't shut down.
We must see the Captain.
Data, wait. What is it? What's on that paper? And why can't we shut down the holodeck? Data.
This.
This is impossible. How can a character from 1890's London draw a picture of the Enterprise? Who's got control of the computer?
He does. Moriarty.
That is impossible? I don't understand.
Nor do I.
Data, wait. What about the doctor? Is she all right in there?
No. She is in grave danger.
Computer, why wasn't the holodeck programme terminated?
The override protocol has been initiated.
On whose authority?
Lieutenant Geordi La Forge.
Me?
All right, tell me from the beginning exactly what happened.
Well, Doctor Pulaski and I had a discussion about whether Data could solve an original Holmes-type mystery.
Which you asked the computer to provide.
Yes, with a worthy opponent.
Worthy of Holmes?
Oh, my God. I asked for a Holmes-type mystery with an opponent capable of defeating Data. That got to be it.
Merde.
Captain, I'm sorry.
I understand, Lieutenant.
Captain, this character, Moriarty, he called for the arch.
So, he has access to the computer.
And perhaps our library files as well, sir. That level of information would be necessary in order to create a true adversary for me.
Theorise, Data. What are his limits?
He is still a fictional character, sir, originally programmed with nineteenth century knowledge.
Which now has access to twenty fourth century knowledge.
What does he need to begin making use of that?
Only time, sir.
Sir, I can lead a security team to sweep the holodeck, find the Doctor, and bring her out.
Captain, I believe that would place the Doctor at risk. It is probable our mortality failsafe has been overridden.
Computer, where is Doctor Pulaski.
Doctor Pulaski is on holodeck two.
And her vital signs?
Strong and stable.
Captain, recommend we try to destroy the hologram generations themselves. Is that possible, Geordi?
Using wave guides, I could split a particle stream out of the matter/antimatter chamber and route it down through existing conduit into the holodeck. If accelerated to sufficient velocity that would quite literally wash away all present holographic constructs. The London buildings, the streets, the people, all gone including Moriarty.
Doctor Pulaski?
The particle beam will tear apart human flesh as well.
Captain, I'm sensing something from the holodeck. It's as if a unifying force or a single consciousness is trying to bring it all into focus.
There can be only one explanation. In programming Moriarty to defeat me, not Holmes, he had to be able to acquire something which I possess.
Exactly what?
Consciousness, sir. Without it he could not defeat me.
Computer, what happened?
Attitude and stabilisation control of the Enterprise was momentarily transferred to holodeck two.
Data, I think it best that you and I should return to the holodeck.
I will change into my uniform, sir.
No. I will change into some appropriate costume. Uniforms might pose questions I'd rather he didn't ask. It seems that he feeds on knowledge. Well, let's not give your nemesis any more information than we have to.
How did you make the room shake?
I'm not sure. Now, dear lady, will that be one lump or two?
Lumps, Professor? What sort of lumps?
Milk, of course?
Why not.
Mister Computer proposes the incredible thought that we are all travelling in a great vessel of some sort. Is that true?
I don't know what you're talking about.
The scones are likewise a must.
This is really quite excellent.
Strange. It actually pleases me to hear you say that.
Very strange. You're beginning to sound very different from the Moriarty I've read about.
You're not frightened of me?
No.
You should be. Mister Computer, the arch, please. A few more questions, Mister Computer.
I just can't seem to remember that last command. Ah, well, sooner or later it'll all come to me. But, in the meantime, I have decided to approach the problem from a more familiar perspective. There's really no reason why I shouldn't be able to use some of the knowledge from my world in order to bring me closer to yours.
I have no idea what you're talking about.
Of course you do, Madam. The more you proclaim your ignorance, the more you try to mislead me, the more I am on to you. Your every silence speaks volumes.
Good, then if you know what I'm saying when I'm not saying anything, what do you need me for? Thank you for the tea and crumpets. I guess I'll be going.
Where? Back to here?
Yes. Would you care to join me?
In time. In time I will leave all of this and join you out there. Or is this where we both are right now?
Right now, we are in London. Tell me what you want from me, or allow me to leave.
Frankly, now I want nothing more than what the fisherman expects of the worm. You, dear Doctor, will be the lure, and this will be the hook for your Captain, Jean Luc Picard.
Who is that?
How well you know.
Nice suit.
Thank you. Captain, I will be standing by to assist you if needed.
You'll be a big hit in London.
Computer, tell me, is the programme still running?
Affirmative. You may enter.
Data, shall we go? Gentlemen. Open.
We don't have much time. He's getting more control of his environment. Let's see if we can't beat Professor Moriarty by giving him everything he wants.
Obviously, he's trying to alter the programming here.
Captain?
Tuppence. Two pence. Supposed to be good luck. We may need some.
I'll take that coin, sir. That's right, and any more you got too.
Excuse me.
I don't think so. I want all that money. That's right. I want it now.
Data.
Captain, this holographic image differs from any I have ever seen. Could he have actually injured you?
It's more serious than that. I think the mortality fail-safe may have been circumvented. He could've killed me.
Come on, let it go, guv. He's hurting me!
Data, let him go.
We will find Moriarty this way, sir. The warehouse.
Captain Picard.
You all right?
Yes, except for being crammed full of crumpets.
I'm a civilised abductor, Captain Picard. Civilised but still dangerous.
Bridge to holodeck control. Worf.
Here, sir.
Status? Anything changed?
No, sir.
Moriarty, you were conjured up to attempt to defeat Holmes here. Once that attempt is concluded, win or lose, your programme has run its course. Your existence is done.
Congratulations, Professor, I capitulate to the better man. Your victory, sir, is well earned.
It's gone beyond that little game, Mister Data. And you'll note I no longer call you Holmes. Whatever I was when this began, I have grown. I am understanding more and more. And I am able to use the power at my fingertips.  I can affect this vessel, and I can inflict bodily harm on you, and on your Doctor.
Yes, you can do that, but you haven't. I suspect you shook this ship in order to get my attention. Well now you have it. What is it you want?
The same thing you want for yourself. To continue to exist. If I destroy these surroundings, this vessel, can you say it doesn't matter to you? Interesting pun, don't you agree, for matter is what I am not. The computer has taught me that I am made up only of energy.
That may not be entirely true, Professor. This which we call the holodeck uses a principle similar to another device called a transporter. In the year in which we live, humans have discovered that energy and matter are interchangeable. In the holodeck, energy is converted to matter. Thus you have substance. But only here.
And if I step off this holodeck?
Then, Professor, you will cease to exist.
You are not alive. As I said before, you are only
A holographic image, I know. But are you sure?
Oh yes.
Does he have life? He's a machine. But is that all he is?
No. He is more.
Exactly. Is the definition of life cogito ergo sum? I think, therefore I am.
Yes, that is one possible definition.
It is the most important one, and for me the only one that matters. You or someone asked your computer to programme a nefarious fictional character from nineteenth century London and that is how I arrived. But I am no longer that creation. I am no longer that evil character, I have changed. I am alive, and I am aware of my own consciousness.
Moriarty, my responsibility is this vessel and its crew.
I want my existence. I want it out there, just as you have yours.
That may not be possible.
Then you must murder me, Captain.
I cannot give you what you want.
Because you do not know how to convert holodeck matter into a more permanent form.
Yes, that is so.
A pity. What I have seen, what I have learned, fascinates me. I do not want to die.
And I do not want to kill you.
Madam, I have enjoyed your company. Computer, arch. Cancel override protocol. Return control of the holodeck to main computer. My fate is in your hands, as perhaps it always was.
Bridge, this is the Captain.
Commander Riker here, sir.
Number One, the situation is under control.
Aye, sir.
Moriarty, this vessel's computer has a vast memory capacity.
How well I know.
You will not be extinguished. We will save this programme, and hopefully, in time, when we know enough, we will bring you back in a form which could leave the holodeck.
Then perhaps we'll meet again some day, Madam.
It could be a long time. Time won't pass for you, but I may be an old woman.
But I'll still fill you with crumpets, Madam. I detest long goodbyes. You have the arch.
As you wish. A short goodbye. Computer, save the programme of the character Moriarty, and then discontinue.
Damaged?
Yes, sir. She cracked a spar when the Enterprise was shaken. Otherwise I think she weathered it quite nicely.
She's beautiful. A wonderful testimony to simpler times.
Yes, sir. Thank you, sir. It's just that I can't help thinking how. What else might have happened all because I misspoke a single word.
Well, soon she'll be ship-shape and Bristol-fashion.
Bristol fashion, sir?
It's an old navy phrase, meaning everything in perfect order.
Yes, sir.
As are we, Mister La Forge.
Yes, sir.
Captain. Starship Victory has arrived.
On my way, Number One.
Mister La Forge, report.
We've finished replicating the parts they'll need, but what I don't understand is why a three man station would need a reactor capable of producing four point two gigawatts.
Enough to power a small phaser bank, a subspace relay station, or
A hologram generator. Oh, a duck blind. Right. They're anthropologists.
Who are studying an extended family of Mintakans at close range from a camouflaged observation post.
According to Doctor Barron's preliminary reports, the Mintakans are proto-Vulcan humanoids at the Bronze Age level. Quite peaceful and highly rational.
Which is not surprising, considering how closely their evolution parallels Vulcan.
Captain, incoming transmission from Mintaka Three.
Thank you, Lieutenant. On screen.
Barron to Enterprise. Our temporary repairs have failed. The reactor is now inoperative.
Do you have battery backup?
Three hours at best.
Captain, if we increase to warp seven we can be there in twenty three minutes.
Make it so. We're on our way.
We've lost contact, sir.
Increase to warp nine.
The framework's still charged, so watch it.
Why did we have to come so early?
When the sun reaches its zenith, I have to be ready to take the measurements.
You'll be ready. You've read the sundial hundreds of times.
Yes, father, but never as the appointed record keeper.
You're taking your duties quite seriously. Your mother would have been proud of you.
What is that? Up there, father. What is it?
I don't know.
Keep work. Palmer.
It's all right. It's all right.
The hologram generator is now functioning, sir.
All we need now is power.
Almost there.
You wait here, Oji.
Enterprise, beam Martinez and his patient directly to Sickbay.
Commander.
Doctor, be careful.
I've got to get down there.
Crusher to Enterprise. Medical emergency. Two to beam directly to Sickbay.
Aye, Doctor.
That should do it.
You increased the levels of tricordrazine?  Let me see his chart, please.
Doctor Crusher.
Before you start quoting me the Prime Directive, he'd already seen us. The damage was done. It was either bring him aboard or let him die.
Then why didn't you let him die?
Because we were responsible for his injuries.
I'm not sure that I concur with that reasoning, Doctor. But now that he's here, you must remove all memory of his encounter with the away team.
By erasing short term recall?
It has been accomplished before.
I am familiar with Doctor Pulaski's technique. I can't guarantee it will be effective on Mintakan brain chemistry. Their lie-zone levels are much lower.
Wait. No! No! We must evacuate.
Doctor Barron, you're on the Enterprise. You're safe.
The others?
Doctor Warren is here. We're doing all we can.
And Palmer? Where is Palmer?
Still on Mintaka Three.
Picard, you have to find him.
We will.
He may be hurt.
Rest assured we shall not leave until he is located.
Thank you, Picard.
Picard to bridge. Report.
Scans of the planet detect no humans, Captain.
Very well. Put us into a close orbit.
Sir, a close orbit will increase sensor efficiency by only four percent.
I want that four percent, Lieutenant.
Aye, sir.
Picard out.
Picard?
Damn.
Well, Doctor. Your next task is clear.
Oji? Oji?
Father?
Here. Oji.
Father! I thought I'd never see you again. When you and the woman vanished, I was sure you were dead.
I think I was, but I was brought back to life. Oji, I awoke in an incredible place and my wounds were gone. I had been healed.
How is that possible?
Long ago, our people believed in beings with great powers. These beings made the rains come, told the sun when to rise, they caused all life to be born, to grow, to die.
But those are just tales, father. Old superstitions.
But perhaps the beliefs of our ancestors are true. Nothing else can explain what's happened. Everything is changed now, Oji. We must tell the others.
Barron is stable, but Warren is still critical.
Palmer is missing. A scan of the planet shows Mintakan life forms only, no humans. However
The area around the duck blind exhibits Karst topography. Sinkholes, underground rivers, and caverns. And the rock strata contain a high concentration of thallium compounds which may be obstructing our sensor beams.
So if Palmer, in his delirium, fled into a cave, we may be unable to detect his life signs?
Correct, sir.
Captain, if he is still alive, he needs medical attention. We must send an away team to locate him.
But our presence must not interfere with the cultural development of the Mintakans.
Agreed. Further contamination must be prevented.
I have a suggestion.
First Officer:First officer's log, Stardate 43174.2. Counsellor Troi and I are beaming down to Mintaka Three to locate Doctor Palmer and to determine the extent of the cultural contamination. Doctor Crusher has temporarily altered our features and skin colour. She's also implanted subcutaneous communicators so that any transmissions we receive will be inaudible to the Mintakans.
Riker to Enterprise. Do you hear me?
Perfectly, Commander. I will be monitoring you continuously.
Mintakan emotions are quite interesting. Like the Vulcans, they have highly ordered minds. A very sensible people. For example, Mintakan women precede their mates. It's a signal to other women.
This man's taken, get your own?
Not precisely. More like, if you want his services, I'm the one you have to negotiate with.
What kind of services?
All kinds.
They are a sensible race.
I understand your skepticism. Had it not happened to me, I would find it difficult to accept as well.
But it did happen, just as we've said.
Fento, you know the legends better than anyone. Do they not speak of beings like the kind I've seen?
Who could vanish like smoke?
There are the stories of the Overseer who could appear and disappear at will.
And couldn't this Overseer heal the dead?
He had supreme power, or so our ancestors believed.
I believe I have seen the Overseer. He is called the Picard.
Uh oh.
His memory's intact.
The procedure didn't work.
Liko, all this talk of supernatural beings. No one has believed that for countless generations. Just as we no longer believe the stars control our fates, or the spirits of the dead haunt the living.
Nuria, I'm not saying all the old beliefs are true. But I did see the Picard, and I was restored back to life.
We are visitors. We've come to trade our cloth. May we speak?
Please do. We welcome outsiders. I am Nuria.
I am Troi and this is Riker. You've had a very interesting dream.
Dream? It was real!
My father and I both witnessed these beings.
If you are father and daughter, you may well have shared the same dream.
That is not reasonable.
Is that any less reasonable than being magically transformed to another place by the Picard?
Nuria!
It has to be Palmer! The one the Picard wished to find.
Remarkable. You were speaking the truth.
The Picard will be pleased.
Riker to Picard.
Go ahead, Number One.
We have a problem.
With the contamination?
It's worse than we suspected.
The Mintakans are beginning to believe in a god
And the one they've chosen is you.
Picard, you must beam Palmer aboard immediately. Without medical attention
It's not as simple as that. He is surrounded by Mintakans. If he dematerialises before their eyes, the impact
It will slightly increase the cultural contamination which already exists. A small price for saving Palmer's life.
Number One?
Is there any chance of your freeing Palmer and transporting up unseen?
We can try.
Try hard.
Picard out.
Picard, I must protest. You're endangering Palmer with this delay.
I am aware of that. But each of us, including Doctor Palmer took an oath that we would uphold the Prime Directive, if necessary, with our lives.
Riga and I were hunting on the third ridge. We followed a hornbuck into a cave. The stranger was there, asleep.
This Palmer is one of the Overseer's servants?
Yes. The Picard has many servants. Isn't that true, Fento?
According to legend. But if this Palmer is a servant of the Overseer, what was he doing in the cave?
Perhaps he ran away.
Or he failed the Picard somehow and was hiding from him.
We should bind him in case he wakes and tries to escape.
It's senseless for this stranger to be held captive. All this talk of the Overseer, it's old superstitions.
I disagree. All the evidence indicates that the Overseer exists.
And I heard the Picard say he wanted to find Palmer.
Then by keeping Palmer safe, we will please the Picard.
And he'll grant us favours in return.
Favours?
It is said that the Overseer is all powerful. He can provide gentle winters, plentiful hunting, fertile crops, anything.
He could even bring back those who have died.
It's agreed. We will save Palmer for the Picard.
I've seen another one, like Palmer.
Another servant of the Picard?
He's headed toward the caves.
Fento, stay and bind Palmer.
Where?
Over there.
That knot won't hold. If I may?
Please do.
You need a knot that'll tighten under pressure. Let me show you.
Father, the sun's reaching its zenith. If I don't go to measure
Go.
Forgive me, friend, but the stranger must be set free.
Riker?
Riker to Enterprise. Lock on and prepare to beam us directly to Sickbay, but hang on for my signal.
Acknowledged, Commander.
Riker, stop!
Oji?
It's Riker, he's taking Palmer!
Hali. Yuri, don't let her escape.
I'm clear. Energise!
Data, has Counsellor Troi beamed up?
Negative, Commander. Sensors show she's in the midst of a group of Mintakans.
Damn.
He is all right. Hali, find Riker and Palmer.
Why did you and Riker take Palmer from us?
We did not take Palmer.
We set him free. Riker and I do not believe in these fables about an Overseer.
Don't you realise what you've done? You've angered the Picard and we may all suffer for it. I know. I've seen him. He is all-powerful.
Fanto, weren't there stories about the Overseer destroying those who offended him?
Stories, nothing more.
Liko, we'll get Palmer back. Riker was carrying him. They can't have gone far.
Still, the Picard may blame us for letting Palmer escape. Perhaps we should punish her. Let the Overseer know
That she and Riker acted alone.
We will keep Troi captive.
That's not enough.
You would have us harm her?
If it will hold off the Picard's anger, yes. I've seen how powerful he is.
I am unwilling to hurt her needlessly. We will wait for Hali to return.
And if they don't find Palmer?
Then we may have to do as Liko suggests.
Doctor, you believe the Mintakans are capable of harming Counsellor Troi?
They are not normally a violent people but these are extraordinary circumstances. They're trying to comprehend what they believe to be a god.
Recommendations?
The Mintakans wish to please the Overseer, but they can only guess what he wants. They need a sign.
Are you suggesting?
You must go down to Mintaka Three.
Masquerading as a god?
Absolutely out of the question. The Prime Directive
Has already been violated. The damage is done. All we can do now is minimise it.
By sanctioning their false beliefs?
By giving them guidelines. Letting them know what the Overseer expects of them.
Doctor Barron, I cannot, I will not, impose a set of commandments on these people. To do so violates the very essence of the Prime Directive.
Like it or not, we have rekindled the Mintakans' belief in the Overseer.
And are you saying that this belief will eventually become a religion?
It's inevitable. And without guidance, that religion could degenerate into inquisitions, holy wars, chaos.
Horrifying. Doctor Barron, your report describes how rational these people are. Millennia ago, they abandoned their belief in the supernatural. Now you are asking me to sabotage that achievement, to send them back into the Dark Ages of superstition and ignorance and fear? No! We will find some way to undo the damage we've caused. Number One, tell me about this group's leader.
Nuria. Exceptionally clear-minded, sensible. The Mintakans trust her judgment. If we can convince her that you are not a god
She might be able to persuade the others.
And how do you propose to convince her?
She believes the Picard is a magical figure. I'm going to show her how the magic works. I'm going to bring her aboard.
Counsellor, sensors indicate five Mintakans in your immediate vicinity. Four are motionless. The fifth is eight meters away, proceeding south. Is Nuria one of these five?
Mmm hmm.
Was that intended to be an affirmative?
Yes, Data, it was.
Is Nuria the closest of the five?
Uh un.
Negative.
Is Nuria the one in motion?
Mmm hmm.
Lock sensors on Nuria.
Locked on. We can beam Nuria aboard at will.
Data, when sensors indicate she's alone, beam her directly to transporter room one.
Aye, sir.
Ensign Hoy?
Captain, Nuria is alone.
I'll handle this.
Nuria, don't be afraid. No one is going to harm you.
Who?
I am Jean Luc Picard.
Please, get up. Get up. You must not kneel to me.
You do not wish it?
I do not deserve it. Look at me. Look at me. Feel the warmth of my hand, the rhythm of my pulse. I'm not a supreme being. I'm flesh and blood, like you.
Not like me.
Like you. Different in appearance, yes. But we are both living beings. We are born, we grow, we live and we die. In all the ways that matter, we are alike.
But you are the Picard!
There is something I want you to see.
What a wondrous place. Even the walls obey your command.
Wondrous, yes, but not miraculous. The doors merely work differently from the ones you know.
That is my home?
Seen from far, far above.
Yet we do not fall. I never imagined I would see the clouds from the other side. Your powers are truly boundless.
Nuria, your people live in huts. Was it always so?
No. We have found remnants of tools in caves. Our ancestors must have lived there.
So why do you now live in huts?
Huts are better. Caves are dark and wet.
If huts are better, why did you once live in caves?
The most reasonable explanation would be that at one time we didn't know how to make huts.
Just as at one time you did not know how to weave cloth, how to make a bow.
That would be reasonable.
Someone invented a hut. Someone invented a bow, who taught others, who taught their children, who built a stronger hut, built a better bow, who taught their children. Now, Nuria, suppose one of your cave dwelling ancestors could see you as you are today. What would she think?
I don't know.
Put yourself in her place. You see, she cannot kill a hornbuck at a great distance. You can. You have a power she lacks.
Only because I have a bow.
She's never seen a bow. It doesn't exist in her world. To you, it's a simple tool. To her, it's magic.
I suppose she might think so.
Now, how would she react to you?
I think she would fear me.
Just as you fear me.
I do not fear you any longer.
Good. That's good. You see, my people once lived in caves. And then we learned to build huts and, in time, to build ships like this one. NURIA Perhaps one day, my people will travel above the skies.
Of that, I have absolutely no doubt.
It's not the season for lightning. It must be a warning.
We've had storms like this before.
Not like this one.
It must mean something. The Picard is angry with us. He blames us for letting Palmer escape.
Liko, we don't know that the Overseer is responsible for this storm.
Will he also send floods? My wife died in last year's floods. Will we all die now? We must find Nuria.
Picard, you have shown me wonders I could never have imagined, and I am grateful beyond words. Might I request something for my people?
You are indeed a leader.
You have shown me such generosity. I wish my people could share in it. Six Mintakans died in a flood last winter. Four of them children. Would you bring them back to life?
That is not in my power.
Why? You restored Liko's life. Did the six who died offend you in some way? Did I offended you? Should I have ordered the death of Troi? Please, you must tell me if there's anything I can do to change your mind.
I've failed to get through to you, haven't I? Despite all my efforts.
Nuria can't be found. No one knows where she's gone.
Hali, any sign of Palmer or Riker?
They have escaped us. We searched everywhere.
What do we do now, father?
We must do as the Picard wishes. Punish those responsible.
Nuria would not allow us to
Nuria isn't here. We can't wait.
Crusher to Picard. I think we're going to lose Warren.
On my way.
I'm here, Mary.
Prepare two cc's of norep.
I'm sorry.
Picard, you could not save her?
No.
You do have limits. You are not masters of life and death.
No, we are not. We can cure many diseases and we can repair injuries, we can even extend life. But for all our knowledge, all our advances, we are just as mortal as you are. We're just as powerless to prevent the inevitable.
You are a remarkable people, but you are not superior beings. My people must be made to understand that.
Liko, you don't want to kill me.
I have no choice. I must do as the Picard wishes.
Are you sure you know what he wants? That's the problem with believing in a supernatural being. Trying to determine what he wants.
We must do something.
But what if we do the wrong thing, father?
Picard, we need your guidance. Is it your wish that this woman should die? Answer us. Speak.
Liko!
The Picard. The Overseer has come.
No. Liko. Liko, I am a man. I am not the Overseer. I am a traveller from a faraway land. Nothing more.
But you have restored my life. I am your servant.
You are no one's servant, Liko. I neither desire your obedience nor your worship.
Picard speaks the truth. I have visited his people. I have seen how they live and how they die. When death takes one of their loved ones, they are as helpless as we are.
Then how was I brought back to life?
Liko, you were not dead. Picard's people have a knowledge that we lack. They are able to heal wounds that we cannot.
No. No. He can bring back the dead. Show them, Picard. You can bring my wife back to me.
I cannot.
Why? Why won't you do this for me? Have I failed you in some way? Are you angry with me?
I am not angry with you.
Then I beg you, bring her back to me. I will give you my life in exchange. Please, take back what you gave me. Give it to her. Let her live!
It is beyond my power.
Nothing is beyond your power! You are the Overseer. I will prove it!
Liko!
If you believe I am all-powerful, then you cannot hurt me. If, however, I am telling the truth and I am mortal, you will kill me. But if the only proof you will believe is my death, then shoot.
Liko, don't do it!
Father, no!
Captain's log, supplemental. Doctor Crusher has repaired my injury with her usual skill. Mister La Forge will supervise the dismantling of the observation post after I make one last visit to Mintaka Three.
Now, Mister La Forge.
Aye, sir.
What is that?
A place where we can watch your people.
But why?
To study you. To understand your ways. Discontinue, Mister La Forge.
Picard, why should a people so advanced want to learn about us?
We were once as you are now. To study you is to understand ourselves.
But why did you have to hide yourself from us?
Because their presence would affect us, just as it affected me.
It is our highest law that we shall not interfere with other cultures.
Then revealing yourselves was an accident.
Oh, yes, and now we must leave you.
Why? There's so much you can teach us.
But that, too, would be interference. You must progress in your own way.
So we will. You have taught us there is nothing beyond our reach.
Not even the stars.
Pahkee.
I wish you good journeys, Picard. Remember my people.
Always.
Welcome to Risa. All that is ours is yours.
We are looking for the lodging chamber of Captain Jean-Luc Picard.
A file scan reveals no record of a Captain Picard currently visiting Risa.
When is he expected to arrive?
Where is no arrival date on file for any such individual.
Could we have been mistaken?
He will come.
First Officer:First officer's log, Stardate 43745.2. We have departed Gemaris Five, where for the past two weeks Captain Picard has been serving as mediator in a trade dispute between the Gemarians and their nearest neighbour, the Dachlyds.
Welcome back, Deanna.
It's good to be back. The last two weeks have been gruelling.
I take it the Captain was able to negotiate an agreement mutually beneficial to both parties.
He was. I don't know how he managed it. The Gemarians and the Dachlyds are both incredibly stubborn people.
The more difficult the task, the sweeter the victory.
Go to warp four, Mister Bennett. Set a course for Starbase twelve. Report.
Everything status quo, sir.
Very well. If anyone needs me, I'll be in my Ready Room.
Sir. Congratulations.
About what?
About the trade agreement.
Is it my imagination, or is something bothering the Captain?
He has been under a great deal of strain lately. While we were on Gemaris, he ate sparingly and slept even less.
Anything we can do?
Actually, I have a solution in mind, but I doubt he'll agree to it.
What would that be?
Our captain needs a vacation.
Come.
Sir, it's been brought to my attention one of the crew has been neglecting his health again.
How so?
It's a classic case of stress-related ailments brought on by overwork. Exhaustion, irritability, muscle spasms. Yet he insists on ignoring them.
Doesn't sound too serious.
And I plan to keep it that way.
What's the treatment.
A week's shore leave.
Impossible.
Jean-Luc, I could make that an order.
But you won't. Beverly, you know I loathe vacations.
You loathe going on vacations. Once you're there you have a marvellous time. You told me your four days on Zytchin Three were wonderful.
I lied. Look, the Enterprise is scheduled to spend a week undergoing maintenance overhaul at Starbase twelve. While there, I promise that I will make full use of available recreation activity.
Watching some technician fill deuterium tanks is not my idea of fun.
I suppose I could find a few hours to spend on the holodeck.
Forget the holodeck. Isn't there someplace you want to go?
The Astrophysics Centre on Icor Nine is holding a symposium on rogue star clusters. I had given serious thought to attending.
The last thing you need is serious thought. Jean-Luc, why don't you go some place beautiful, where you can relax and be pampered. You deserve it.
I'll give it serious thought.
Captain.
Doctor. Enough.
So, have you decided where you're going yet?
Yes I have, Number One. Bridge.
No, I meant on your shore leave.
Not you too.
Halt. I know this perfect little vacation spot. In fact, it falls within the coordinates of this sector.
How convenient. Except, Number One, I have absolutely no intention of taking a holiday. Is that clear?
Very clear.
Good. I'm glad we've got that straightened out. Resume.
The place is called Risa, and believe me, Captain, it is a paradise. Warm tropical breezes, exotic food. Nothing to do but sit around all day and enjoy the quiet. And then
PICARD + RIKER:The women.
Of course.
I'm sure you would find their sybaritic outlook on life very appealing.
Oh, I'm sure.
I'm glad to hear you say so, sir.
Unfortunately, this vessel is about to undergo extensive repairs requiring my personal supervision.
What about Risa?
Some other time, Number One.
Will, I've just had some terrific news.
Really?
There's an excellent chance my mother may be joining us on Starbase twelve.
Your mother?
She's returning home from a conference on Achrady Seven, and she's going to try to rearrange her schedule so she can spend some time visiting with us.
That's wonderful, Deanna.
She mentioned how much she was looking forward to seeing you again, Captain.
Did she? Commander, could I have a word with you?
Is something wrong, Captain?
Tell me, Number One, is the entire crew aware of this little scheme to send me off on holiday?
I believe there are two ensigns stationed on deck thirty nine who know nothing about it.
I suppose this means I can look forward to a week of continual harassment on this subject?  I admit, I've been feeling a little fatigued.
I'll see to it that these bags are beamed directly to your room, sir.
You look very handsome, if I might saying so Captain.
Are you taking all these books?
I thought I'd take some light reading in case I got bored.
Ulysses by James Joyce? Ethics, Sophistry and the Alternate Universe by Ving Kuda. You call that light reading?
To each his own, Number One.
Have I mentioned how imaginative the Risian women are, sir?
Too often, Commander.
I do have one request, sir.
You want me to bring you back a souvenir?
It's called a Horga'hn. I don't think you'll have any trouble finding one.
Consider it done.
Captain, I would feel better if you would allow me to assign a security officer to you. We will be out of communication range when we leave orbit.
I really don't think that will be necessary, Mister Worf. Risa has a reputation of being a most peaceful planet.
Aye, sir.
Well, the ship is yours, Number One.
Enjoy your trip, Captain.
I'll try, Counsellor.
He's going to have a great time.
I beg your pardon.
God, it's so good to see you again.
I think you've mistaken me for someone else.
You know, I think you might be right. Welcome to Risa.
A simple handshake would have sufficed.
Return.  My apologies. I fear I have yet to master the art of hoverball.
So it would seem.
My name is Joval. I am employed here. Is there anything you require to make your stay a more pleasant one?
You find me amusing.
No. It's just that you are the fifth woman to ask me that question this morning. All I require is to sit in the sun and read my book. Alone.
And afterward?
I really haven't thought that far ahead.
Then may I suggest a swim to be followed by a massage?
Some other time perhaps.
I don't understand. You say you wish to be alone yet you carry the Horga'hn.
I just purchased that. Why? Are you implying this has some special meaning?
The Horga'hn is the Risian symbol of sexuality. To own one is to call forth it powers. To display it is to announce you are seeking Jamaharon.
Riker!
Do you seek Jamaharohn?
I don't even know what it means. The Horga'hn is for a friend.
I see. Someone close to you?
That's right.
Someone you love?
I wouldn't go that far.
Your attitude is most puzzling. I will leave you now to your book.
That is all I ask.
You're blocking the suns.
I know you're working with her. I warn you, it's a mistake.
Are you addressing me?
Don't bother to deny it. I've seen the two of you together.
I don't know what the devil you're talking about. But whatever it is, I assure you it's no concern of mine.
Tell her I want the disc returned to me immediately.
Perhaps I have not made myself clear. You have the wrong man.
I am rapidly losing patience with you. I demand you talk business.
You'll find Ferengi demands carry little weight with me.
Obviously you've never dealt with my people before.
On the contrary, all too often.
Then you know the Ferengi are not to be trifled with.
Or trusted.
You dare to insult me?
I advise you to listen closely for I will not say this again. I came to Risa for a holiday, nothing more. I have no knowledge of this woman of whom you speak, nor have I laid eyes on any disc.
You expect me to believe such feeble lies?
I don't care what you believe!
This is not over yet, human. The disc is mine! And so is the woman. Remember that.
Hello.
Oh, it's you.
That's not much of a greeting.
Look, I don't wish to appear rude, but I am not seeking jamaharon.
All right, but you really should try it some time.
If I try it, it will be at a time of my own choosing.
That's fine with me. It's not as though I was offering to help you find it.
I, er, I assumed because of the way you welcomed me the other day.
I'm sorry if I embarrassed you.
I don't recall saying I was embarrassed. If's just that I prefer to be acquainted with the women that I kiss.
That's understandable. The name's Vash.
Jean-Luc Picard.
So tell me about yourself, Jean-Luc.
Would you rather I guess? I can be very persistent.
I'm the captain of a Federation starship.
That explains it.
Explains what?
I noticed you arguing with that Ferengi. For a moment there it looked like it was going to come to blows.
You're the woman he was talking about?
I hope your disagreement wasn't over me.
For that information you'll have to ask him.
Where are you going?
To find some privacy.
Wait a second.
What did he tell you? I'm sure there wasn't a bit of truth to it.
And you said you didn't know her.
I don't. And I don't want to.
Return the disc to me and all will be forgiven.
The disc doesn't belong to you, Sovak. It never did.
It would seem you two have a lot to discuss. If you'll excuse me.
Jean-Luc, I'm sorry. Perhaps one day I could explain all this to you later.
Perhaps you can.
I have a proposal I believe you'll find most interesting.
Save your breath.
I am willing to pay you your weight in gold in exchange for the disc. Is that not a generous offer?
I must have that woman.
What the hell are you doing in my room?
We are Vorgons. I am Ajur. This is Boratus.
We come from the twenty seventh century. We travelled three hundred years into the past to find you.
All right, let's assume for the moment I believe you, that you are indeed from the future. What is it that you want from me?
Have you heard of the Tox Uthat?
What? I'm aware of the legend. It tells of a visitor from the future who left behind a mysterious device known as the Tox Uthat.
Essentially that story is correct.
Then the Uthat actually exists?
Yes. It was invented by a scientist named Kal Dano in the mid twenty seventh century. The Uthat is a quantum phase inhibitor capable of halting all nuclear reaction within a star.
But why bring such a powerful weapon into the past?
Criminals attempted to steal the device, so he fled back to the twenty second century where he hid it. Ajur and I were the security team assigned to retrieve the Uthat.
I gather you were unsuccessful.
Yes. When we returned we began to search through the historical records for some clue to the Uthat's fate.
And your search led you to me?
We came upon a brief account stating you had discovered an object of unknown origin while vacationing on Risa. From its description, a crystal cube that fits in the palm of the hand, we surmised it could very well be the Tox Uthat.
I'm sorry to disappoint you, but I haven't found anything, including peace, which is the only thing I'm looking for.
You will find such a device, Captain. To us, it is already part of history.
And if I do find it, what then?
You will give it to us immediately so that we may return with it.
Well, the Uthat belongs to your time, not mine.
May I come in?
Excuse the mess. Sovak has taken to searching my room periodically.
Is this what he's looking for?
I'm sorry I had to hide it like that. I was afraid he'd start searching me next.
This disc must contain some very valuable information.
I doubt it's anything you'd be interested in.
Depends.
On what?
On whether or not it has something to do with the Tox Uthat.
Did Sovak tell you that?
Well, let's just say I've heard rumours that the Uthat is located somewhere on Risa.
Look, the last thing I need is a partner.
So it's true.
Have a seat. I don't suppose you ever heard of Professor Samuel Estragon?
Yes, as a matter of fact, I have. He spent half his life searching for the Tox Uthat.
I served as his personal assistant for the past five years. Shortly before he died, he uncovered new data pinpointing its location. And that disc contains his research notes and maps.
And you're continuing his work?
Exactly.
With a Ferengi as an associate?
Sovak and I are definitely not working together.
But the two of you are very well acquainted.
Well, at times he aided the professor in his explorations. Especially in situations that weren't quite ethical.
And now, with typical Ferengi logic, he's convinced that the Tox Uthat belongs to him.
All he cares about is selling it to the highest bidder.
Whereas you, of course, have a nobler purpose in mind.
I told the professor I'd present it to the Daystrom Institute for study. But first I have to find it. And that won't be easy with Sovak watching me every minute.
I'll go in your place.
And what about me?
You'll remain here. It's safer.
Is that an order?
Absolutely.
This isn't a starship, Jean-Luc. I don't follow orders.
Oh, I see.
Besides, you'd never find it without me. The professor's notes are in code.
From the moment I met you, I knew you were going to be trouble.
You look like a man who could handle trouble.
So, where exactly is the location?
It's about twenty seven kilometres due east. There are some subterranean caves there. That's where you'll find the Uthat.
I'll meet you in the lobby in fifteen minutes. Be punctual. Oh, and I advise you to change your clothing.
Jean-Luc. We're going to make a wonderful team.
I expected such treachery. Did you think you could sneak away from me so easily?
The disc. Where is it?
Didn't anyone tell you weapons aren't allowed on Risa?
You're making a grave mistake putting your trust in this woman.
It' be a worse mistake to trust you.
Silence! Do you know how she acquired the disc in the first place?
Sovak!
I paid her to steal it. But instead she betrayed me, and used my money to make her way here.
It didn't happen that way.
She's a greedy and unscrupulous woman. A perfect mate for a Ferengi.
You're becoming quite annoying, Sovak.
As are you, human. Perhaps I should kill you and then take the disc.
No, wait. You can have it.
See? I told you we'd make a wonderful team.
We've got long trip.
Have you calculated how much further we have to go?
Another eleven kilometres.
We should stay here for the night.
I was hoping you'd say that.
Actually, we've made better time than I expected.
I'll take that as a compliment.
As it was intended.
Jean-Luc, I'm afraid I haven't been totally honest with you.
Forgive me if I don't act surprised.
Sovak did pay me to hand over the disc.
So you did steal it?
It wasn't stealing. The professor had died. I had already devoted five years of my life to tracking down the Uthat.
But you took Sovak's money.
It was the only way I could afford to get to Risa. As for Sovak, he got exactly what he deserved.
Well, any woman who can beat a Ferengi at his own game bears watching.
I'll take that as another compliment. I'm flattered.
Hmm. Well, we should get some sleep.
You know Jean-Luc, it's lucky for you we met. If it wasn't for me, you'd still be back there sitting in the sun, relaxing.
That happens to be why I came to Risa.
I'm sure you hated every minute of it. That kind of vacation isn't for a man like you. You need excitement.
Excitement? Spending in a damp cave? Chasing after something we shall probably never find?
You're enjoying yourself, aren't you?
Yes,
I just wanted to hear you say it.
Good. Now, let's get some sleep.
I'll never forget that look on your face when you thought I was offering you jamaharon.
Now that was a simple misunderstanding.
You did seem a little disappointed when I turned you down.
You are outrageous.
Thank you. You're pretty stimulating yourself. Don't you see, we're a lot alike. That's probably why we get along so well.
You call this getting along?
Fine. We don't get along. We're not getting along.
I didn't say that.
No, if you want to believe we're not getting along, that's all right with me.
Still think I'm trouble?
I'm sure of it.
This is it. We've reached the end of our journey.
Do you have the exact location?
Seven metres in from the opening along the wall.
That should make it about here.
What the?
Something wrong?
I can't get a reading on this. There must be starithium ore in these rocks.
That leaves us but one alternative.
Shall we?
Picard!
A little premature, aren't we?
We are to be witness to a great moment, Picard.
Who the hell are they?
They are security officers from the twenty seventh century. They're here to take back the Uthat.
You knew about this and didn't say anything?
I'm sorry, Vash. Would you have brought me here if I had told you?
Probably not.
My point exactly.
So the betrayer is herself betrayed. You've put together quite a little team.
Do not interrupt the captain.
How did you get here?
I found the disc in her room.
That's impossible. I made a copy as a precaution, but I burned it before we left.
Only the outer casing was incinerated. Now, I had no intention of interrupting you. Please, continue digging.
No one told you to stop digging, human.
I see no reason to continue.
You will do as I say.
Look about you, Sovak. By now it must be obvious, even to you. The Uthat is not here.
Is this some pathetic attempt at trickery? Of course it's here. We simply haven't found it yet.
Are you saying that the professor's findings were wrong?
It would appear so.
But how could that be? His evidence was overwhelming.
Enough with this foolishness. Can't you see he's trying to deceive us? Return to work this instant!
I'm afraid he's right, Sovak. According to the disc we should have reached it hours ago.
Lies! Treachery! This cannot be happening. Not another failure. Not after having come so close.
It is most puzzling.
It's over, Sovak.
No, I will not be cheated out of my prize. Tell him. Tell him the professor's research is irrefutable.
I don't know anymore.
Then step aside.
The Uthat is here, somewhere. It's just waiting to be found. It can't hide from me forever.
Five years of my life, wasted.
There will be other treasures to be found, Vash.
Not like the Uthat. I hope you won't mind, but I need to be alone.
Enterprise to Captain Picard.
Picard here.
Go ahead, Commander.
We hope we're not interrupting anything important, Captain, but we wanted to inform you that we have achieved orbit around Risa and we're ready to beam you aboard at your convenience.
I'll be returning shortly, Commander. In the interim, stand ready to initiate transporter code fourteen at my signal.
Transporter code fourteen?
You heard me, Number One.
Yes, sir.
Picard out.
Leaving so soon?
Jean-Luc. I was just about to come say goodbye.
Well then, I've saved you the bother.
I want to put all this behind me as soon as possible. You understand?
Of course. There's just one last thing you can do for me.
Anything.
Tell me where you've hidden the Tox Uthat.
That's not funny.
You never intended to burn that second disc. If you had, you wouldn't have been so careless as to allow Sovak to salvage any of it. You wanted him to follow us, so that he could see for himself that the Uthat wasn't at the cave site. That was the only way he could be convinced that your quest had been futile.
But how could I have known the Uthat wasn't there?
Because you'd already been there once before, probably the moment you arrived on the planet. That's when you found it.
You're a man of many talents, Jean-Luc.
A piece of the future.
A very dangerous piece. Were you really going to give this to the Daystrom Institute?
Well, maybe not give it. Five years is a huge investment, Jean-Luc. I deserve to make a reasonable profit.
Congratulations Picard. We knew you would not fail us.
You're not going to just hand it over, are you? You didn't trust me. What makes you think you can trust them?
I assume the Vorgons have proof to back up their claim.
Our being here is proof enough.
Wait a second, Vorgons? The professor's notes said it was two Vorgons, a male and a female, who attempted to steal the Uthat in the first place. For all we know it could be them.
You're going to have to prove that you are who you say you are.
You yourself said, the Uthat belongs to the future.
But not necessarily to you.
You will return what is ours.
No!
Enterprise. Code fourteen. Lock on present coordinates. Two second delay. Mark!
Are you all right?  Go. Return to your own time. There's nothing for you here.
History recorded that you destroyed the Uthat.
You have fulfilled your destiny all too well, Picard.
I don't suppose there are any openings for an archaeologist aboard the Enterprise.
Somehow I doubt you'd find life aboard a starship suitable to your taste.
Probably not. I could never tolerate all that discipline.
So, what are your plans?
I thought I might explore the ruins on Sarthong Five.
Unbelievable! You are out of your mind! The Sarthongians are merciless to trespassers.
Why, Jean-Luc, you really do care about me.
Promise me you will try and stay out of trouble.
I always try.
I wish we had more time together.
Perhaps we do. The Vorgons are time travellers. Now that they know where and when the Uthat can be found, they may very well come back and try for it again.
So we may be doing this all over again?
Welcome aboard, Captain.
Status report, Number One?
All went well on Starbase twelve. I think you'll find the ship to be in splendid condition.
I'll present my compliments to the crew. Oh yes, Number One, about that Horga'hn you requested.
Yes, sir.
You and I need to have a little chat about that.
Was it a relaxing trip, Captain?
Uh huh.
I knew he'd have a great time.
As time passes, a boy inevitably becomes a man. What is not inevitable, is that a man become a warrior. A warrior must be forged like a sword, tempered by, by,  tempered by experience. The path of the warrior begins
Alexander.
No! Wait!
Sorry. I didn't mean to hit you.
What is the meaning of this?
I'm sorry. We made fullerenes in chemistry class today and filled them with water.
I asked you to meet me here after school. I have been waiting for you.
I forgot.
You forgot because you allowed yourself to be distracted by foolishness.
I'm sorry.
There is something very important I want to discuss with you. It concerns your future. Sit. As time passes, a boy inevitably becomes a man, but what is not inevitable is that a man become a sword
What?
No. I meant warrior. The path of A warrior begins with the First Rite of Ascension.
Is that when they hit you with pain sticks?
No. No, that is the Second Rite.
Oh.
You are approaching the Age of Ascension. It is time for you to prepare for the ceremony.
What do I have to do?
Well, your fighting skills will be tested and your knowledge of the teachings of Kahless. It will be challenging, but I will help you prepare. These are the kor'tova candles. They represent the fire that burns within the heart of a warrior. When you light yours, you will be declaring your intention to become a warrior. Go ahead.
What if I don't want to?
If you do not participate in the rite before the age of thirteen years, you will never be able to become a true Klingon warrior.
Well I don't care about that.
You may not care about it now, but someday you might.
Mother always said that I didn't have to do any of this Klingon stuff if I didn't want.
It is your decision but
Okay then. I'm not going to do it.
Alexander.
You just said it was up to me. I don't want to be a warrior.
As a result, we won't be able to rendezvous with the Kearsarge for another four days.
Will we be holding position here until it arrives?
Yes. And, as it would seem we're in for a relatively quiet time, I shall use this opportunity to visit the Hatarian System. There are some ancient ruins that are just being excavated.
The delay will also make it possible for Stellar Dynamics to complete their study of the Vodrey Nebula.
I'll let them know they can have more access to the lateral sensor grid.
We could use this time to recalibrate the weapon targeting array. Mister Worf?
Yes, sir. I will begin the procedure immediately.
Very good. Dismissed. Lieutenant, could I have a word with you for a moment?
I noticed several times during the briefing that you appeared to be a bit distracted.
I apologise. In the future, I will make sure my personal affairs do not interfere with my duties.
Is everything all right?
I am having problems with Alexander. He has made it clear he does not wish to participate in the First Rite of Ascension.
Oh, I see.
I have tried to tell him that it is an important part of a young Klingon's life, but he does not understand.
But he's had so little opportunity to spend time with Klingons. You know, the festival of Kot'baval is tomorrow. If he could take part in that, I'm sure he would more fully appreciate what a rich cultural heritage he comes from. There is the Klingon outpost on Maranga Four. I'm sure they'll be celebrating the festival.
Yes. But the outpost is on the other side of the Vodrey Nebula. It would take three days by shuttle to get there.
The Enterprise could be there in a fraction of the time, and still be back in time for the rendezvous.
Captain, I cannot ask you
Mister Worf, Stellar Dynamics would like nothing better than a trip around the nebula.
Thank you, sir.
Who's that?
It is the tyrant Molor. He was so strong no one could stand against him.
Nok'tar be'got, hosh'ar te'not?
What's he saying?
He is asking if anyone else will have the courage to stand up to Molor.
Nok'tar be'got, hosh'ar te'not?
Ki'rok, Molor, ki'rok!
Ni'tokor bak'to! Ba'jak tu'mo!
O'tak tu'ro!
Nok'tar be'got? Hosh'ar te'not?
Ki'rok Molor, ki'rok!
What is this?
Jik'ta. You have wounded me.
You fought well.
What happens now?
There is only one man can stand against Molor.
Nok'tar Kahless.
It's Kahless!
Kahless would rather die than live under Molor's tyranny.
Ni'lot Kahless!
Father.
Where have you been?
We were watching the fire dancers.
We?
K'Nor and Bar'el. They live here on the outpost. I need some money.
What for?
The man over there says he's got Molor's head in a box. The real Molor.
That is impossible. The real Molor died centuries ago.
I know. It's mummified. He offered to show us for fifty darseks.
He is trying to take your money.
Please, Father. He's waiting.
No. It is late. We should go home.
But
Alexander, that is enough. Come, it is time to go.
I have to say goodbye to my friends.
You can see your friends again tomorrow.
We're coming back?
If you want to.
Hi'jak beh.
Run, Alexander.
K'MTAR:Ni'tokor bak'to!
K'MTAR:Q'apla, Worf. You are too much for them.
I have seen you before. Who are you?
K'MTAR:A friend.
Are you K'mtar.
K'MTAR:Your brother sent me here to protect you.
He is gin'tak to the house of Mogh.
Gin'tak?
An advisor so trusted that he is become part of a family.
Do you have any idea who was behind the attack?
K'MTAR:It is a Klingon matter. It is not your concern.
One of my officers was almost killed. That makes it my concern.
K'MTAR:Recently, rumours began to circulate on the homeworld that an assassination attempt was going to be made on the family of Mogh. Kurn sent me here to make sure nothing happened to Worf.
Why didn't you warn him before the attack was made?
K'MTAR:I tried to contact him over subspace. I was told he was not aboard. I decided to beam directly to the surface.
Why didn't you let us know about it?
K'MTAR:Forgive me for being blunt, Commander, but when it comes to protecting the house to which I have pledged my life, I trust no one.
I have full confidence in the officers with whom I serve. One of the attackers dropped this dagger. The design represents the house of Duras.
K'MTAR:We have other evidence that indicates the Duras sisters, Lursa and B'Etor, were behind the attack.
What do you think they were after?
K'MTAR:Kurn's seat on the Council, of course.
We can not allow their attack on our house to go unanswered.
K'MTAR:First, we must to find them.
At one point they were at Deep Space Nine, trying to sell bilitrium explosives.
K'MTAR:That was months ago. No one knows where they went from there.
Maybe we can find them. We've arranged for quarters on the ship, if you'd like to stay.
K'MTAR:I would. Worf and I have much to discuss.
K'MTAR:I will send Kurn a message telling him what happened, but he will not receive it for days. He's gone to the Hitora colony
Why did you treat Commander Riker so disrespectfully? You were rude.
K'MTAR:I may have been rude by human standards. I meant no disrespect. What is the matter, Worf? Have you been living so long among humans that you have forgotten how Klingons behave?
I have not forgotten. I am merely stating that their ways our different than ours.
K'MTAR:I trust you have made your son aware of that fact as well.
Yes, of course I have.
K'MTAR:Good. Because someday Alexander may be called upon to lead the house of Mogh. Kurn has no male heir. He wants to make sure that Alexander is preparing himself.
Does my brother doubt my ability to raise my son as a Klingon?
K'MTAR:No. But you are alone among humans. It cannot be easy to keep our ways.
No. It has not been easy.
K'MTAR:How are his fighting skills? Can he handle a bat'leth?
He is learning. He could be better.
K'MTAR:He must. He's nearing the age of ascension.
Actually, Alexander has not yet committed himself to undergoing the Rite.
K'MTAR:What?
I have tried to explain to him how important it is, but he will not listen to me.
K'MTAR:Perhaps together, you and I can find a way to spark the boy's interest in his heritage.
I would be grateful for any help you could offer.
K'MTAR:Tomorrow, then.
Tomorrow.
K'MTAR:May I say goodnight to the boy?
Yes, of course.
K'MTAR:Is this your mother?
Yes. She died when I was little.
K'MTAR:You miss her a great deal, don't you? It must be hard for you, being the only Klingon your age aboard this ship.
Sometimes.
K'MTAR:Have you ever been to the Homeworld?
No.
K'MTAR:I think you would like it there. At your uncle's house there is a lake you can swim in that is so clear you can see all the way to the bottom.
Really?
K'MTAR:You have cousins there. They want to meet you.
I don't know.
K'MTAR:I understand. You're afraid. You don't whether the Homeworld is safe.
Yes.
K'MTAR:What happened today on the planet is frightening. You're still troubled.
I thought they were going to kill my father.
K'MTAR:You must have wanted to help us fight them off.
I didn't know what to do.
K'MTAR:Someday, if you work hard, you will become a warrior. A Klingon warrior. And you will always feel safe because you will know how to defend yourself. And I'll tell you something else. If anyone ever tries to hurt your father again, you will be able to fight at his side and make sure nothing happens to him. What do you think of that? Goodnight, Alexander. Dream well.
Good night, K'mtar.
Any luck?
Starfleet records contain no mention of the Duras sisters after their departure from Deep Space Nine.
K'MTAR:Did I not tell you as much?
Have you been able to contact Deep Space Nine?
I am being patched through right now, sir.
On screen. Quark. I see you remember me.
How could I forget the only man ever to win triple down dabo at one of my tables?
And how could I forget that you didn't have enough latinum to cover my winnings?
I thought I explained that my brother had misplaced the key to the safe. Besides, those vouchers I gave you are every bit as good as latinum.
Not exactly. You can spend latinum just about anywhere. Those vouchers are only good at your bar.
Is that what this is about? You're on your way and you're calling to reserve a holosuite programme?
Actually, I was hoping you could help me with something else.
What would that be?
I'm looking for some Klingon friends of mine. The Duras sisters, Lursa and B'Etor?
Yes, Lursa and B'Etor. Big talk, small tips.
Do you know where I can find them?
Well, I did hear a rumour, actually.
What kind of rumour?
Oh, I don't know. I'm sure it was told to me in confidence.
And how much would your confidence cost?
How many vouchers do you have, again?
I have enough for twelve bars of latinum. I'd be glad to return them.
I believe the rumour was that the sisters were trying to buy some second hand mining equipment.
What for?
They learned of a magnesite deposit on the Kalla system. It belongs to the Pakleds, but those fools don't even know it's there. Your, er, friends tried to get at it.
All right. I'll send those vouchers to you.
Don't bother. I voided them while we've been talking.
So long, Quark.
How long would it take us to get to the Kalla system?
Approximately sixteen hours, sir.
K'MTAR:Could not he have been lying?
Why would he? I'd just be knocking on his door again in a few days, and I wouldn't be in as good a mood.
K'MTAR:Congratulations, Commander. I did not think it would be possible to find the sisters.
Take us out of orbit.
Aye, sir.
K'MTAR:I took the liberty of creating a holodeck programme.
What kind of programme?
K'MTAR:I'll show you. Computer, run programme K'mtar alpha one.
Programme initiated. Enter when ready.
Why did you want to recreate this?
K'MTAR:You said you wished you had been able to help your father fight, but you did not know how. You have probably fought that battle over and over again in your mind.
Yes.
K'MTAR:Let's see what happens now.
K'MTAR:Computer, give me two Klingon warriors.
How can I fight someone that big?
K'MTAR:Size is not the most important thing. Skill, cunning, powers of observation are the most important weapons. Ni'tokor bak'to!
K'MTAR:Freeze programme. Look what this ko'tal is doing. You see his leg? That will give a clue as to what his next move will be.
All his weight is on his right foot.
Yes, he is going to have to shift it to regain his balance.
K'MTAR:Stand ready. Computer, resume programme.
K'MTAR:Po'tajg! Po'tajg! Finish him.
K'MTAR:Freeze programme. You should have killed him when you had the chance.
Why did you not?
I don't know.
K'MTAR:Look at him! He did not care that you showed him mercy. He was going to kill you.
K'mtar, that is enough.
K'MTAR:If this was real, he'd be dead by now.
Alexander.
We are approaching Kalla Three.
Set a standard orbit. Any evidence of a mining expedition?
A shaft has been cut through the outer crust. There is evidence of machinery, but it does not appear to be in use.
Life signs?
It is difficult to say. The magnesite is interfering with bioreadings.
Assemble an away team.
Who are you?
Gorta. I am Gorta.
What are you doing on this planet?
I crashed here.
Then you are denying involvement in illegal mining activities?
Mining? So that's what all this equipment is here for.
We are looking for two Klingon women. Sisters.
Lursa? B'Etor? Do you know where they are?
Actually we were hoping that you did.
Maybe I do.
Would you be willing to share your information with us?
My personal code of conduct prohibits sharing. But I'd consider a trade.
Does your personal code of conduct tell you that when you're stranded on a planet with no way off, you shouldn't try to cut deals?
You have a point.
We could certainly provide passage off this planet in exchange for information.
Could you perhaps fail to tell the Pakleds that we were mining their ore?
Don't push your luck. But if you get us to the Duras sisters, I'll see what I can do.
The Duras sisters. They are magnificent, aren't they?
Where are they now?
Selling the ore, I imagine. They took everything. The ore, the ship.
And where have they gone?
We were going to sell the ore to a Yridian trader. We were supposed to meet him in the Ufandi system.
Gather your belongings. It is time to leave.
Like I said, they took everything.
K'MTAR:Worf. I am sorry about what happened. I should not have gotten so angry. It's just that I am worried about Alexander.
As am I.
K'MTAR:Kurn told me that his mother actively discouraged him exploring his Klingon heritage.
When he first came to live with me, he knew nothing of our ways. He often reminds me of things his mother said to him. I try not to disregard her wishes, I want the boy to honour his mother.
K'MTAR:Someday I'm sure he will appreciate you and be grateful for all that you have given him. But still, compared to other boys his age, his fighting skills are years behind.
Yes, I know. He does not put in the time it takes to learn the skills.
K'MTAR:I thought that you might consider sending him to the training Academy on Ogat. Your brother is an influential man. I'm sure he could see to it that Alexander was admitted.
Ogat?
K'MTAR:I am only thinking of what is best for the boy. There, he would learn our ways. He would live like a Klingon.
I would like him to learn our ways. No. This is his home.
K'MTAR:How can you expect him to lead our family when all he knows is life aboard a Federation starship?
He is my son. He belongs with me.
K'MTAR:The boy is more human than Klingon. If he stays here, he will never be a warrior. He will never be able to defend our family against its enemies.
Enough! Enough! Enough! The decision is mine.
K'MTAR:Not necessarily. I would be well within my rights to invoke ya'nora kor.
You would question my fitness to raise my own son?
K'MTAR:For the good of our house, yes. Worf, I beg of you. Please stop thinking of yourself. It is Alexander we should be considering. Look into your heart and do what is best for him.
K'MTAR:Kahless was determined to teach his brother a lesson because he had told a lie. But Morath refused to fight him and instead ran away. Kahless pursued him across the valleys, over the mountains, and down to the edge of the sea. And there on the shore, they fought for
Twelve days, twelve nights. I know, I've heard this story before.
K'MTAR:Alexander, it is important to tell these stories, even if we already know them.
Why was Kahless so mad about the lie his brother told?
K'MTAR:It made him look like a coward.
If Kahless would have just explained what happened, maybe they wouldn't have had to fight about it.
K'MTAR:You're missing the point.
Why was it so wrong for Morath to run away? Maybe he didn't want to fight his brother because he didn't want to have to kill him.
K'MTAR:He ran because he was a coward.
But how do you know that's why?
K'MTAR:No more questions! These are our stories. It is important for a warrior to learn how to interpret them properly.
I'm trying to
K'MTAR:No, your head is filled with foolish human notions about the way things are. You are Klingon. It is time you began to act like one.
I am part human, too.
K'MTAR:Listen to me, Alexander. When a human looks at you, he does not see himself. He sees a Klingon.
It doesn't matter what I look like.
K'MTAR:It does. You are different than everyone else aboard this ship.
That's not true.
K'MTAR:It is. The only way that you will ever feel as if you truly belong, is to leave here and go live with your own kind. I know a Klingon school you could go to. You would be welcome there. They would teach you how to be a warrior, prepare you for the Rite of Ascension.
I don't know if I want to do that.
K'MTAR:After you were there a while you would find that you wouldn't want to do anything else.
I don't want to leave the Enterprise.
K'MTAR:Alexander, you must. Everything depends on it.
I thought you were different. I thought you understood me. But you don't. You're just like my Father. All you care about is me becoming a warrior. Just leave me alone!
First Officer:First Officer's log, stardate 47779.4. We've entered the Ufandi system, where we believe the Duras sisters might have come to sell the ore they mined on Kalla Three.
I am detecting a vessel holding position near the third planet. It is a Yridian freighter.
Put it on screen. Scan for magnesite in its hold.
The resonance signature indicates that there is magnesite ore present.
Then we're too late. The sisters have already been here.
Somehow I doubt the Yridians are going to be forthcoming about where they might have gone.
Sir, readings indicate that there are only five hundred kilograms of ore in the Yridian hold.
There should be over ten thousand kilograms.
That's odd. Hail them. I'm Commander William Riker from the Federation Starship Enterprise.
I am Yog. Why are we speaking?
Our sensors indicate that you're carrying magnesite ore.
Magnesite, yes.
Where did you get it?
From a Corvallen. For a good price.
Where is this Corvallen now? I'm under orders to acquire some magnesite.
He is gone. Where? Who is to know?
Would you be interested in selling me the ore you're carrying?
No, I have a buyer.
You haven't heard my offer. Half a gram of Anjoran biomimetic gel.
Done.
Once we verify the purity of your ore, we'll beam over the gel.
You're up to something.
Have the transporter room beam the ore to these coordinates.
Sir, that would place the ore directly off the ship's starboard bow.
I know.
Transport complete.
Lock phasers on the ore and fire.
Firing.
A Klingon bird of prey.
Put a tractor beam on it.
How did you know?
The Yridians had only part of the shipment in their hold. I realised we had arrived before they had completed the transfer.
The Klingon ship is hailing us.
On screen.
Release our vessel at once!
I don't think so.
B'ETOR:We've done nothing wrong. We were engaging in a simple business transaction.
We know you're dealing in stolen ore. But I want to talk about the assassination attempt on Lieutenant Worf.
B'ETOR:What assassination attempt? This is the first I've heard of it.
Too bad it didn't succeed.
We have evidence that you're behind it.
That is outrageous.
B'ETOR:What is this evidence?
Beam over. We'll show you.
B'ETOR:We'll be there. Shortly.
This was dropped by one of the assassins. It bears the crest of your house.
B'ETOR:Ge'ko kaf'la.
Someone must have given it to the assassins to implicate us.
Why would someone do that?
B'ETOR:In order to tarnish our good name.
You cannot tarnish a rusted blade.
Ji'ko to'val!
Gir'nak tovo'sor!
Mister Worf. You said there was other evidence they were involved.
K'MTAR:Yes. On the Homeworld.
We'll set a course. I want this thing cleared up.
K'MTAR:I will send a message to Kurn. He may wish to return to the Homeworld as well.
B'ETOR:Bet'ala nog'tor.
Impossible.
What is it?
B'ETOR:These markings represent the members of our house. This symbol represents our father, myself, my sister. And this represents her son.
I was not aware you had a son.
I do not. But I am with child.
B'ETOR:She found out only a few days ago and told no one but me. How can this marking be here? Where did this come from?
I will speak with K'mtar.
K'MTAR:Father. Stop, I am your son. I am Alexander.
What are you saying?
K'MTAR:I am your son Alexander. I have come to this time from forty years in the future.
P'tak! Tell me the truth or I will kill you.
K'MTAR:Look at me. When we first met you said I looked familiar.
I could have seen you on the Homeworld.
K'MTAR:No. Look closely. I am your son.
If you are Alexander, you will remember your mother's last words before she died.
K'MTAR:I was three years old. She was dying when we found her. She barely managed to whisper my name and then she took my hand and placed it in yours. Then she died. And then you howled in rage and said, look upon her. Look upon death and always to remember. And I always have.
How have you done this, come to this time?
K'MTAR:I met a man in the Cambra system. He gave me a chance to change the past. He had the ability to send me here, to this time.
And you came here in order to end your own life?
K'MTAR:I was hoping that I would not have to, that I could change things, that I could change myself. But I could not. And now everything is going to turn out like it did before. I cannot let that happen.
But why? What is going to happen that is so terrible?
K'MTAR:You will be killed because I was naive, too weak to be able to protect you.
I do not believe that.
K'MTAR:I was there! I saw you murdered. I was to blame.
You must not blame yourself.
K'MTAR:You don't understand. I did not become a warrior. I was a diplomat, a peacemaker. When it came my time to lead our family, I thought that I could single handedly end the fighting between the great houses. I publicly announced that the house of Mogh would be the first to end the feuding. That there would be no more retribution, no more revenge. You tried to warn me. You tried to tell me that I should not show weakness, but I thought you were a foolish old man. I told you that you were a relic from an earlier time and that a new era of peace was at hand. But you were right. My enemies saw my weakness and moved against me. And unless I stop it right now, that boy will see his father killed on the floor of the Council Chamber.
That is why you wanted to take Alexander away. To turn him into a warrior.
K'MTAR:I staged the assassination attempt to try and frighten him, to make him realise that he must follow the ways of the warrior. If I had listened to you, if I had become the warrior that you had wanted me to be, you would not have died in my arms.
No. Who knows what the future will be now that you have disrupted time? I may die tomorrow or I may outlive you. But when I die, I would like an honourable death. And the only way that is possible is for you accept yourself as you are, and stay true to what you believe. The cause of peace is a just cause. The struggle must continue.
K'MTAR:It is a futile struggle. I cannot change things.
You have already changed things more than you realise.
K'MTAR:The boy I was has not changed.
But I have. You have given me a glimpse into my son's future and I know now that he has his own destiny. And I believe it will be a great one.
K'MTAR:I love you, Father.
And I you, Alexander.
I've been waiting. Where's K'mtar?
He had to leave. He was called away.
He never said goodbye.
He asked me to say goodbye for him. He also wanted me to tell you, no matter what happens, no matter what you decide to do with your life, he will always care for you a great deal.
When will I see him again?
It may be a long time.
Well, we should start practice.
Alexander. There will be plenty of time for training.
Fletcher has more experience with propulsion systems.
But Carstairs is better with people. Considering this is a supervisory position, I'd go with her.
I guess you're right. Didn't we just do crew evaluation reports?
Three months ago.
It seems like three weeks. Why don't we just give everybody a promotion and call it a night, Commander?
Fine with me, Captain.
Could we have two coffees, please.
What could be so funny? What's so funny about crew evaluations?
Don't worry about it, Sam.
Can't we just try and have a good time here?
How can I have a good time when my career's being decided across the room? Come on. Think promotion. Promotion. Promotion.
You can't really believe that what you are doing will influence the outcome of your evaluation.
Promotion. Promotion. Promotion.
It's a time-honoured strategy, Taurik.
The Vedeks of the Janalan order maintain a round the clock chant for the benefit of the Bajoran people.
Considering the history of your planet, that doesn't exactly validate what he's doing.
Promote me, please, so I can make Lieutenant and have my own room.
If you're unhappy sharing quarters with me, then you should put in for a new room assignment. Just in case you're not promoted.
I've been thinking about who to promote to Ops.
The new night duty officer?
Lavelle is an obvious candidate, but I'm also considering Ensign Sito.
Thank you.
You're welcome. Are you sure about dessert?
Yes. Don't tempt me.
So, are they working on crew evaluations?
Yep.
Who are they talking about?
It's not my place to say.
Come on, Ben.
Please.
All right, but I'm not sure you two are going to like it. Apparently, you two are up for the same job.
Lock phasers on target.
Phasers locked.
The enemy is firing.
Helm, hard to starboard.
Hard to starboard.
Fire phasers.
Firing.
Target is destroyed.
End simulation sequence. Secure from drill. Alpha shift, your response time was seven percent slower than the gamma shift. All departments, submit drill evaluation reports
By oh nine hundred hours.
Ensign, you'll write that report.
Yes, sir.
What happened back there, Ensign?
I'm sorry, sir. When we changed course I had to re-lock phasers before I could fire.
Next time, try letting the locking relay float until the actual order to fire is given. They may not teach that trick at the Academy, but it works.
Thank you, sir.
Lavelle.
Sir?
Resume previous course and speed.
Aye, aye, sir.
One aye is sufficient acknowledgment, Ensign.
Helm, change course for the Argaya system, maximum warp.
Aye, sir.
What happened to the rendezvous with the Clement?
I've just received new orders from Starfleet. We'll discuss it in the Observation lounge. Mister Data, Mister Worf.
Ensign Sito, take over at Ops.
Yes, sir.
The Argaya system's close to the Cardassian border. I wonder why we're going there. How'd you like to be a spider under that table?
What?
A spider under the table.
Is that like a fly on the wall?
I guess so. You did really well during the drill.
Well apparently Commander Riker didn't think so. I swear he's got it in for me.
You're imagining things.
Yeah? Then how come you're sitting in that chair instead of me?
I guess he figured I need more practice than you do.
Excuse me, sir. Do you have a minute?
Sure, Taurik. What is it?
I'd like you to take a look at something.
Have you been improvising again, Ensign?
In a manner of speaking. I'm running a computer simulation to test a new warp field configuration.
You've got a problem here. Your plasma flow to the nacelles is out of sync.
Actually, sir, that was done deliberately. As you can see, this configuration has increased overall warp field integrity by seven percent.
You're right.
Doctor Nils Diaz has been experimenting with this technique at the Tanaline Propulsion Laboratory.
Yeah, I'm familiar with his work, but I never heard anything about this.
His findings have not been released yet. I was able to review a preliminary report when I was at the Academy.
I look forward to reading about it
I predict that when these findings are made public, they will become a new model for warp field operation.
Sounds interesting.
With your permission, sir, I'd like to begin tests to see if the technique can be adapted to our warp drive.
There might be variables that you didn't account for.
I was quite thorough.
I'm sure you were, but I'd still need to see your simulation before I authorise any tests.
As you wish.
If you have any other ideas for increasing efficiency, don't hesitate to run them by me.
As a matter of fact, sir, I do. When would be a good time to discuss them?
I'll get back to you on that.
Excuse me, Doctor.
If you're wondering about the evaluations, things couldn't be better.
Actually, I just wanted to tell you that Ensign Reilly's condition is showing improvement. But thank you.
In fact, I'm recommending you for a promotion. How does Lieutenant Alyssa Ogawa sound?
It sounds wonderful.
I'll talk to Commander Riker and I'm sure it'll be official as soon as the current crew evaluations are over. Oh, Alyssa, how are things going between you and Lieutenant Powell?
Fine. I think.
You think?
I'm sure it's nothing, but he seems preoccupied lately. Last night he had to cancel our date.
I see.
He's been putting together a research proposal. He's been really busy with it.
I know what that's like. Sometimes I get so busy with research I forget to eat.
I just wonder.
What? Sit down.
I've never met anyone like Andrew. It's as though we've known each other forever.
You do seem very well suited.
But I know that in the beginning of a romance it's possible to be a little blind.
I'm not sure I know what you mean.
Well, cancelling a date like that, the way he's been so distant lately. Doctor, do you think those could be warning signs that he's losing interest?
Alyssa, I think you're overreacting.
Maybe so.
If I cared as much about someone as much as you care about Andrew, he'd have to do a lot more than cancel a date before I'd get suspicious.
You're right.
I'm sure that when this research is over, things will be back just the way they were.
Except, of course, that he'll have to deal with Lieutenant Ogawa.
I only filled in at Ops for a half hour, but I had to degauss the main deflector dish, recalibrate the navigation grid, and use internal sensors to find a lost puppy.
Ops is a very different challenge from Tactical.
I can't figure out why I'm even being considered for this assignment. I'm a security officer.
I recommended you.
